New Jersey, session 221, A4700.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. The appropriations herein or so much thereof as may be necessary are hereby appropriated out of the General Fund, or such other sources of funds specifically indicated or as may be applicable, for the respective public officers and spending agencies and for the several purposes herein specified for the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2025. Unless otherwise provided, the appropriations herein made shall be available during said fiscal year and for a period of one month thereafter for expenditures applicable to said fiscal year. Unless otherwise provided, at the expiration of said one-month period, all unexpended balances shall lapse into the State Treasury or to the credit of trust, dedicated or non-State funds as applicable, except those balances held by encumbrances on file as of June 30, 2025 with the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting or held by pre-encumbrances on file as of June 30, 2025 as determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall provide the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer with a listing of all pre-encumbrances outstanding as of July 31, 2025 together with an explanation of their status. Nothing contained in this section or in this act shall be construed to prohibit the payment due upon any encumbrance or pre-encumbrance made under any appropriation contained in any appropriation act of the previous year or years. Furthermore, balances held by pre-encumbrances as of June 30, 2024 are available for payments applicable to fiscal year 2024 as determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall provide the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer with a listing of all pre-encumbrances outstanding as of July 31, 2024 together with an explanation of their status. On or before December 1, 2024, the State Treasurer, in accordance with the provisions of section 37 of article 3 of P.L.1944, c.112 (C.52:27B-46), shall transmit to the Legislature the Annual Financial Report of the State of New Jersey for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, depicting the financial condition of the State and the results of operation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024. 01  LEGISLATURE 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 71  Legislative Activities 0001  Senate DIRECT STATE SERVICES 01-0001 Senate $18,690,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Senate $18,690,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Senators (40) ($1,980,000) Salaries and Wages ($7,768,000) Members Staff Services ($7,232,000) Materials and Supplies ($133,000) Services Other Than Personal ($1,480,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($71,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($26,000) The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in this account is appropriated. 0002  General Assembly DIRECT STATE SERVICES 02-0002 General Assembly $25,208,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, General Assembly $25,208,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Assemblypersons (80) ($3,937,000) Salaries and Wages ($8,648,000) Members Staff Services ($10,854,000) Materials and Supplies ($107,000) Services Other Than Personal ($1,569,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($89,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($4,000) The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in this account is appropriated. 0003 Office of Legislative Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 03-0003 Legislative Support Services $57,410,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Office of Legislative Services $57,410,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($34,389,000) Materials and Supplies ($1,370,000) Services Other Than Personal ($6,650,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($5,675,000) Special Purpose: 03 State House Express Civics Education Program ($30,000) 03 Affirmative Action and Equal Employment Opportunity ($29,000) 03 Continuation and Expansion of Data Processing Systems ($4,000,000) 03 Senator Wynona Lipman Chair in Womens Political Leadership, Eagleton Institute ($100,000) 03 Henry J. Raimondo Legislative Fellows Program ($69,000) 03 High Definition Filming ($138,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($4,960,000) Such amounts as are required for Master Lease payments are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting and the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer. Such amounts as may be required for the cost of information system audits performed by the State Auditor are funded from the departmental data processing accounts of the department in which the audits are performed. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in this account is appropriated. 77  Legislative Commissions and Committees DIRECT STATE SERVICES 09-0010 Intergovernmental Relations Commission $671,000 09-0014 Joint Committee on Public Schools $335,000 09-0018 State Commission of Investigation $5,015,000 09-0053 New Jersey Law Revision Commission $321,000 09-0058 State Capitol Joint Management Commission $19,696,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Legislative Commissions and Committees $26,038,000 Direct State Services: Intergovernmental Relations Commission: 09 The Council of State Governments ($298,000) 09 National Conference of State Legislatures ($302,000) 09 Eastern Trade Council - The Council of State Governments ($31,000) 09 National Foundation for Women Legislators ($40,000) Joint Committee on Public Schools: 09 Expenses of Commission ($335,000) State Commission of Investigation: 09 Expenses of Commission ($5,015,000) New Jersey Law Revision Commission: 09 Expenses of Commission ($321,000) State Capitol Joint Management Commission: 09 Expenses of Commission ($14,696,000) 09 State Capitol Joint Management Commission - State Capitol Complex Park ($5,000,000) The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in these accounts are appropriated. Such amounts as are required for the establishment and operation of the Apportionment Commission and the legislative New Jersey Redistricting Commission are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting and the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer. Receipts from the rental of the Cafeteria and the Welcome Center and any other facility under the jurisdiction of the State Capitol Joint Management Commission are appropriated to defray custodial, security, maintenance and other related costs of these facilities. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no funds hereinabove appropriated for the State Capitol Joint Management Commission shall be used to purchase, lease, or rent any motor vehicle intended for passenger use. Legislature, Total State Appropriation $127,346,000 Summary of Legislature Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services ......................................... $127,346,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund .................................................... $127,346,000 06  OFFICE OF THE CHIEF EXECUTIVE 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 76  Management and Administration DIRECT STATE SERVICES 01-0300 Chief Executive's Office $14,745,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Management and Administration $14,745,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($13,740,000) Special Purpose: 01 National Governors' Association ($185,000) 01 Education Commission of the States ($125,000) 01 National Conference of Commissioners On Uniform State Laws ($65,000) 01 Brian Stack Intern Program ($10,000) 01 Allowance to the Governor - Funds Not Otherwise Appropriated for Official Receptions, Official Residence, and Other Official Expenses ($95,000) Materials and Supplies ($131,000) Services Other Than Personal ($352,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($42,000) The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in this account is appropriated. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Official Receptions, Official Residence, and Other Official Expenses may be used at the discretion of the Governor for official State purposes, but shall not be used for personal purposes and shall not be deemed to be a supplement to the Governors statutorily prescribed salary. Office of the Chief Executive, Total State Appropriation $14,745,000 Summary of Office of the Chief Executive Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services .......................................... $14,745,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund ..................................................... $14,745,000 10  DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE 40 Community Development and Environmental Management 49  Agricultural Resources, Planning, and Regulation DIRECT STATE SERVICES 01-3310 Animal Disease Control $2,508,000 02-3320 Plant Pest and Disease Control $2,995,000 03-3330 Agricultural and Natural Resources $532,000 05-3350 Food and Nutrition Services $343,000 06-3360 Marketing and Development Services $1,083,000 08-3380 Farmland Preservation $258,000 99-3370 Administration and Support Services $5,504,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Agricultural Resources, Planning, and Regulation $13,223,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($8,215,000) Materials and Supplies ($88,000) Services Other Than Personal ($1,946,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($160,000) Special Purpose: 02 Spotted Lanternfly ($425,000) 02 New Jersey Hemp Farming Fund ($364,000) 05 The Emergency Food Assistance Program ($343,000) 06 Promotion/Market Development ($49,000) 06 Jersey Fresh Program ($100,000) 06 Dairy Margin Coverage Premiums Program (P.L.2021, c.401) ($125,000) 08 Agricultural Right to Farm Program ($83,000) 08 New and Beginning ("Next Gen") Farmers Program ($175,000) 99 Office of the Food Security Advocate (P.L.2021, c.483) ($1,150,000) Receipts from laboratory test fees are appropriated to support the Animal Health Diagnostic Laboratory program. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Animal Health Diagnostic Laboratory receipt account is appropriated for the same purpose. Receipts from the seed laboratory testing and certification programs are appropriated for the cost of these programs. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the seed laboratory testing and certification receipt account is appropriated for the same purpose. Receipts from Nursery Inspection fees are appropriated for the cost of that program. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Nursery Inspection program is appropriated for the same purpose. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Spotted Lanternfly account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from the New Jersey Hemp Farming Fund established pursuant to section 8 of P.L.2019, c.238 (C.4:28-13) are appropriated to offset the cost of administering the program. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the New Jersey Hemp Farming Fund is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from the sale or studies of beneficial insects are appropriated to support the Beneficial Insect Laboratory. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Sale of Insects account is appropriated for the same purpose. Receipts from Stormwater Discharge Permit program fees are appropriated for the cost of that program. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Stormwater Discharge Permit program account is appropriated for the same purpose. Receipts from the distribution of commodities, sale of containers, and salvage of commodities, in accordance with applicable federal regulations, are appropriated for Commodity Distribution expenses. Receipts in excess of the amount anticipated from feed, fertilizer, and liming material registrations and inspections are appropriated for the cost of that program. Receipts from dairy licenses and inspections are appropriated for the cost of that program.   The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Dairy Fee - Administration program, less $1,500,000, is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from agriculture chemistry fees not to exceed $75,000 are appropriated to support the organic agriculture programs. Receipts from organic agriculture program fees are appropriated for the cost of that program. Receipts from inspection fees from fruit, vegetable, fish, red meat, and poultry inspections are appropriated for the cost of conducting fruit, vegetable, fish, red meat, and poultry inspections. An amount equal to receipts generated at the rate of $0.875 per gallon of wine, vermouth, and sparkling wine from the alcoholic beverage excise tax sold by plenary winery and farm winery licensees licensed pursuant to R.S.33:1-10, and certified by the Director of the Division of Taxation, are appropriated to the Department of Agriculture for expenses of the Wine Promotion Program. Receipts from the surcharge on vehicle rentals pursuant to section 54 of P.L.2002, c.34 (C.App.A:9-78), not to exceed $278,000, are appropriated to support the Agro-Terrorism program within the Department of Agriculture. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, an amount not to exceed $200,000 shall be transferred from the appropriate funds established in the "Open Space Preservation Bond Act of 1989," P.L.1989, c.183, to the State Transfer of Development Rights Bank account and is appropriated to the State Agriculture Development Committee for Transfer of Development Rights administrative costs. GRANTS-IN-AID 03-3330 Agricultural and Natural Resources $1,000,000 05-3350 Food and Nutrition Services $93,318,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Agricultural Resources, Planning, and Regulation $94,318,000 Grants-in-Aid: 03 Conservation Assistance Program ($1,000,000) 05 SNAP and School Meals Dual Enrollment Pilot Program ($700,000) 05 CUMAC/ECHO, Inc. - Anti-Hunger Program ($750,000) 05 Hunger Initiative/Food Assistance Program ($6,818,000) 05 Food and Hunger Programs ($85,000,000) 05 Cultural Society of Bergen County - Mom's Food Pantry ($50,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, an amount not to exceed $250,000 may be transferred from the Department of Environmental Protection's Water Resources Monitoring and Planning - Constitutional Dedication special purpose account and is appropriated for the Animal Waste Management portion of the Conservation Assistance Program in the Division of Agricultural and Natural Resources in the Department of Agriculture, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Conservation Assistance Program is appropriated for the same purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, $540,000 shall be transferred from the Department of Environmental Protection's Water Resources Monitoring and Planning - Constitutional Dedication special purpose account and is appropriated to support nonpoint source pollution control programs in the Department of Agriculture on or before September 1 of the current fiscal year. Further additional amounts may be transferred pursuant to a Memorandum of Understanding between the Department of Environmental Protection and the Department of Agriculture from the Department of Environmental Protections Water Resources Monitoring and Planning - Constitutional Dedication special purpose account to support nonpoint source pollution control programs in the Department of Agriculture, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance of this program at the end of the preceding fiscal year is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The expenditure of funds for the Conservation Cost Share program hereinabove appropriated shall be based upon an expenditure plan, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the SNAP and School Meals Dual Enrollment Pilot Program is subject to the following conditions: the program shall be administered to provide assistance to school districts and other recipients for the purpose of aiding students who are enrolled in federal free and reduced price meal programs to enroll in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) pursuant to a plan to be developed by the Office of the Food Security Advocate in consultation with one or more entities with relevant expertise, including but not limited to federal, State, and local agencies and emergency food distribution organizations, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Food and Hunger Programs shall be  allocated as follows: 53% to the Community Food Bank of New Jersey; 15% to the Food Bank of South Jersey; 15% to Fulfill Monmouth & Ocean; 11% to Mercer Street Friends Food Bank; 3% to Norwescap; and 3% to Southern Regional Food Distribution Center. The Office of Food Security Advocate (OFSA) shall develop a plan for the purposes of supporting regional innovative food security initiatives through public-private partnerships. In order to effectuate the plan, the OFSA shall be permitted to reassign a portion of each recipients allocated emergency food aid in an amount not to exceed 12% of the allocation. The plan shall ensure that no emergency feeding organizations shall have such an amount reduced that would prevent them from effectively providing services in accordance with their contract with the State. STATE AID 05-3350 Food and Nutrition Services $71,163,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$71,163,000) 08-3380 Farmland Preservation $3,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$3,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, Agricultural Resources, Planning, and Regulation $71,166,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$71,166,000) State Aid: 05 Breakfast After the Bell (PTRF) ($5,000,000) 05 Working Class Families State Supplement (P.L.2022, c.104, as amended by P.L.2023, c.336) (PTRF) ($50,600,000) 05 School Lunch Aid - State Aid Grants (PTRF) ($8,613,000) 05 School Breakfast and Lunch State Aid (P.L.2019, c.445) (PTRF) ($4,500,000) 05 State Supplement for Summer Food Service Programs (P.L.2021, c.246) (PTRF) ($2,450,000) 08 Payments in Lieu of Taxes (PTRF) ($3,000) In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Food and Nutrition Services program classification, such additional amounts as may be necessary are appropriated, as determined by the Secretary of Agriculture, to reimburse eligible sponsors in the federal nutrition programs administered by the New Jersey Department of Agriculture for the number of meals served under the programs within the Food and Nutrition Services program classification, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the School Lunch Aid - State Aid Grants account is appropriated for the same purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount necessary to reimburse State and local government entities for participating in the School Lunch Program is appropriated from the School Lunch Aid - State Aid Grants account, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount necessary to reimburse State and local government entities for participating in the School Lunch Program and School Breakfast Program is appropriated from the School Breakfast and Lunch State Aid (P.L.2019, c.445) account, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the School Breakfast and Lunch State Aid (P.L.2019, c.445) account is appropriated for the same purpose. Department of Agriculture, Total State Appropriation $178,707,000 Summary of Department of Agriculture Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services .......................................... $13,223,000 Grants-in-Aid .................................................... $94,318,000 State Aid ............................................................. $71,166,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund .................................................... $107,541,000 Property Tax Relief Fund ................................. $71,166,000 14  DEPARTMENT OF BANKING AND INSURANCE 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 52 Economic Regulation DIRECT STATE SERVICES 01-3110 Consumer Protection Services and Solvency Regulation $18,934,000 02-3120 Actuarial Services $15,350,000 03-3130 Regulation of the Real Estate Industry $3,680,000 04-3110 Public Affairs, Legislative and Regulatory Services $2,322,000 06-3110 Bureau of Fraud Deterrence $23,146,000 07-3170 Supervision and Examination of Financial Institutions $4,159,000 99-3150 Administration and Support Services $7,672,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Economic Regulation $75,263,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($43,970,000) Materials and Supplies ($384,000) Services Other Than Personal ($7,059,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($487,000) Special Purpose: 01 Rate Counsel - Insurance ($149,000) 02 Actuarial Services ($318,000) 02 Health Insurance Affordability Fund ($10,000,000) 06 Insurance Fraud Prosecution Services ($12,896,000) The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Public Adjusters' Licensing account, together with receipts from the "Public Adjusters' Licensing Act," P.L.1993, c.66 (C.17:22B-1 et seq.), are appropriated for the administration of the act, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Division of Actuarial Services, there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be required for deposit into the New Jersey Health Insurance Premium Security Fund for the purpose of reimbursing insurance providers in accordance with the provisions of P.L.2018, c.24 (C.17B:27A-10.1 et seq.), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in order to prevent unnecessary loss of health insurance coverage by individuals and families upon the termination of federal pandemic benefits and to effectuate the timely and efficient transition of individuals and families from temporary Medicaid/CHIP coverage, as provided under the Families First Coronavirus Response Act (FFCRA), to longer--term coverage under the State--based exchange, in addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Health Insurance Affordability Fund, there are appropriated such additional amounts as determined by the Commissioner of the Department of Banking and Insurance, subject to approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, for deposit into the Health Insurance Affordability Fund for the purpose of providing subsidies for enrollment of health insurance coverage through the State--based exchange to those individuals and families whose temporary Medicaid coverage was terminated. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Division of Actuarial Services, the amount necessary to pay for the audit of reinsurance claims or any other administrative costs incurred by the Department of Banking and Insurance to meet the statutory requirements of P.L.2018, c.24 (C.17B:27A-10.1 et seq.) is appropriated from the New Jersey Health Insurance Premium Security Fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Health Insurance Affordability Fund, there are appropriated such additional amounts as determined by the Commissioner of the Department of Banking and Insurance, subject to approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, to provide subsidies, in such amounts to be determined by the Commissioner, in order to enable the purchase of qualified health plans for children without regard to their immigration status. There are appropriated from the assessments imposed by the New Jersey Individual Health Coverage Program Board, created pursuant to P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-2 et seq.), and by the New Jersey Small Employer Health Benefits Program Board, created pursuant to P.L.1992, c.162 (C.17B:27A-17 et seq.), those amounts as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of those acts, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from the investigation of out-of-state land sales are appropriated for the conduct of those investigations. Proceeds from the sale of credits by the Pinelands Development Credit Bank pursuant to P.L.1985, c.310 (C.13:18A-30 et seq.) are appropriated to the Pinelands Development Credit Bank to administer the "Pinelands Development Credit Bank Act."  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Pinelands Development Credit Bank is appropriated to administer the operations of the bank. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated, such other amounts, as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine, are appropriated from the assessments of the insurance industry pursuant to P.L.1995, c.156 (C.17:1C-19 et seq.) and from the assessments of the banking and consumer finance industries pursuant to P.L.2005, c.199 (C.17:1C-33 et seq.) for the purpose of implementing the requirements of those statutes. Receipts in excess of anticipated revenues from licensing fees, bank assessments, fines and penalties, and the unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year, not to exceed $400,000, are appropriated to the Division of Banking, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There are appropriated from the Real Estate Guaranty Fund such sums as may be necessary to pay claims. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Division of Insurance accounts is payable from receipts from the Special Purpose Assessment of insurance companies pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1995, c.156 (C.17:1C-20). If the Special Purpose Assessment cap calculation is less than the amount hereinabove appropriated for this purpose for the Division of Insurance, the appropriation shall be reduced to the level of funding supported by the Special Purpose Assessment cap calculation. Department of Banking and Insurance, Total State Appropriation $75,263,000 Summary of Department of Banking and Insurance Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services ....................................... $75,263,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund .................................................. $75,263,000 16  DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND FAMILIES 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 55  Social Services Programs DIRECT STATE SERVICES 01-1610 Child Protection and Permanency $334,789,000 02-1620 Children's System of Care $2,011,000 03-1630 Family and Community Partnerships $31,974,000 04-1600 Education Services $14,943,000 05-1600 Office of Training and Professional Development $6,077,000 06-1600 Safety and Security Services $3,775,000 99-1600 Administration and Support Services $56,674,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Social Services Programs $450,243,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($293,317,000) Materials and Supplies ($1,585,000) Services Other Than Personal ($26,750,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($19,215,000) Special Purpose: 01 Staffing and Oversight Review Subcommittee ($550,000) 01 Supportive Visitation Services ($9,800,000) 01 Keeping Families Together ($17,620,000) 01 Peer Recovery Support Services ($4,664,000) 01 Child Collaborative Mental Health Care Pilot Program ($12,840,000) 02 Suicide Prevention - Project Connect ($92,000) 03 Statewide Universal Newborn Home Nurse Visitation Program ($23,085,000) 03 Youth Mental Health Outreach - Mental Health Mobile  Application ($1,000,000) 03 Domestic Violence Housing Support ($6,000,000) 05 NJ Partnership for Public Child Welfare ($3,381,000) 06 Safety and Security Services ($3,775,000) 99 Information Technology ($1,524,000) 99 Safety and Permanency in the Courts ($25,045,000) Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Salaries and Wages for the Office of Training and Professional Development, such amounts as may be necessary shall be used to train the Department of Children and Families' staff who serve children and families in the field, who have not already received training in cultural competency.  The Department of Children and Families shall also offer training opportunities in cultural competency to staff of community-based organizations serving children and families under contract to the Department of Children and Families. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Safety and Permanency in the Courts, an amount not to exceed $25,045,000 shall be reimbursed to the Department of Law and Public Safety and is appropriated for legal services implementing the approved child welfare settlement with the federal court, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In order to permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations and ensure the timely payment of claims to providers of medical services, amounts as may be determined by the Commissioner of Children and Families may be transferred to the Supportive Visitation Services account from the Purchase of Social Services, Family Support Services, and Foster Care and Permanency Initiative accounts in the Division of Child Protection and Permanency for the purpose of funding Supportive Visitation Services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Statewide Universal Newborn Home Nurse Visitation Program is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 01-1610 Child Protection and Permanency $374,980,000 02-1620 Children's System of Care $505,784,000 03-1630 Family and Community Partnerships $158,839,000 99-1600 Administration and Support Services $5,766,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Social Services Programs $1,045,369,000 Grants-in-Aid: 01 Substance Use Disorder Services ($10,787,000) 01 Court Appointed Special Advocates ($4,175,000) 01 Child Advocacy Center - Multidisciplinary Team Fund ($7,865,000) 01 Independent Living and Shelter Care ($12,771,000) 01 Out-of-Home Placements ($5,324,000) 01 Family Support Services ($69,953,000) 01 Child Abuse Prevention ($12,324,000) 01 Foster Care ($40,188,000) 01 Subsidized Adoption ($126,520,000) 01 Audrey Hepburn Children's House Regional Diagnostic Treatment Center ($535,000) 01 Child Treatment Assistance Fund ($5,000,000) 01 Foster Care and Permanency Initiative ($7,009,000) 01 New Jersey Homeless Youth Act ($1,627,000) 01 Wynona M. Lipman Child Advocacy Center, Essex County ($575,000) 01 Purchase of Social Services ($55,197,000) 01 Child Health Units ($15,130,000) 02 Care Management Organizations ($118,444,000) 02 Out-of-Home Treatment Services ($148,587,000) 02 Family Support Services ($45,967,000) 02 Mobile Response ($35,398,000) 02 Intensive In-Home Behavioral Assistance ($89,985,000) 02 Youth Incentive Program ($1,814,000) 02 Outpatient ($10,689,000) 02 Contracted Systems Administrator ($11,519,000) 02 State Children's Health Insurance Program - Care Management Organizations ($2,691,000) 02 State Children's Health Insurance Program - Out-of-Home Treatment Services ($5,229,000) 02 State Children's Health Insurance Program - Mobile Response ($1,245,000) 02 State Children's Health Insurance Program - In-Home Behavioral Assistance ($3,455,000) 02 Mental Health Association of Essex and Morris, Inc. - Riskin Children's Center ($161,000) 02 Society for Prevention of Teen Suicide - Mental Health Toolkits ($600,000) 03 Early Childhood Services ($6,132,000) 03 School Linked Services Program ($39,014,000) 03 Family Support Services ($18,810,000) 03 Project S.A.R.A.H. ($214,000) 03 Sexual Violence Prevention and Intervention Services ($3,531,000) 03 Latino Action Network Hispanic Women's Resource Center ($3,070,000) 03 My Sister's Lighthouse - Domestic Violence ($214,000) 03 Garden State Equality ($428,000) 03 Jersey Battered Women's Services - Morris County ($214,000) 03 Essex County Family Justice Center ($268,000) 03 Partnership for Maternal and Child Health of Northern New Jersey - Essex County ($252,000) 03 New Jersey Statewide Student Support Services (NJ4S) ($43,000,000) 03 180 Turning Lives Around ($150,000) 03 Central Intake Hubs ($2,247,000) 03 Family Connects NJ Nurse Tuition Assistance Program ($213,000) 03 Abuse Intervention Program ($4,218,000) 03 Domestic Violence Services ($25,596,000) 03 Sexual Violence Services ($5,070,000) 03 Kooth Digital Health ($1,450,000) 03 Early Childhood Specialist ($1,050,000) 99 Direct Support Professionals Wage Increase ($5,766,000) 03 HomeFront NJ - Diaper Access Expansion Pilot Program ($250,000) 03 Nassan's Place - Autism Services Community Center ($500,000) 03 New Ephesus Community Services Corporation - Transitional Housing Project for Teenage Girls ($500,000) 03 Roselle First Community Development Corporation - Youth Services Programs ($100,000) 03 Womens Rights Information Center ($160,000) 03 Women 2 Women, Shehzori House ($62,000) 03 Center for Great Expectations ($1,000,000) 03 The Stephanie Nicole Parze Foundation ($50,000) 03 Hudson SPEAKS - Bolo Behen Project ($76,000) 02 Mental Health Initiatives ($30,000,000) 03 Insite Health - Digital Adolescent Mental Health Hybrid Pilot Program ($1,000,000) Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Child Advocacy Center - Multidisciplinary Team Fund, $750,000 shall be allocated to the New Jersey Childrens Alliance to assist in the implementation of P.L.2017, c.90 (C.9:6-8.107 et seq.) to provide support, guidance, and training to centers applying to the Department of Children and Families for grants in order to become certified as Child Advocacy Centers. Further, of the amounts appropriated, $2,100,000 shall be allocated to support the hiring of a case manager at each countys Child Advocacy Center to connect victims with services and ensure coordination and case referrals between Child Advocacy Centers, Regional Diagnostic Treatment Centers, and law enforcement for non-parental abuse cases. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Independent Living and Shelter Care program, $234,000 shall be used to support the housing needs of transition-age youth, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Out-of-Home Placements, Independent Living and Shelter Care, Foster Care, Subsidized Adoption, and Family Support Services are available for the payment of obligations applicable to prior fiscal years. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for Foster Care, Subsidized Adoption, and Independent Living and Shelter Care are subject to the following condition: any change by the Department of Children and Families in the rates paid for these programs shall be approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In order to permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations and ensure the timely processing of payments, amounts may be transferred among the following accounts within the Division of Child Protection and Permanency: Independent Living and Shelter Care, Out-of-Home Placements, Family Support Services, Foster Care, and Subsidized Adoption.  All such transfers are subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Foster Care, Subsidized Adoption, Independent Living and Shelter Care, Out-of-Home Placements, and Family Support Services in the Division of Child Protection and Permanency, such additional amounts as may be necessary to support increased trend costs, as determined by the Commissioner of the Department of Children and Families, are appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated in the Out-of-Home Placements account is subject to the following condition: amounts that become available as a result of the return of persons from in-State and out-of-State residential placements to community programs within the State may be transferred from the Residential Placements account to the appropriate Child Protection and Permanency account, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Purchase of Social Services account, $1,000,000 is appropriated for the programs administered under the "New Jersey Homeless Youth Act," P.L.1999, c.224 (C.9:12A-2 et seq.), and the Division of Child Protection and Permanency shall prioritize the expenditure of this allocation to address transitional living services in the division's region that is experiencing the most severe over-capacity. Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Purchase of Social Services, an amount as specified in the Memorandum of Agreement between the Department of Children and Families and the Division of Family Development in the Department of Human Services shall be transferred to the Division of Family Development in the Department of Human Services to fund the Post Adoption Child Care Program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Funds recovered under P.L.1951, c.138 (C.30:4C-1 et seq.) during the current fiscal year are appropriated for resource families and other out-of-home placements. Receipts from counties for persons under the care and supervision of the Division of Child Protection and Permanency are appropriated for the purpose of providing State Aid to the counties, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In order to permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations and ensure the timely payment of claims to providers of medical services, amounts may be transferred among accounts in the Children's System of Care program classification. Amounts may also be transferred to and from various items of appropriation within the General Medical Services program classification of the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services in the Department of Human Services and the Children's System of Care program classification in the Department of Children and Families. All such transfers are subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notice of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accountings approval shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no funds hereinabove appropriated for Out-of-Home Treatment Services, Care Management Organizations, Youth Incentive Program, Intensive In-Home Behavioral Assistance, Family Support Services, except those services provided pursuant to the "Family Support Act," P.L.1993, c.98 (C.30:6D-33 et seq.), and Mobile Response shall be expended for any individual served by Children's System of Care, with the exception of court-ordered placements or to ensure services necessary to prevent risk of harm to the individual or others, unless that individual makes a full and complete application for NJ FamilyCare. Individuals receiving services from appropriations covered by the exceptions above shall apply for NJ FamilyCare in a timely manner, as shall be defined by the Commissioner of Children and Families, after receiving services. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Care Management Organizations, Out-of-Home Treatment Services, Family Support Services, Mobile Response, Intensive In-Home Behavioral Assistance, Youth Incentive Program, Outpatient, and Contracted Systems Administrator in the Division of Childrens System of Care, such additional amounts as may be necessary to support increased trend costs, as determined by the Commissioner of the Department of Children and Families, are appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Early Childhood Services, an amount as specified in the Memorandum of Agreement between the Department of Children and Families and the Division of Family Development in the Department of Human Services shall be transferred to the Division of Family Development in the Department of Human Services to fund the Strengthening Families Initiative Training Program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Abuse Intervention Program, $3,000,000 shall be allocated to expand abuse/batterer intervention programming into all 21 counties, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amount appropriated for the School Linked Services Program, $1,000,000 is appropriated to increase each existing service providers base contract in equal proportions. Each site funded under this initiative will continue to provide the initiatives traditional core services including: mental health counseling, substance abuse counseling, education and prevention; health awareness and prevention; academic support/tutoring; positive youth development activities, service learning activities; recreational activities; and information and referral services. Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the School Linked Services Program, there shall be available $400,000 for the After School Reading Initiative, $200,000 for the After School Start-Up Fund, $400,000 for School Health Clinics, and $530,000 for Positive Youth Development. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Central Intake Hubs, an equal amount of funding shall be allocated to the Central Intake Hub in each of the 21 counties for a case management specialist for follow-up, outreach, and family case management for families with young children who need support to connect to resources, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Family Connects NJ Nurse Tuition Assistance Program shall be used to provide tuition assistance, clinical placement, and training grants to students pursuing a bachelor of science degree in nursing, subject to the condition that grant recipients commit to participating in the Family Connects NJ program, in accordance with criteria established by the Commissioner of Children and Families and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Domestic Violence Services, the amounts allocated to the domestic violence agencies in the State and to the New Jersey Coalition to End Domestic Violence shall be no less than the amounts allocated for the 12-month accounting period ending June 30, 2021, plus an additional $6,000,000 to strengthen and expand domestic violence services Statewide, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, receipts from the increases in divorce filing fees enacted by section 41 of P.L.2003, c.117 (N.J.S.22A:2-12), are appropriated for transfer to the General Fund as general State revenue, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts in the Marriage and Civil Union License Fee Fund in excess of the amount anticipated are appropriated for domestic violence prevention services. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Sexual Violence Services, the amount allocated to the 21 county-based sexual violence service organizations and the New Jersey Coalition Against Sexual Assault shall be no less than the amounts allocated for fiscal year 2019, plus an additional $2,000,000 to these sexual violence service organizations, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Sexual Violence Services, an amount not to exceed $6,000,000 is appropriated to provide a grant to the New Jersey Coalition Against Sexual Assault to offset potential losses in federal funding and to strengthen and expand sexual violence prevention and response services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in order to provide flexibility in the handling of appropriations, amounts may be transferred among the Abuse Intervention Program, Domestic Violence Services and Sexual Violence Services accounts, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division on Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Domestic Violence Services, an amount not to exceed $2,550,000 is appropriated to the Displaced Homemaker program from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund established pursuant to section 9 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-9), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, from the amounts hereinabove appropriated to the Department of Children and Families, the Commissioner of Children and Families, in collaboration with the Commissioner of Education and the Commissioner of Human Services, shall establish a school-based mental health and substance use service program in one or more school districts that provides integrated behavioral health services to Medicaid eligible students; provided, however, that in order to ensure continuity of federal funding, prior to the establishment of such program, the Commissioner shall seek and obtain confirmation, under the DHS 1115 waiver authority, that the program will comply with all applicable federal Medicaid and other requirements. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Family Support Services, $1,250,000 shall be allocated to increase day and overnight camp reimbursement rates for children with intellectual and developmental disabilities within the Childrens System of Care. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Care Management Organizations, $22,000,000 shall be used to provide a percentage basis rate increase for Childrens System of Care Medicaid-based fee-for-service contracts and cost reimbursement contracts for residential treatment, outpatient treatment, partial hospitalization and partial care treatment, in-community care and intensive in-home behavioral assistance, mobile response, or care management, in order to facilitate and sustain a robust network of providers responding to the current and ongoing youth mental health crisis. The amount appropriated for Mental Health Initiatives shall be used to support and expand the mental health workforce and to provide mental health services to children and adolescents, as well as to individuals in professions that have been disproportionately impacted by the COVID-19 pandemic, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Department of Children and Families, Total State Appropriation $1,495,612,000 Summary of Department of Children and Families Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services ........................................ $450,243,000 Grants-in-Aid ................................................... $1,045,369,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund .................................................... $1,495,612,000 22  DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS 40 Community Development and Environmental Management 41  Community Development Management DIRECT STATE SERVICES 01-8010 Housing Code Enforcement $10,387,000 02-8020 Housing Services $17,989,000 06-8015 Uniform Construction Code $16,775,000 10-8022 Division of Disaster Recovery and Mitigation $1,000,000 13-8027 Codes and Standards $559,000 18-8017 Uniform Fire Code $8,075,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Community Development Management $54,785,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($34,727,000) Materials and Supplies ($86,000) Services Other Than Personal ($562,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($102,000) Special Purpose: 02 Winter Termination Program (P.L.2021, c.317) ($3,500,000) 02 Office of Eviction Prevention ($5,000,000) 02 Office of Homelessness Prevention ($4,750,000) 02 Affordable Housing ($1,805,000) 02 Local Planning Services ($1,378,000) 02 Main Street New Jersey ($1,500,000) 10 Disaster Recovery and Mitigation ($1,000,000) 18 Local Fire Fighters' Training ($375,000) The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Housing Code Enforcement program classification is payable out of the fees and penalties derived from bureau activities.  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year, together with any receipts in excess of the amounts anticipated, is appropriated for expenses of code enforcement activities, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  If the receipts are less than anticipated, the appropriation shall be reduced proportionately. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, receipts appropriated from the Department of Community Affairs' code enforcement activities in excess of the amount anticipated and in excess of the amounts required to support the code enforcement activity for which they were collected may be transferred as necessary to cover shortfalls in other Department of Community Affairs' code enforcement accounts, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, receipts from the additional fee established by section 10 of P.L.2003, c.311 (C.52:27D-437.10) are appropriated to the Housing Code Enforcement program classification for expenses of code enforcement activities, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Uniform Construction Code program classification is payable out of the fees and penalties derived from code enforcement activities.  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year, together with any receipts in excess of the amounts anticipated, is appropriated for expenses of code enforcement activities, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  If the receipts are less than anticipated, the appropriation shall be reduced proportionately. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in "The Planned Real Estate Development Full Disclosure Act," P.L.1977, c.419 (C.45:22A-21 et seq.) fees account, together with any receipts in excess of the amount anticipated, is appropriated for code enforcement activities, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amounts received by the Uniform Construction Code Revolving Fund attributable to that portion of the surcharge fee in excess of $0.0006, and to surcharges on other construction, shall be dedicated to the general support of the Uniform Construction Code program and, notwithstanding the provisions of section 2 of P.L.1979, c.121 (C.52:27D-124.1), shall be available for training and non-training purposes.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Uniform Construction Code Revolving Fund are appropriated for expenses of code enforcement activities. Such amounts as may be required for the registration of builders and reviewing and paying claims under "The New Home Warranty and Builders' Registration Act," P.L.1977, c.467 (C.46:3B-1 et seq.), are appropriated from the New Home Warranty Security Fund in accordance with section 7 of P.L.1977, c.467 (C.46:3B-7), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Uniform Fire Code program classification is payable out of the fees and penalties derived from code enforcement activities.  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year, together with any receipts in excess of the amounts anticipated, is appropriated for expenses of code enforcement activities, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  If the receipts are less than anticipated, the appropriation shall be reduced proportionately. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Division of Fire Safety may transfer within its own division among Direct State Services appropriations accounts and Grants-In-Aid appropriations accounts, such amounts as are necessary for expenses of code enforcement activities, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, receipts from fees associated with the Fire Protection Contractor's Certification program pursuant to P.L.2001, c.289 (C.52:27D-25n et seq.), are appropriated to the Department of Community Affairs Division of Fire Safety, in such amounts as are necessary to operate the program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Main Street New Jersey shall be used to provide technical assistance and other tools to promote historic preservation and recovery of economic viability in localities that contain traditional historic business districts including, but not limited to, training, guidance, and seminars for volunteers and managers of local organizations, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Division of Housing and Community Resources may transfer between the Affordable Housing State Aid appropriations account, the Local Planning Services Direct State Services appropriations account and the Affordable Housing Direct State Services appropriations account, such amounts as are necessary, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall provide written notice of such a transfer to the Joint Budget Oversight Committee within 10 working days of making such a transfer. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Disaster Recovery and Mitigation account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Any receipts from the Boarding Home Regulation and Assistance program, including fees, fines, and penalties, are appropriated for the Boarding Home Regulation and Assistance program. Pursuant to section 15 of P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-15), the Commissioner of Community Affairs shall determine, at least annually, the eligibility of each boarding house resident for rental assistance payments; and notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-1 et seq.) to the contrary, moneys held in the "Boarding House Rental Assistance Fund" that were originally appropriated from the General Fund may be used by the commissioner for the purpose of providing life safety improvement loans, and any moneys held in the "Boarding House Rental Assistance Fund" may be used for the purpose of providing rental assistance for repayment of such loans.  Notwithstanding any provision of P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-1 et seq.), the commissioner shall have authority to disburse funds from the "Boarding House Rental Assistance Fund" established pursuant to section 14 of P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-14) for the purpose of repaying, through rental assistance or otherwise, loans made to the boarding house owners for the purpose of rehabilitating boarding houses. There is appropriated from the Urban and Rural Centers Unsafe Buildings Demolition Revolving Loan Fund established under P.L.1997, c.125 the sum of $651,899, to be used for the demolition and disposal of projects in the City of Salem. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Affordable Housing (P.L.2024, c.2) account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  Such additional amounts as may be required to effectuate P.L.2024 ,c.2, as determined by the Commissioner of Community Affairs, are appropriated to the Affordable Housing (P.L.2024, c.2) account, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 01-8010 Housing Code Enforcement $919,000 02-8020 Housing Services $61,210,000 18-8017 Uniform Fire Code $8,571,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Community Development Management $70,700,000 Grants-in-Aid: 01 Cooperative Housing Inspection ($919,000) 02 NJ Community Capital Foreclosure Mitigation Program ($1,500,000) 02 Single Family Home Lead Hazard Remediation Fund ($4,000,000) 02 Newark Homeless Housing Program ($2,400,000) 02 Down Payment Assistance Fund ($15,000,000) 02 Shelter Assistance ($2,300,000) 02 Prevention of Homelessness ($4,360,000) 02 Hudson County Housing First Pilot Program ($500,000) 02 Camden Coalition of Health Care Providers Housing First Pilot Program ($250,000) 02 State Rental Assistance Program ($18,500,000) 02 Lead-Safe Home Renovation Pilot Program ($5,000,000) 02 State Rental Assistance Pilot for Expecting Mothers ($2,000,000) 02 Lead Programs (P.L.2021, c.182) ($3,900,000) 18 Uniform Fire Code - Local Enforcement Agency Rebates ($8,425,000) 18 Uniform Fire Code - Continuing Education ($146,000) 02 New Jersey Coalition to End Homelessness - Staff and Retention ($1,500,000) There is appropriated to the Revolving Housing Development and Demonstration Grant Fund an amount not to exceed 50% of the penalties derived from bureau activities in the Housing Code Enforcement program classification, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Housing Code Enforcement program classification is payable out of the fees and penalties derived from bureau activities.  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year, together with any receipts in excess of the amounts anticipated, is appropriated for expenses of code enforcement activities, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  If the receipts are less than anticipated, the appropriation shall be reduced proportionately. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Uniform Fire Code program classification is payable out of the fees and penalties derived from code enforcement activities.  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year, together with any receipts in excess of the amounts anticipated, is appropriated for expenses of code enforcement activities, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  If the receipts are less than anticipated, the appropriation shall be reduced proportionately. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, $26,500,000 is appropriated from the "New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund" to assist homeless and housing-unstable military veterans in finding new long- and short-term housing and stabilizing military veterans' existing housing, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Such amounts as the Commissioner of Community Affairs determines are necessary are appropriated from the "New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund", to be pledged as a match for the USHUD HOME Investment Partnership Program to ensure adherence to the federal matching requirements for affordable housing production, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. An amount not to exceed $400,000 is appropriated from the "New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund" as determined by the Commissioner of Community Affairs as necessary to match, on a 50/50 basis, the federal share of the administrative costs of the USHUD Community Development Block Grant-Small Cities Program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there is appropriated from the "New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund" an amount to be determined by the Commissioner of Community Affairs to be used to provide technical assistance grants to non-profit housing organizations and authorities for creating and supporting affordable housing and community development opportunities, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Commissioner of Community Affairs may determine that monies appropriated from the "New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund" can be provided directly to the housing project being assisted; provided, however, that any such project has the support by resolution of the governing body of the municipality in which it is located; and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there are appropriated monies from the New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund in an amount to be determined by the Commissioner of Community Affairs to the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency for deposit in the Affordable Housing Production Fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, an amount not to exceed $2,000,000 from the New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund is appropriated to implement a transitional housing pilot program in Atlantic City as determined by the Commissioner of Community Affairs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Lead-Safe Home Renovation Pilot Program, the Single Family Home Lead Hazard Remediation Fund, and Lead Programs (P.L.2021, c.182) such amounts as are necessary may be transferred to the Revolving Housing Development and Demonstration Grant Fund for the purpose of remediating lead in dwellings Statewide, and such amounts as are determined by the State Treasurer to be necessary may be transferred to the Division of Family Health Services in the Department of Health for purposes in accordance with N.J.A.C.8:51-1.1 et seq., subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Down Payment Assistance Fund, together with  $17,000,000 appropriated from the New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund, are appropriated to the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency for a Down Payment and Closing Cost Assistance Program to provide down payment and closing cost assistance, including but not limited to mortgage insurance assistance, escrows, pre--paid costs, and interest rate reductions, to assist in stabilizing neighborhoods through owner--occupancy and providing home ownership opportunities to households that would otherwise remain tenants, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Upon determination by the Commissioner of Community Affairs that all eligible shelter assistance projects have received funding, any available balance in the Shelter Assistance account may be transferred to the Affordable Housing account, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for Shelter Assistance, Prevention of Homelessness, State Rental Assistance Program, and State Rental Assistance Pilot for Expecting Mothers program shall be payable from the receipts of the portion of the realty transfer fee directed to be credited to the "New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund" pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1968, c.49 (C.46:15-8) and from the receipts of the portion of the realty transfer fee directed to be credited to the "New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund" pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1975, c.176 (C.46:15-10.1), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. If the receipts are less than anticipated, the appropriation shall be reduced proportionately. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, such amounts as are necessary shall be available from the Prevention of Homelessness Grants-In-Aid appropriation for program administrative expenses, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from repayment of loans from the Downtown Business Improvement Loan Fund, together with the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year of such loan fund and any interest thereon, are appropriated for the purposes of P.L.1998, c.115 (C.40:56-71.1 et seq.). The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the State Rental Assistance Program account is appropriated for the expenses of the State Rental Assistance Program. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, Revolving Housing Development and Demonstration Grant funds are appropriated to support loans and grants to non-profit entities for the purpose of economic development and historic preservation. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the State Rental Assistance Program (SRAP), an amount not less than $20,000,000 is appropriated from the "New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund" to SRAP for the purposes of subsections a. and c. of section 1 of P.L.2004, c.140 (C.52:27D-287.1). Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, $800,000 is appropriated from the New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund for HMFA Foreclosure Mediation Assistance Program Counseling, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. STATE AID 02-8020 Housing Services $5,000,000 Total State Aid Appropriation, Community Development Management $5,000,000 State Aid: 02 Neighborhood Preservation (P.L.1975, c.248 and c.249) ($5,000,000) The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Relocation Assistance account, not to exceed $250,000, is appropriated for the expenses of the Relocation Assistance program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, such amounts as may be required to fund relocation costs of boarding home residents are appropriated from the "Boarding House Rental Assistance Fund." 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 55  Social Services Programs DIRECT STATE SERVICES 05-8050 Community Resources $300,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Social Services Programs $300,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($226,000) Services Other Than Personal ($24,000) Special Purpose: 05 Wealth Disparity Taskforce ($50,000) The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Financial Empowerment Pilot Program (P.L.2021, c.321) account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Additional funds as may be allocated by the federal government for New Jersey's Low Income Home Energy Assistance Block Grant Program (LIHEAP) are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 05-8050 Community Resources $82,064,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Social Services Programs $82,064,000 Grants-in-Aid: 05 New Jersey Black Issues Convention - Community Programs ($100,000) 05 Shri Krishna Nidhi Foundation ($100,000) 05 Life Changing Experiences ($400,000) 05 United Way of Northern New Jersey - United in Care ($850,000) 05 Toni's Kitchen, Montclair ($250,000) 05 Friendship Circle of New Jersey - LifeTown, Livingston ($500,000) 05 Shelia Y. Oliver Civic Association ($500,000) 05 South Amboy Broadway Business District Parking Lot Acquisition and Development ($850,000) 05 Atlantic County Economic Alliance ($1,850,000) 05 South Amboy Veterans' Memorial Plaza ($50,000) 05 Recreation for the Handicapped ($585,000) 05 Interfaith Neighbors, Asbury Park - Meals on Wheels ($13,000) 05 Monmouth County SPCA ($150,000) 05 Jewish Federation of Greater Metro West - Community-Based Anti-Hate Initiative ($20,000) 05 NJSHARES - S.M.A.R.T. Program ($5,500,000) 05 NJ Community Development Corporation Youth Center Project, Paterson ($5,125,000) 05 Newark Museum ($1,500,000) 05 City of Newark - Mayor's Brick City Peace Collective ($2,500,000) 05 Big Brothers and Big Sisters State Association ($1,000,000) 05 International Youth Organization ($125,000) 05 Transition Professionals Re-Entry Services ($263,000) 05 Hudson County Reentry Pilot Program ($7,000,000) 05 United Way of Northern New Jersey - Volunteer Income Tax Preparation Assistance ($750,000) 05 Mercer County Reentry Pilot Program ($500,000) 05 Re-entry Coalition of New Jersey ($1,000,000) 05 Wind of Spirit - ESL ($45,000) 05 Community Food Bank of New Jersey and Alliance of Boys and Girls Clubs Pilot ($150,000) 05 Communities in Cooperation - Reentry Services ($500,000) 05 Woodbridge Cypress Center Park Expansion ($500,000) 05 Jerry Ust Recreation Complex Capital Improvements ($500,000) 05 Propagation House at Mapleton Preserve - Kingston ($200,000) 05 Jump Start Youth Development - Paterson ($200,000) 05 Hackensack Meadowlands Municipal Committee of Mayors ($63,000) 05 Camden County Historical Society ($63,000) 05 Bergen Family Center - Mental Health Services ($50,000) 05 Bergen Volunteers - Mentoring Program ($50,000) 05 Community Affairs and Resource Center ($25,000) 05 Horizons at the Jersey Shore ($25,000) 05 Youth Advocate Programs Inc. ($2,000,000) 05 New Jersey YMCA State Alliance ($250,000) 05 First Star New Jersey ($300,000) 05 Community YMCA - Counseling and Social Services ($50,000) 05 Jewish Family Service of Central NJ - Retired and Senior Volunteer Program from Union County ($25,000) 05 State Troopers Fraternal Association ($50,000) 05 Monmouth Beach Beautification Committee ($25,000) 05 Newark Alliance - Hire Buy Live ($250,000) 05 Newark Public Library - Newark City of Learning Collaborative ($100,000) 05 "I Have a Dream" Foundation - New Jersey ($175,000) 05 Willingboro Community Center ($500,000) 05 After School Initiative - Burlington County ($500,000) 05 Statewide Hispanic Chamber of Commerce of New Jersey ($250,000) 05 HomeFront NJ ($250,000) 05 Joseph's House, Camden ($600,000) 05 Special Olympics ($605,000) 05 New Jersey Re-entry Corporation - One-Stop Offender Re-entry Services ($12,600,000) 05 Volunteers of America - Re-entry Services ($7,400,000) 05 Boys and Girls Clubs of New Jersey - At Risk Youth ($1,050,000) 05 Garden State Equality - Childhood Resiliency Initiatives ($2,000,000) 05 United Way of Northern New Jersey - ALICE Recovery Fund ($250,000) 05 Greater Somerset County YMCA -  Community Center, Franklin Township ($750,000) 05 Newark Public Library - New Jersey Hispanic Research and Information Center ($375,000) 05 Asbury Park Police Athletic League - Operating Costs ($250,000) 05 Rising Tide Capital ($1,000,000) 05 United Way of Passaic County - Volunteer Income Tax Preparation Assistance ($131,000) 05 Trenton Youth Wrestling and Learning Center - Capital Construction ($200,000) 05 The Partnership of Urban League Affiliates of New Jersey ($500,000) 05 St. Joseph's Home Convent, Woodbridge - Capital Repairs ($200,000) 05 Jewish Community Center of Middlesex County - Capital Improvements ($250,000) 05 National Forum for Black Public Administrators - New Jersey Chapter ($100,000) 05 New Jersey YMCA State Alliance - Local Swimming Lesson Programs ($200,000) 05 Manna from Heaven, Bridgeton ($250,000) 05 Union Township Community Action Organization - Early Childhood Education Programs ($100,000) 05 Union County Fatherhood Initiative Coalition ($100,000) 05 Josephine's Place ($100,000) 05 Asian Americans and Pacific Islanders (AAPI) of New Jersey - Statewide Community Services ($300,000) 05 Passaic County Affordable Housing Corporation - Veteran and Senior Housing Complex ($500,000) 05 Trenton Area Soup Kitchen - Food Security Hub ($500,000) 05 Eid Committee of New Jersey - Community Engagement Initiative ($50,000) 05 United Way of Greater Union County, Elizabeth ($750,000) 05 Urban League of Essex County - Literacy Center ($150,000) 05 North Hunterdon Youth Baseball and Softball League - Jericho Road Field Repairs ($100,000) 05 United Desi of New Jersey - Cultural Programming ($53,000) 05 Sikh American Legal Defense and Education Fund ($25,000) 05 The Kintock Group - Re-entry Services ($2,000,000) 05 Give Chances Inc. - After School Programming ($49,000) 05 Asian Women's Christian Association - Social Services ($49,000) 05 Indo-American Senior Citizens' Association of Hudson County - Capital Repairs ($60,000) 05 Vailsburg Rescue Squad - Ambulance and Insurance Costs ($140,000) 05 Urban League of Union County, Elizabeth - Social Services ($100,000) 05 Asbury Park Tennis Initiative ($100,000) 05 Where Angels Play Foundation, Oakhurst ($100,000) 05 Meal at Noon, Long Branch - Operating Aid ($50,000) 05 Garden State Equality - Venus Xtravaganza House ($400,000) 05 Fulfill Food Bank, Neptune - Operating Aid ($100,000) 05 Interfaith Neighbors - Social Services ($100,000) 05 Boys and Girls Clubs of Monmouth County - Programming Support ($100,000) 05 Parents with a Plan - Operating Aid ($100,000) 05 Soup Kitchen 411 ($100,000) 05 Trinity Center for Community, Asbury Park - Code Blue Support ($75,000) 05 Wooden Walls Public Art Project, Asbury Park ($50,000) 05 Asbury Park Arts Council - Programming Support ($50,000) 05 InfoAge Science and History Museums, Wall - Information Technology Exhibits ($100,000) 05 United Way of Monmouth and Ocean Counties - Operating Aid ($100,000) 05 Volunteer Guardianship One on One, Inc., Flemington - Social Services ($50,000) 05 Stew Leonard III Water Safety Foundation - Swim School, Clifton ($300,000) 05 Community Access Unlimited, Elizabeth - Low-Income Housing Construction ($1,000,000) 05 Puerto Rican Unity for Progress, Camden - Operating Aid ($100,000) 05 Young Adults Can Achieve, Elmwood Park ($100,000) 05 Trenton Restorative Street Team - Social Services ($1,000,000) 05 ShoreTown Ballpark Improvements ($4,200,000) 05 Orthodox Jewish Chamber of Commerce - Networking Events and Exposition ($50,000) 05 Hatzolah of Linden - Ambulance Acquisition for Community Service Continuity ($25,000) 05 Common Good Coalition, Inc. ($100,000) 05 Boys and Girls Club of Atlantic City (BGCAC) - Teen Workforce Development Programs ($1,200,000) Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Special Olympics program, an amount not to exceed $75,000 may be allocated for the administrative costs of the program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for New Jersey Re-entry Corporation - One-Stop Offender Re-entry Services shall be utilized to continue to provide One-Stop Re-entry services in Newark, Jersey City, Paterson, and Toms River and in the counties of Bergen, Union, Middlesex, Somerset, and Monmouth, which shall include medication-assisted treatment for relapse prevention. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Volunteers of America - Re-entry Services shall be utilized to provide expanded re-entry services in the counties of Atlantic, Burlington, Camden, Cape May, Gloucester, Cumberland, Mercer, and Salem, which shall include medication-assisted treatment for relapse prevention. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.2003, c.311 (C.52:27D-437.1 et al.), or any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the "Lead Hazard Control Assistance Fund" is payable from receipts of the portion of the sales tax directed to be credited to the "Lead Hazard Control Assistance Fund" pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2003, c.311 (C.52:27D-437.11), and there is further appropriated from such receipts an amount not to exceed $8,000,000, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, an amount not to exceed $13,500,000 is appropriated from the Universal Service Fund for the purpose of administering the Universal Service Fund program by the Department of Community Affairs, as approved by the Board of Public Utilities and in accordance with the memorandum of understanding between the New Jersey Board of Public Utilities and the Department of Community Affairs, and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 4 of the "Lead Hazard Control Assistance Act," P.L.2003, c.311 (C.52:27D-437.4), such amounts as are necessary are appropriated from the "Lead Hazard Control Assistance Fund" for administrative costs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. STATE AID 05-8050 Community Resources $10,500,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$10,500,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, Social Services Programs $10,500,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$10,500,000) State Aid: 05 Repayment of Municipal Contribution to Mass Transit Facility (PTRF) ($10,000,000) 05 Perth Amboy's Open Space Acquisition and Improvements (PTRF) ($500,000) 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 75  State Subsidies and Financial Aid DIRECT STATE SERVICES 04-8030 Local Government Services $6,020,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, State Subsidies and Financial Aid $6,020,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Local Finance Board Members ($226,000) Salaries and Wages ($5,301,000) Materials and Supplies ($39,000) Services Other Than Personal ($224,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($15,000) Special Purpose: 04 Local Assistance Bureau ($215,000) Receipts received by the Division of Local Government Services are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. STATE AID 04-8030 Local Government Services $959,667,000 (From General Fund:$4,859,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$954,808,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, State Subsidies and Financial Aid $959,667,000 (From General Fund:$4,859,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$954,808,000) State Aid: 04 City of Union City - Social Services (PTRF) ($5,000,000) 04 Middlesex County Improvement Authority - Educational Infrastructure (PTRF) ($5,000,000) 04 Local Recreational Improvement Grants (PTRF) ($20,000,000) 04 Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid (PTRF) ($649,285,000) 04 County Prosecutors and Officials Salary Increase (P.L.2007, c.350) ($3,359,000) 04 Union County - Clark Reservoir Dredging and Pollution Remediation (PTRF) ($125,000) 04 Emergency Management Communications - Manville (PTRF) ($100,000) 04 Union County Shared Library Services (PTRF) ($125,000) 04 Middlesex County - Parks and Recreation Youth Sports Infrastructure (PTRF) ($8,500,000) 04 Middlesex County - Economic Development Projects (PTRF) ($8,500,000) 04 Trenton Capital City Aid (PTRF) ($10,000,000) 04 Consolidation Implementation (PTRF) ($1,000) 04 Transitional Aid to Localities (PTRF) ($126,927,000) 04 Open Space Payments in Lieu of Taxes (PTRF) ($7,983,000) 04 Middlesex County Improvement Authority (PTRF) ($8,500,000) 04 Camden County - Property Acquisition (PTRF) ($2,500,000) 04 Egg Harbor Township - Transportation Improvements (PTRF) ($250,000) 04 County of Union, Development, Capital, and Operating Expenses (PTRF) ($2,000,000) 04 Township of Clark - Fire Department ($1,500,000) 04 Township of Ocean (Ocean) - Public Facility Improvements (PTRF) ($250,000) 04 Borough of Red Bank - Park Improvements (PTRF) ($350,000) 04 Township of Willingboro - Food Pantry Study (PTRF) ($500,000) 04 Winfield Township - Playground Equipment and Sewer Expenses (PTRF) ($100,000) 04 Regional School District Consolidation Feasibility Studies (P.L.2021, c.402) (PTRF) ($2,000,000) 04 Shared Services and School District Consolidation Study and Implementation (PTRF) ($6,000,000) 04 City of Bayonne - Bayonne Food Pantry (PTRF) ($2,000,000) 04 Hudson County - Old Courthouse Asbestos Remediation (PTRF) ($2,000,000) 04 Township of North Brunswick - Community Resilience Hub and Pavilion (PTRF) ($2,750,000) 04 Township of East Brunswick - Crystal Springs Water Park  (PTRF) ($500,000) 04 City of Burlington - Assiscunk Creek Levee Improvements (PTRF) ($300,000) 04 Township of Burlington - Road and Recreational Facility Improvements (PTRF) ($475,000) 04 Borough of Fieldsboro - Street and Utility Upgrades (PTRF) ($250,000) 04 Borough of Palmyra - Fire Department Building Repairs (PTRF) ($100,000) 04 Township of Plainsboro - Revitalization Project (PTRF) ($250,000) 04 Cranbury Township - Village Park Revitalization (PTRF) ($275,000) 04 Borough of Jamesburg - Police Department Capital Improvements (PTRF) ($500,000) 04 Borough of Hightstown - Dawes Park ADA Improvements (PTRF) ($100,000) 04 Borough of Freehold - Fire Department Pumper Apparatus (PTRF) ($500,000) 04 Township of Livingston - Okner Complex Field Improvements (PTRF) ($1,500,000) 04 Township of Ewing - Senior Center (PTRF) ($500,000) 04 Township of Hamilton (Mercer) - Police Headquarters Roof Replacement (PTRF) ($1,400,000) 04 Borough of Milltown - Fire Truck Replacement (PTRF) ($200,000) 04 Borough of Rutherford - Memorial Park Field Renovations (PTRF) ($3,000,000) 04 Borough of Carlstadt - Broad Street Sports Complex (PTRF) ($1,500,000) 04 Borough of Metuchen - Fire Truck Replacement (PTRF) ($500,000) 04 Borough of Metuchen - Colonial Cemetery Restoration and Repairs (PTRF) ($250,000) 04 Borough of South Plainfield - Municipal Building Capital Improvements (PTRF) ($500,000) 04 City of Elizabeth - Lead Service Line Improvements (PTRF) ($1,000,000) 04 Township of North Bergen - Operating Aid (PTRF) ($2,000,000) 04 Hopewell Township (Mercer) - Senior and Community Center (PTRF) ($500,000) 04 County of Camden - Metro Police Technology Upgrades (PTRF) ($1,000,000) 04 County of Camden - Lake Maintenance Dredging (PTRF) ($1,750,000) 04 City of Camden - Water Main Refurbishment Initiative (PTRF) ($2,500,000) 04 City of Camden - Valve and Fire Hydrant Replacement Initiative (PTRF) ($500,000) 04 County of Camden - Admiral Wilson Boulevard West Rehabilitation (PTRF) ($1,000,000) 04 County of Camden - Walter Rand Transportation Center Tower (PTRF) ($1,000,000) 04 County of Mercer - Trenton Thunder Ballpark Improvements (PTRF) ($1,500,000) 04 East Windsor Township - Etra Lake Park Improvements (PTRF) ($750,000) 04 Township of Robbinsville - Capital Improvements (PTRF) ($600,000) 04 Borough of Cliffside Park - Sanitary and Storm Sewer Improvements (PTRF) ($750,000) 04 City of Plainfield - Milt Campbell Field Flood Mitigation (PTRF) ($250,000) 04 Borough of Ridgefield - Wolf Creek Flooding Mitigation (PTRF) ($500,000) 04 Township of Lakewood - Public Health and Safety (PTRF) ($7,000,000) 04 Borough of Highland Park - South Third Avenue Public Plaza (PTRF) ($1,000,000) 04 County of Somerset - Land Improvements (PTRF) ($90,000) 04 Town of West New York - Public Safety Building Reconstruction Project (PTRF) ($300,000) 04 County of Bergen - Saddle River County Park Pond Dredging and Ecological Restoration (PTRF) ($1,000,000) 04 County of Essex - Weequahic Park Improvements (PTRF) ($9,000,000) 04 Borough of Paramus - Police Department Drone Program (PTRF) ($125,000) 04 Township of Pennsville - Riverview Beach Park Improvement and Accessibility Project (PTRF) ($500,000) 04 City of Salem - Downtown Historic Brickwork Restoration (PTRF) ($500,000) 04 City of Newark - Newark Fire Division (PTRF) ($750,000) 04 Borough of Highland Park - Garbage Truck Replacement (PTRF) ($250,000) 04 City of Clifton  Outreach Division (PTRF) ($150,000) 04 City of Long Branch - Fire Department Operations (PTRF) ($100,000) 04 City of Long Branch - Park Improvements (PTRF) ($100,000) 04 Washington Township (Gloucester) - Inclusive Playground (PTRF) ($450,000) 04 Township of Buena Vista - Salt Shed Replacement (PTRF) ($400,000) 04 Township of Gloucester (Camden) - Blackwood Community Center Reconstruction (PTRF) ($500,000) 04 Township of Winslow - Firefighter Safety Equipment (PTRF) ($500,000) 04 Township of Monroe (Gloucester) - Fire Department Security Upgrades (PTRF) ($400,000) 04 City of Jersey City - Right to Counsel Program (PTRF) ($400,000) 04 Township of Neptune - Regional Flood Study (PTRF) ($100,000) 04 Borough of Freehold - 250th Anniversary Celebration (PTRF) ($100,000) 04 Bloomfield, Belleville, and Nutley Fire Departments  Enhanced Safety and Training (PTRF) ($500,000) 04 Borough of Frenchtown - Back-up Generator Purchase (PTRF) ($150,000) 04 City of Paterson - Recreation Center Capital Construction (PTRF) ($2,000,000) 04 City of Paterson - Larry Doby Field Improvements (PTRF) ($1,500,000) 04 Borough of Fanwood - La Grande Tennis Court Improvements (PTRF) ($350,000) 04 Borough of Fanwood - Capital Improvements (PTRF) ($1,000,000) 04 City of Linden - Field Replacement (PTRF) ($2,100,000) 04 City of Rahway - Security Assistance Project (PTRF) ($1,000,000) 04 Township of Winfield - Police Department Capital Improvements (PTRF) ($122,000) 04 Town of West New York - Parking Lot Project (PTRF) ($3,000,000) 04 North Hudson Sewerage Authority - Sewer Pipe Rehabilitation Project (PTRF) ($500,000) 04 Borough of Roselle Park - Operating Aid (PTRF) ($3,000,000) 04 Burlington County Sheriff's Office - Community Policing Initiatives (PTRF) ($150,000) 04 County of Somerset - Mountainview Park (PTRF) ($1,000,000) 04 Township of South Brunswick - Parks and Recreation Improvements (PTRF) ($150,000) 04 City of Plainfield - Recreational Improvements (PTRF) ($4,000,000) 04 Township of Cranford - Downtown Revitalization and Pedestrianization Project (PTRF) ($2,700,000) 04 Township of Scotch Plains - Park Improvements (PTRF) ($1,800,000) 04 Borough of East Rutherford - Lois Lane Athletic Complex (PTRF) ($2,000,000) 04 Borough of Edgewater - Hudson River Waterfront Walkway (PTRF) ($1,500,000) 04 Borough of Paulsboro - Paulsboro Municipal Recreation Committee (PTRF) ($25,000) 04 Borough of Penns Grove - Youth Football Program (PTRF) ($25,000) 04 Borough of Glassboro - Recreational Improvements (PTRF) ($38,000) 04 Township of West Deptford - Recreational Improvements (PTRF) ($52,000) 04 Borough of Riverton - Wastewater System Rehabilitation (PTRF) ($235,000) 04 City of Bordentown - Lighting and Security Improvements (PTRF) ($250,000) 04 Township of Riverside - Capital Projects (PTRF) ($250,000) 04 Union County - Capital Projects (PTRF) ($2,500,000) 04 Township of Berkeley Heights - Lower Columbia Park Turf Field Project (PTRF) ($250,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Local Recreational Improvement Grants shall be used to provide grants to local units for repairs and improvements to public recreational facilities pursuant to a competitive process administered by the Division of Local Government Services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid shall be distributed on the following schedule: on or before August 1, 45% of the total amount due; September 1, 30% of the total amount due; October 1, 15% of the total amount due; November 1, 5% of the total amount due; December 1 for municipalities operating under a calendar fiscal year, 5% of the total amount due; and June 1 for municipalities operating under the State fiscal year, 5% of the total amount due; provided, however, that notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Director of Local Government Services, in consultation with the Commissioner of Community Affairs and the State Treasurer, may direct the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting to provide such payments on an accelerated schedule if necessary to ensure fiscal stability for a municipality. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, from the amounts received from the appropriation to the Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid program and received from amounts transferred from Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid to the Energy Tax Receipts Property Tax Relief Aid account, each municipality shall be required to distribute to each fire district within its boundaries the amount received by the fire district from the Supplementary Aid for Fire Services program pursuant to the provisions of the fiscal year 1995 annual appropriations act, P.L.1994, c.67, less an amount proportional to reductions in the combined total amount received by the municipality from Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid and from the Energy Tax Receipts Property Tax Relief Fund/Aid account since fiscal year 2008. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid shall be distributed in the same amounts, and to the same municipalities that received funding pursuant to the previous fiscal year's annual appropriations act; provided further, however, that from the amount hereinabove appropriated there are transferred to the Energy Tax Receipts Property Tax Relief Aid account such amounts as were determined for fiscal year 2024 and prior fiscal years pursuant to subsection e. of section 2 of P.L.1997, c.167 (C.52:27D-439), as amended by P.L.1999, c.168; the amount of Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid received by any other municipality shall be increased by such amounts of Transitional Aid to Localities deemed to constitute Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services in the previous fiscal year. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Director of the Division of Local Government Services shall take such actions as may be necessary to ensure that proportional amounts of the Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid and the amounts transferred from Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid to the Energy Tax Receipts Property Tax Relief Aid account appropriated to offset losses from business personal property tax that would have otherwise been used for the support of public schools will be used to reduce the school property tax levy for those affected school districts with the remaining State Aid used as municipal property tax relief. The chief financial officer of the municipality shall pay to the school districts such amounts as may be due by December 31. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the release of the total annual amount due for the current fiscal year from Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid to municipalities is subject to the following condition: the municipality shall submit to the Director of the Division of Local Government Services a report describing the municipality's compliance with the "Best Practices Inventory" established by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services and shall receive at least a minimum score on such inventory as determined by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services; provided, however, that the director may take into account the particular circumstances of a municipality. In preparing the "Best Practices Inventory," the director shall identify best municipal practices in the areas of general administration, fiscal management, and operational activities, as well as the particular circumstances of a municipality, in determining the minimum score acceptable for the release of the total annual amount due for the current fiscal year. The Director of the Division of Local Government Services may permit any municipality that received "Regional Efficiency Aid Program" funds pursuant to the annual appropriations act for fiscal year 2010, P.L.2009, c.68, to use a portion of its Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid or Energy Tax Receipts Property Tax Relief Aid, or both Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid and Energy Tax Receipts Property Tax Relief Aid, to provide "Regional Efficiency Aid Program" benefits pursuant to P.L.1999, c.61 (C.54:4-8.76 et seq.). Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Trenton Capital City Aid is subject to the following condition: The City of Trenton shall enter into an agreement with the Department of Community Affairs setting forth the terms and conditions for receipt of such aid, which shall include financial and operational oversight by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Consolidation Implementation shall be allocated to provide reimbursement to local government units that consolidate pursuant to any law, including but not limited to P.L.2007, c.63 (C.40A:65-1 et seq.) and P.L.2009, c.118 (C.54:1-86 et seq.), or to a municipality that is wholly annexed by another municipality pursuant to N.J.S.40A:7-1 et seq., for non-recurring costs that the Director of the Division of Local Government Services, or in the case of a school district consolidation the Commissioner of Education, determines to be necessary to implement such consolidation or annexation, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting; provided, however, that in addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated, there are appropriated such additional amounts as are determined to be necessary for reimbursement of non-recurring costs associated with local government unit consolidations, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting; provided further that there are appropriated such additional amounts, not to exceed $15,000,000, as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, in consultation with the Commissioner of Community Affairs and the Director of the Division of Local Government Services, shall determine to be necessary to design and implement one or more voluntary county-based demonstration projects to achieve efficiencies and future cost savings in the provision of services at the local level. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Transitional Aid to Localities, an amount may be allocated by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services to provide short-term financial assistance to a local government unit that is determined by the director to be experiencing financial distress caused by the destruction or loss of a major local business ratable.  For purposes of this paragraph, a major local business ratable means one or more related parcels of property owned by a single business entity, classified as commercial or industrial, which comprised the largest assessed valuation of any one or more line items of taxable property in a municipality, or generated an annual PILOT payment in excess of 10% of the total municipal levy, or is otherwise determined by the director to be of such significance to a municipality that its destruction or loss has resulted in financial distress; provided, however, that notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Director of the Division of Local Government Services may direct that part of any such allocation be paid to an affected school district or county, or to both, in the same manner as if the award of Transitional Aid were raised as revenue from the municipal tax levy; and provided further that a local government unit determined to be experiencing financial distress because of the loss or destruction of a major local business ratable shall not be required to be subject to any additional conditions, requirements, orders, or other operational efficiency or oversight measures authorized pursuant to P.L.2011, c.144 (C.52:27D-118.42a), except as determined to be appropriate by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Transitional Aid to Localities, amounts may be allocated by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services to any State agency or department, county, or county improvement authority to pay for services provided to or on behalf of a participating municipal government unit pursuant to a memorandum of understanding between that State agency or department, county, or county improvement authority, as applicable and the Division of Local Government Services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Transitional Aid to Localities is subject to the following condition:  notwithstanding the provisions of R.S.43:21-14, or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development, in consultation with the Commissioner of Community Affairs, is authorized to enter into individualized payment plan agreements with municipalities that receive Transitional Aid for the reimbursement of unemployment benefits paid to former employees of such municipal government units, at reasonable interest rates based on current market conditions, and on such other terms and conditions as may be determined to be appropriate by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development.  Any municipality that enters into an individualized payment plan agreement pursuant to this section shall be required to expend all funds budgeted for this activity remaining as of the last day of its budget year for the repayment of outstanding obligations under the plan. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Transitional Aid to Localities shall be allocated to provide short-term financial assistance where needed to help a municipality that is in serious fiscal distress meet immediate budgetary needs and regain financial stability.  A municipality shall be deemed to be eligible for transitional aid if it is identified by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services as experiencing serious fiscal distress where the director determines that, despite local officials having implemented substantive cost reduction strategies, there continue to exist conditions of serious fiscal distress, which may include but shall not be limited to: substantial structural or accumulated deficits; ongoing reliance on non-recurring revenues; limited ability to raise supplemental non-property tax revenues; extraordinary demands for public safety appropriations; and other factors indicating a constrained ability to raise sufficient revenues to meet budgetary requirements that substantially jeopardizes the fiscal integrity of the municipality.  Municipalities seeking transitional aid shall file an application on a form prescribed by the director, which application, among other things, shall set forth the minimum criteria that must be met in order for an application to be considered by the director for a determination of eligibility. The director shall determine whether a municipality which files an application meeting such minimum criteria is in serious fiscal distress, and, if so, what amount of transitional aid should be provided to address the municipality's serious fiscal distress. The transitional aid shall be provided to the municipality subject to the provisions of subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.2011, c.144 (C.52:27D-118.42a); provided, however, that an amount of Transitional Aid to Localities as determined by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services for a municipality may be deemed to constitute Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid in an amount not in excess of the amount of Transitional Aid to Localities such municipality received in the previous fiscal year and shall not reduce the amount of Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid such municipality shall receive for the current fiscal year. Provided, however, if the Director of the Division of Local Government Services deems an amount of Transitional Aid to Localities for a municipality as constituting Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid pursuant to this provision, that municipality is not relieved from compliance with the requirements for transitional aid. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection d. of section 29 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-29) or subsection d. of section 30 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-30), or any law or regulation to the contrary, all payments to municipalities in lieu of taxes for lands acquired by the State and non-profit organizations for recreation and conservation purposes shall be retained by the municipality and not apportioned in the same manner as the general tax rate of the municipality. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, payments to municipalities in lieu of taxes for lands acquired by the State and non-profit organizations for recreation and conservation purposes shall be provided only to the municipalities whose payments received in fiscal year 2010 exceeded $5,000 and shall be provided at the payment amount provided in fiscal year  2024, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, any qualifying municipality, as defined in section 1 of P.L.1978, c.14 (C.52:27D-178) for the previous fiscal year, shall continue to be a qualifying municipality thereunder during the current fiscal year. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, whenever funds appropriated as State Aid and payable to any municipality, which municipality requests and receives the approval of the Local Finance Board, such funds may be pledged as a guarantee for payment of principal and interest on any bond anticipation notes issued pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2003, c.15 (C.40A:2-8.1) and any tax anticipation notes issued pursuant to N.J.S.40A:4-64 by such municipality. Such funds, if so pledged, shall be made available by the State Treasurer upon receipt of a written notification by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services that the municipality does not have sufficient funds available for prompt payment of principal and interest on such notes, and shall be paid by the State Treasurer directly to the holders of such notes at such time and in such amounts as specified by the director, notwithstanding that payment of such funds does not coincide with any date for payment otherwise fixed by law. The State Treasurer, in consultation with the Commissioner of Community Affairs, is empowered to direct the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting to transfer appropriations from any State department to any other State department as may be necessary to provide a loan for a term not to exceed 180 days to a local government unit faced with a fiscal crisis, including but not limited to a potential default on tax anticipation notes and on such other terms and conditions as may be required by the commissioner. Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.40A:4-39 or any other law or regulation to the contrary, a county that assumes responsibility for the provision of local police services in one or more municipalities utilizing a new or expanded county police force may display the anticipated revenues and appropriations associated with such county police force in its annual budget by annexing to that budget a statement describing the sources and amounts of anticipated dedicated revenues and appropriating those dedicated amounts for the purposes of the county police force. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Bloomfield, Belleville, and Nutley Fire Departments  Enhanced Safety and Training (PTRF) shall be used to support the construction of a training tower and other programs to enhance the service quality of the fire departments in Bloomfield, Belleville, and Nutley. 76  Management and Administration DIRECT STATE SERVICES 99-8070 Administration and Support Services $8,429,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Management and Administration $8,429,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($3,822,000) Materials and Supplies ($8,000) Services Other Than Personal ($59,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($16,000) Special Purpose: 99 Office of Information Privacy (P.L.2021, c.371) ($3,000,000) 99 Government Records Council ($524,000) 99 Sustainable New Jersey Fund ($1,000,000) Department of Community Affairs, Total State Appropriation $1,197,465,000 All moneys comprising original bond proceeds or the repayment of loans or advances from the Mortgage Assistance Fund established under the "New Jersey Mortgage Assistance Bond Act of 1976," P.L.1976, c.94, are appropriated in accordance with the purposes set forth in section 5 of that act. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, deposits of any funds into the Revolving Housing Development and Demonstration Grant Fund are subject to prior approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Summary of Department of Community Affairs Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services ........................................... $69,534,000 Grants-in-Aid ...................................................... $152,764,000 State Aid .............................................................. $975,167,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund ....................................................... $232,157,000 Property Tax Relief Fund .................................... $965,308,000 26  DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS 10 Public Safety and Criminal Justice 16 Detention and Rehabilitation DIRECT STATE SERVICES 07-7040 Institutional Control and Supervision $555,427,000 08-7040 Institutional Care and Treatment $205,215,000 99-7040 Administration and Support Services $80,079,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Detention and Rehabilitation $840,721,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($599,492,000) Food In Lieu of Cash ($4,232,000) Materials and Supplies ($76,472,000) Services Other Than Personal ($102,304,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($16,699,000) Special Purpose: 07 Civilly Committed Sexual Offender Program ($35,974,000) 08 Culinary Arts Training Program at Northern State Prison ($350,000) 08 Mid-State Licensed Drug Treatment Program ($4,000,000) 08 Edna Mahan Visitation Program ($142,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($1,056,000) The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Civilly Committed Sexual Offender Program account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated in the Detention and Rehabilitation various institutional accounts, an amount may be transferred to the Purchase of Community Services account or to other programs that reduce the number of incarcerated persons housed in State facilities, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for payment of incarcerated person health care are available for the payment of obligations applicable to prior fiscal years. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, amounts collected by the Department of Corrections as commissions in connection with the provision of services for incarcerated persons at incarcerated person kiosks, including automated banking, video visitation, electronic mail, and related services, and any unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in that account are appropriated to offset departmental costs associated with the provision of such services and other materials and services that directly benefit the incarcerated population, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Institutional Control and Supervision, Institutional Care and Treatment and Administration and Support Services, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed the difference between projected annualized savings from the partial consolidation of the Southern State Correctional Facility, continued savings from contract efficiencies and further restructuring and the actual savings achieved, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 7025 System-Wide Program Support DIRECT STATE SERVICES 07-7025 Institutional Control and Supervision $42,160,000 13-7025 Institutional Program Support $66,290,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, System-Wide Program Support $108,450,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($56,850,000) Materials and Supplies ($1,856,000) Services Other Than Personal ($15,274,000) Special Purpose: 13 Integrated Information Systems ($9,915,000) 13 Offender Re-Entry Program ($1,146,000) 13 DOC/DOT Work Details ($537,000) 13 Medication Assisted Treatment (MAT) Program ($2,550,000) 13 Narcan Equipment and Training for Staff ($486,000) 13 Peer Specialist Entry Engagement Program ($400,000) 13 Navigators for Released Incarcerated Persons ($1,000,000) 13 Inhaled Narcan for Released Incarcerated Persons ($355,000) 13 Hepatitis C Treatment of Offenders with Substance Use Disorder (SUD) Diagnosis ($3,700,000) 13 Hepatitis C Testing and Treatment for State Incarcerated Persons ($4,500,000) 13 Pre-Release Employment Navigation and Re-Entry Services Program ($350,000) 13 IT Modernization, Security Improvements and Enhancements ($2,000,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($7,531,000) In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Institutional Program Support, an amount not to exceed $10,000,000 is appropriated for the testing and treatment of Hepatitis C in the State incarcerated population, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 13-7025 Institutional Program Support $68,844,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, System-Wide Program Support $68,844,000 Grants-in-Aid: 13 Purchase of Service for Persons Incarcerated In County Penal Facilities ($21,520,000) 13 Purchase of Community Services ($46,924,000) 13 Incarcerated Veterans Initiative Pilot Program ($400,000) Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Purchase of Service for Persons Incarcerated in County Penal Facilities, an amount may be transferred for operational costs of State facilities for incarcerated person housing, which become ready for occupancy and other programs which reduce the number of State incarcerated persons in county facilities, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Purchase of Service for Persons Incarcerated in County Penal Facilities account is appropriated for the same purpose. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Purchase of Service for Persons Incarcerated in County Penal Facilities, there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be required to provide reimbursements to counties housing State-sentenced incarcerated persons as determined by the Commissioner of Corrections, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Purchase of Community Services shall be subject to the following condition: in order to permit flexibility and efficiency in the housing of State incarcerated persons, the operational capacity of the Residential Community Release Program (RCRP), as a place of confinement, shall be determined by the Commissioner of Corrections as authorized by section 2 of P.L.1969, c.22 (C.30:4-91.2), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Purchase of Community Services is conditioned upon the following: the Commissioner of Corrections shall report to the Presiding Officers of the Legislature in accordance with section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1) on the operation of each Community Based Residential Placement.  The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (a) the total reimbursement provided; (b) the rate of reimbursement received per client; (c) the number of clients for which reimbursement was received; (d) the number of clients imprisoned for violent crimes and the total number of days such clients were imprisoned; (e) the number of clients imprisoned for non-violent crimes and the total number of days such clients were imprisoned; (f) the number of escapes by clients imprisoned for violent crimes and the number of escapes by clients imprisoned for non-violent crimes; and (g) the number of incidents involving physical violence documented. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Release Support Partnership Program shall be used to provide grants to non-profit entities to meet the reentry needs of individuals preparing to transition back into the community, pursuant to a competitive application process administered by the Commissioner of Corrections, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. STATE AID 13-7025 Institutional Program Support $39,600,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$39,600,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, System-Wide Program Support $39,600,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$39,600,000) State Aid: 13 Essex County - County Jail Substance Use Disorder Programs (PTRF) ($23,000,000) 13 Union County - Incarcerated Person Rehabilitation Services (PTRF) ($3,500,000) 13 Hudson County Jail (PTRF) ($10,000,000) 13 County Re-Entry Coordinators (PTRF) ($2,100,000) 13 Hudson County Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation - Capital Renovations (PTRF) ($1,000,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Institutional Program Support, an amount not to exceed $600,000 is appropriated from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund for the Pre-Release Employment Navigation and Re-Entry Services Program for the purpose of funding employment-related services and assistance to individuals in State custody, upon the recommendation of the Commissioner of Corrections and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 17  Parole DIRECT STATE SERVICES 03-7010 Parole $61,459,000 05-7280 State Parole Board $14,972,000 99-7280 Administration and Support Services $4,608,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Parole $81,039,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($51,561,000) Materials and Supplies ($663,000) Services Other Than Personal ($3,393,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($1,053,000) Special Purpose: 03 Parolee Electronic Monitoring Program ($5,610,000) 03 Supervision, Surveillance, and Gang Suppression Program ($3,425,000) 03 Sex Offender Management Unit ($11,776,000) 03 Satellite-based Monitoring of Sex Offenders ($2,152,000) 03 Medication-Assisted Treatment (MAT) Expansion ($100,000) 03 Narcan Administration and Training ($40,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($1,266,000) GRANTS-IN-AID 03-7010 Parole $31,836,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Parole $31,836,000 Grants-in-Aid: 03 Re-Entry Substance Abuse Program (RESAP) ($9,100,000) 03 Mutual Agreement Program (MAP) ($4,682,000) 03 Community Resource Center Program (CRC) ($12,817,000) 03 Stages to Enhance Parolee Success Program (STEPS) ($5,237,000) Any change by the Division of Parole in the per diem rates affecting Special Caseload accounts first shall be approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the New Jersey State Parole Board is authorized to expend the amounts appropriated for Re-Entry Substance Abuse Program (RESAP), Stages to Enhance Parolee Success Program (STEPS), Mutual Agreement Program (MAP), and Community Resource Center Program (CRC) to provide services to ex-offenders who are age 18 or older and under juvenile or adult parole supervision, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. To permit flexibility and ensure the appropriate levels of services are provided, appropriated amounts may be transferred between the following accounts: Re-Entry Substance Abuse Program (RESAP), Mutual Agreement Program (MAP), Community Resource Center Program (CRC), and Stages to Enhance Parolee Success Program (STEPS), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Mutual Agreement Program (MAP), the amount of $175,000 shall be transferred to the Department of Human Services, Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services for the reimbursement of salaries and to fund other related administrative costs for the Mutual Agreement Program (MAP), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 19  Central Planning, Direction and Management DIRECT STATE SERVICES 99-7000 Administration and Support Services $20,950,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Central Planning, Direction and Management $20,950,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($16,444,000) Materials and Supplies ($664,000) Services Other Than Personal ($532,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($1,086,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($2,224,000) Receipts from the Culinary Arts Vocational Program, and any unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in that account, are appropriated for the operation of the program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Department of Corrections, Total State Appropriation $1,191,440,000 The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year of funds held for the benefit of incarcerated persons in the several institutions, and such funds as may be received, are appropriated for the benefit of such incarcerated persons. Payments received by the State from employers of incarcerated persons on their behalf, as part of any work release program, are appropriated for the purposes provided under section 4 of P.L.1969, c.22 (C.30:4-91.4). Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Department of Corrections Institutional Care and Treatment account, such amounts as are determined necessary by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in consultation with the Commissioner of the Department of Corrections may be transferred to the Parole account, the Supervision, Surveillance, and Gang Suppression Program account, and the Stages to Enhance Parolee Success account in the State Parole Board for the purpose of providing necessary assistance to geriatric and medically released parolees and individuals paroled based upon credits earned during a public health emergency. Summary of Department of Corrections Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services ........................................... $1,051,160,000 Grants-in-Aid ...................................................... $100,680,000 State Aid .............................................................. $39,600,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund ....................................................... $1,151,840,000 Property Tax Relief Fund .................................... $39,600,000 34  DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 31  Direct Educational Services and Assistance DIRECT STATE SERVICES 36-5120 Student Transportation $485,000 38-5120 Facilities Planning and School Building Aid $1,407,000 42-5120 School Finance $3,093,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Direct Educational Services and Assistance $4,985,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($4,498,000) Materials and Supplies ($17,000) Services Other Than Personal ($270,000) Special Purpose: 36 Office of School Bus Safety (P.L.2021, c.471) ($200,000) GRANTS-IN-AID 03-5120 Miscellaneous Grants-In-Aid $3,000,000 38-5120 Facilities Planning and School Building Aid $50,000,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$50,000,000) Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Direct Educational Services and Assistance $53,000,000 (From General Fund:$3,000,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$50,000,000) Grants-in-Aid: 03 Community Schools Pilot Program Fund ($3,000,000) 38 SDA Capital Maintenance and Emergent Projects (PTRF) ($50,000,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for SDA Capital Maintenance and Emergent Projects shall be provided to the New Jersey Schools Development Authority (SDA) to support emergent needs and capital maintenance in school districts, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. STATE AID 01-5120 General Formula Aid $11,163,597,000 (From General Fund:$5,910,228,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$5,253,369,000) 02-5120 Nonpublic School Aid $143,129,000 03-5120 Miscellaneous Grants-In-Aid $149,135,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$149,135,000) 07-5120 Special Education $1,784,684,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$1,784,684,000) 36-5120 Student Transportation $410,883,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$410,883,000) 38-5120 Facilities Planning and School Building Aid $1,138,237,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$1,138,237,000) Subtotal State Aid Appropriation, Direct Educational Services and Assistance $14,789,665,000 (From General Fund:$6,053,357,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$8,736,308,000) Less: Assessment of EDA Debt Service($26,529,000) Growth Savings  Payment Changes($104,191,000) Total Deductions ($130,720,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, Direct Educational Services and Assistance $14,658,945,000 (From General Fund:$6,053,357,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$8,605,588,000) State Aid: 01 Equalization Aid ($5,910,228,000) 01 Equalization Aid (PTRF) ($3,232,592,000) 01 Vocational Expansion Stabilization Aid (PTRF) ($14,166,000) 01 Supplemental Wraparound Program (PTRF) ($4,500,000) 01 Military Impact Aid (PTRF) ($9,409,000) 01 Educational Adequacy Aid (PTRF) ($82,397,000) 01 Security Aid (PTRF) ($365,209,000) 01 Adjustment Aid (PTRF) ($249,420,000) 01 Preschool Education Aid (PTRF) ($1,231,947,000) 01 School Choice (PTRF) ($63,729,000) 02 Nonpublic Textbook Aid ($8,243,000) 02 Nonpublic Handicapped Aid ($28,240,000) 02 Nonpublic Auxiliary Services Aid ($46,149,000) 02 Nonpublic Auxiliary/Handicapped Transportation Aid ($2,469,000) 02 Nonpublic Nursing Services Aid ($20,078,000) 02 Nonpublic Security Aid ($30,550,000) 02 Nonpublic Technology Initiative ($7,400,000) 03 Charter School Aid (PTRF) ($26,588,000) 03 Bridge Loan Interest and Approved Borrowing Cost (PTRF) ($200,000) 03 Payments for Institutionalized Children - Unknown District of Residence (PTRF) ($45,200,000) 03 Recovery High School Access Project (PTRF) ($1,500,000) 03 Charter School Facility Improvements (PTRF) ($9,000,000) 03 Clayton Model Pilot Program (P.L.2021, c.85) (PTRF) ($2,250,000) 03 Commercial Valuation Stabilization Aid (PTRF) ($15,000,000) 03 Lead Testing for Schools (PTRF) ($3,500,000) 03 Middlesex County Vocational and Technical Schools - Administrative Infrastructure (PTRF) ($5,000,000) 03 Menstrual Products School Reimbursement Program (P.L.2023, c.147) (PTRF) ($3,500,000) 07 Special Education Categorical Aid (PTRF) ($1,364,684,000) 07 Extraordinary Special Education Costs Aid (PTRF) ($420,000,000) 36 Transportation Aid (PTRF) ($410,783,000) 36 Family Crisis Transportation Aid (PTRF) ($100,000) 38 School Building Aid (PTRF) ($13,925,000) 38 School Construction Debt Service Aid (PTRF) ($165,041,000) 38 School Construction & Renovation Fund (PTRF) ($959,271,000) 03 Roselle Public Schools - Capital Improvements (PTRF) ($500,000) 03 Monroe Township Public Schools (Middlesex) - Capital Improvements (PTRF) ($300,000) 03 Fairview Public Schools - Capital Construction (PTRF) ($10,000,000) 03 Wood-Ridge School District - Highland Avenue Learning Annex (PTRF) ($12,500,000) 03 Hoboken Public School District - Capital Improvements (PTRF) ($250,000) 03 Innovation Academy - Hillside Township School District (PTRF) ($250,000) 03 Hudson County Schools of Technology - Capital Construction (PTRF) ($1,500,000) 03 Kenilworth Public Schools - Capital Improvements (PTRF) ($250,000) 03 Bass River Township School District - Capital (PTRF) ($37,000) 03 Chesterfield Township School District - Capital (PTRF) ($17,000) 03 Eastampton School District - Capital (PTRF) ($3,000) 03 Evesham Township School District - Capital (PTRF) ($2,000) 03 Lenape Regional High School District - Capital (PTRF) ($457,000) 03 Lumberton Township School District - Capital (PTRF) ($99,000) 03 Pemberton Township School District (Pemberton Borough) - Capital (PTRF) ($10,000) 03 Rancocas Valley Regional High School District - Capital (PTRF) ($10,000) 03 Shamong Township School District - Capital (PTRF) ($56,000) 03 Tabernacle Township School District - Capital (PTRF) ($27,000) 03 Washington Township School District (Burlington) - Capital (PTRF) ($1,000) 03 Westampton Township Public School District - Capital (PTRF) ($5,000) 03 Woodland Township School District - Capital (PTRF) ($26,000) 03 Little Ferry Public Schools - Capital Construction (PTRF) ($5,000,000) 03 Bloomfield Public Schools - Capital Improvements (PTRF) ($200,000) 03 Essex Regional Educational Services Commission - Capital Improvements (PTRF) ($1,000,000) 03 South Orange-Maplewood School District - International Integration Initiative (PTRF) ($250,000) 03 Ocean Township School District (Monmouth) - Student Mental Health Programs (PTRF) ($100,000) 03 Fair Haven Public Schools - Student Mental Health Services (PTRF) ($100,000) 03 Shrewsbury Borough School District - Student Mental Health Services (PTRF) ($100,000) 03 Eatontown Public Schools - Student Mental Health Programs (PTRF) ($100,000) 03 Tinton Falls School District - Mental Health Assistance (PTRF) ($100,000) 03 Red Bank Borough Public Schools - Student Mental Health Programs (PTRF) ($100,000) 03 East Orange School District - Capital (PTRF) ($400,000) 03 South Brunswick School District - Capital (PTRF) ($485,000) 03 Hillsborough Township Public Schools - Capital (PTRF) ($277,000) 03 Jackson School District - Infrastructure Improvements (PTRF) ($2,500,000) 03 Hunterdon Central Regional School District - Capital (PTRF) ($135,000) 03 Asbury Park School District - Student Mental Health Programs (PTRF) ($250,000) Less: Total Deductions: $130,720,000 Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Equalization Aid, an amount equal to the total earnings of investments of the Fund for the Support of Free Public Schools first shall be charged to such fund. Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Nonpublic School Aid, such amounts as determined by the Commissioner of Education may be transferred between such accounts to address changes in enrollments and services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from nonpublic schools handicapped and auxiliary recoveries are appropriated for the payment of additional aid in accordance with section 17 of P.L.1977, c.192 (C.18A:46A-14) and section 14 of P.L.1977, c.193 (C.18A:46-19.8), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 14 of P.L.1977, c.193 (C.18A:46-19.8), for the purpose of computing Nonpublic Handicapped Aid for pupils requiring the following services, the per pupil amounts for the 2024-2025 school year shall be: $1,326.17 for an initial evaluation or reevaluation for examination and classification; $380 for an annual review for examination and classification; $930 for speech correction; and $826 for supplementary instruction services, provided, however, that the Commissioner of Education may adjust the per pupil amounts based upon the nonpublic pupil population and the need for services. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 9 of P.L.1977, c.192 (C.18A:46A-9), the per pupil amount for compensatory education for the 2024-2025 school year for the purposes of computing Nonpublic Auxiliary Services Aid shall equal $1,070.33 and the per pupil amount for providing the equivalent service to children of limited English-speaking ability shall be $1,090.00, provided, however, that the Commissioner of Education may adjust the per pupil amounts based upon the nonpublic pupil population, the amount appropriated, and the need for services. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 9 of P.L.1991, c.226 (C.18A:40--31), the amount hereinabove appropriated for Nonpublic Nursing Services Aid shall be made available to local school districts based upon the number of pupils enrolled in each nonpublic school on the last day prior to October 15, 2023 and the rate per pupil shall be  $135. From the amount hereinabove appropriated for Nonpublic Security Aid, the Commissioner of Education shall provide State aid to each school district in an amount equal to $205 multiplied by the number of nonpublic school students within the district identified by the district on or before November 5 for security services, equipment, or technology to ensure a safe and secure school environment for nonpublic school students. Items purchased for the use of nonpublic school students with Nonpublic Technology Initiative funds in previous budget cycles shall remain the property of the local education agency; provided, however, that they shall remain on permanent loan for the use of nonpublic school students for the balance of the technologies useful life. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, Nonpublic Technology Initiative aid shall be paid to school districts and allocated for nonpublic school pupils at the rate of $49 per pupil in a manner that is consistent with the provisions of the federal and State constitutions. Such amounts received in the "School District Deficit Relief Account," established pursuant to section 5 of  P.L.2006, c.15 (C.18A:7A-58), including loan repayments, are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of the "School District Fiscal Accountability Act," P.L.2006, c.15 (C.18A:7A-54 et seq.) or any law or regulation to the contrary, in the event that a school district owes an amount greater than 50 percent of its annual general fund budget attributable in substantial part to loans made to the district from the School District Deficit Relief Account, established pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2006, c.15 (C.18A:7A-58), such debt, as reduced by the liquidation of all available assets of the school district, may be forgiven upon the school districts merger with another district if the Commissioner of Education determines that such debt represents an impediment to consolidation, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1999, c.12 (C.54A:9-25.12 et seq.), there is appropriated from the "Drug Abuse Education Fund," established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1999, c.12 (C.54A:9-25.12), the amount of $50,000, to be used for the New Jersey State Interscholastic Athletic Association (NJSIAA) Steroid Testing program. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the School Construction and Renovation Fund account to make payments under the contracts authorized pursuant to section 18 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-18), there are appropriated such other amounts as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine are required to pay all amounts due from the State pursuant to such contracts. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the School Construction and Renovation Fund account is appropriated for the same purpose. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Adjustment Aid, Equalization Aid, Special Education Categorical Aid, Security Aid, and Transportation Aid, such additional amounts as are necessary, as determined by the Commissioner of Education, to provide additional Adjustment Aid, Equalization Aid, Special Education Categorical Aid, Security Aid, and Transportation Aid to participating districts pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2021, c.402 (C.18A:13-47.1 et al.), and any other additional funding necessary to fulfill the provisions of P.L.2021, c.402 (C.18A:13-47.1 et al.) are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in the event that an SDA district sells district surplus property, the proceeds from such sale shall be applied as follows, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting: the Commissioner of Education, in his discretion, may direct that the proceeds be used by the SDA district upon a showing of financial need for a capital maintenance project or for a school facilities project if such project is consistent with the districts Long-Range Facilities Plan (LRFP) and the project cost does not exceed $500,000. If the project cost exceeds $500,000, the commissioner may direct all or a portion of the proceeds to the New Jersey Schools Development Authority (SDA) for use in projects identified in that district's LRFP. In the case of capital maintenance projects, the SDA may forward the specified aid amount directly to the district for completion of the projects. If the commissioner is not satisfied that there is a sufficient showing of financial need for a capital maintenance project or for a school facilities project or if the commissioner is not satisfied that the proposed project is consistent with the districts LRFP, the proceeds shall be returned to the SDA for use by the SDA for school facilities projects in that SDA district which are consistent with the SDA districts LRFP. For the purposes of this provision, surplus property means property which is not being replaced by other property under a grant agreement with the SDA. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Supplemental Wraparound Program shall be provided as State aid to "SDA districts" to reduce family cost-sharing for before-school, after-school, and summer wraparound child care. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1 of P.L.2021, c.283 (C.18A:7F-71) or any other rule, law, or regulation to the contrary, eligibility for, and the calculation of, Military Impact Aid shall be based on the amount of the Basic Support Payment of federal Impact Aid under section 7003 of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. s.7703) that a school district received in the budget year preceding the prebudget year. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, "non-SDA" districts that received their State support for approved project costs through the New Jersey Schools Development Authority (SDA) shall be assessed an amount equal to the 2013-2014 assessment. District allocations shall be withheld from 2024-2025 formula aid payments and the assessment cannot exceed the total of those payments. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the preschool per pupil aid amounts set forth in subsection d. of section 12 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-54) shall be adjusted by the geographic cost adjustment developed by the Commissioner of Education pursuant to P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et al.). Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, amounts hereinabove appropriated for Preschool Education Aid shall be allocated as follows: 1) in the case of a district that received Early Launch to Learning Initiative aid in the 2007-2008 school year, an amount equal to the districts 2007-2008 allocation of Early Launch to Learning Initiative aid; 2) in the case of a school district that received a 2008-2009 allocation of Preschool Education Aid based on its 2007-2008 Early Childhood Program Aid allocation, an aid amount equal to the districts 2023-2024 per pupil allocation of Preschool Education Aid inflated by the CPI and multiplied by the districts projected preschool enrollment, except in the case of a school district that participated in the federal Preschool Expansion Grant in 2018-2019, districts that received an allocation of Preschool Education Expansion Aid in 2017-2018 or 2018-2019, and districts that received an allocation of Preschool Education Aid through the competitive process administered by the Commissioner of Education which began in 2019-2020; 3) in the case of any other district with an allocation of Preschool Education Aid in the 2023-2024 school year calculated using the provisions of section 12 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-54), districts that participated in the federal Preschool Expansion Grant in 2018-2019, districts that received an allocation of Preschool Education Expansion Aid in 2017-2018 or 2018-2019, or districts that received an allocation of Preschool Education Aid through the competitive process administered by the Commissioner of Education which began in 2019-2020, an amount calculated in accordance with those provisions based upon 2024-2025 projected FTE enrollments, and multiplied by the per pupil allocations as set forth in the February 2024 State Aid notice issued by the commissioner. A school district that receives Preschool Education Aid for the first time in the 2024-2025 school year shall demonstrate, in its application, due diligence in establishing partnerships to provide its preschool program through a mixed-delivery system in all licensed child care providers and Head Start programs in its community or neighboring communities that are willing and able to meet all preschool program requirements. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Preschool Education Aid, an amount not to exceed $20,000,000 shall be allocated in amounts determined by the Commissioner of Education: (1) for the provision of preschool expansion grants to be allocated by the commissioner to districts in total additional preschool funding for the purpose of expanding free access to full-day preschool for resident three- and four-year old children in accordance with the preschool quality standards issued by the commissioner and based on a districts demonstration of its readiness to operate a preschool program consistent with those standards and; (2) to the Department to address workforce preparation and training and other ancillary needs related to preschool expansion. In allocating grant funds to school districts, the commissioner shall give preference to districts that demonstrate in their preschool expansion grant applications a planned preschool program that includes a mixed-delivery model of preschool education. A district applying for a grant that does not have a planned mixed-delivery model of preschool education shall demonstrate in its application due diligence to partner with all ready, willing, and able licensed child care providers and Head Start programs in their communities and neighboring communities. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a district receiving a grant may enter into contracts with licensed child care providers for the provision of preschool education services, which shall be stated in the Notice of Funding Opportunity for preschool expansion grants posted by the department. The Department of Education, the Department of Children and Families, and the Department of Human Services shall post on the departments Internet websites, no later than July 14, 2024, lists of all: current districts with State-funded preschool; districts eligible to apply for Preschool Education Aid and licensed child care providers and Head Start programs in each eligible districts community and in neighboring communities, including contact information for the providers and programs.  The Department of Education, the Department of Children and Families, and the Department of Human Services shall post revised lists for the 2025-2026 school year no later than April 1, 2025.  The Department of Education, the Department of Children and Families, and the Department of Human Services shall, in consultation with school districts, licensed child care providers, Head Start programs, and other stakeholders identified by the Commissioner of Education, produce a report to the Legislature on the efficacy of the mixed-delivery model of preschool education, on or before March 1, 2025, and the report shall be posted on the Department of Educations Internet website. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, a district's 2024-2025 allocation of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for School Choice Aid shall be 90 percent of the amount calculated pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et al.); provided, however, in the event that School Choice enrollment reflected on the October 2023 Application for State School Aid is less than projected School Choice enrollment reflected on the 2023-2024 State Aid notice, such district's 2024-2025 School Choice Aid allocation shall be adjusted to reflect actual prebudget year enrollment as of October 2023, as set forth in the February 2024 State Aid notice issued by the Commissioner of Education. A district's 2024-2025 School Choice enrollment shall not exceed the district's maximum funded choice student enrollment as determined by the commissioner. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, following notification to the Joint Budget Oversight Committee, there are appropriated to the Emergency Fund account such additional amounts as may be required to fund approved applications for emergency aid following district needs assessments conducted by the Department of Education, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Provided, further, that the Commissioner of Education shall determine the repayment terms, if any, that will be assessed and may appoint a State monitor to a school district that receives an allocation from the Emergency Fund, who shall have the same powers and duties of a State monitor appointed pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2006, c.15 (C.18A:7A-55). Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, a charter schools 2024-2025 allocation of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Charter School Aid shall be as set forth in the February 2024 State Aid notice issued by the Commissioner of Education, and shall be adjusted based on the October 15th and the end of the school year actual pupil counts in each of the following cases: 1) in the case of a charter school with higher enrollment in the 2024-2025 school year than in the 2007-2008 school year, to provide that in the 2024-2025 school year, the charter school receives no less total support from the State and the resident district than the sum of the total 2007-2008 payments from the resident district and the 2007-2008 payments of Charter School Aid and Charter Schools - Council on Local Mandates Aid and to ensure that such total payments provide a 2024-2025 per pupil amount that is no less than the 2007-2008 per pupil amount based on average daily enrollment; and 2) to provide amounts pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1995, c.426 (C.18A:36A-12). A charter school shall also receive an allocation to provide that in the 2024-2025 school year, the charter school receives no less total support from the State and resident school district than in the 2023-2024 school year and to ensure that such total payments provide a 2024-2025 per pupil amount that is not less than the 2023-2024 per pupil amount based on average daily enrollment. This allocation shall be adjusted based on the October 15, 2024 actual pupil count. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Charter School Aid, such additional amounts as may be required, based on actual charter school enrollment counts submitted through the Charter School Enrollment System, for the support of Charter School Aid are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, from the amount hereinabove appropriated for Preschool Facilities Lead Remediation, the Commissioner of Education shall award grants to school districts for water infrastructure improvement projects in schools serving solely preschool students, provided that eligibility for funding such projects shall be based on the eligibility requirements for water infrastructure improvement grants in schools serving grades kindergarten through 12 pursuant to the "Securing Our Children's Future Bond Act," P.L.2018, c.119, and its implementing regulations. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Preschool Facilities Lead Remediation account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Charter School Facility Improvements, to protect the health and safety of students, $9,000,000 shall be provided to the Department of Education to administer grants to support emergent needs , capital maintenance, and facilities costs in charter schools and renaissance school projects upon the review of the Director of the New Jersey Department of Education Office of Charter and Renaissance Schools. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Charter School Facility Improvements account is appropriated. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Lead Testing for Schools is subject to the following condition: amounts shall be paid to district boards of education, as defined in N.J.A.C.6A:26-12.4(a), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, based on approved applications for reimbursement of the costs of testing school drinking water pursuant to the program requirements established by the Department of Education in regulations adopted pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) at N.J.A.C.6A:26-12.4. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Lead Testing for Schools account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Menstrual Products School Reimbursement Program (P.L.2023, c.147), such additional amounts as may be required as determined by the Commissioner of Education for the support of the Menstrual Products School Reimbursement Program are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 3 of P.L.1971, c.271 (C.18A:46-31), a portion of the district tuition amounts payable to a county special services school district operating an extended school year program may be transferred to the county special services school district prior to the first of September in the event the board shall file a written request with the Commissioner of Education stating the need for the funds. The commissioner shall review the board's request and determine whether to grant the request after an assessment of whether the district needs to spend the funds prior to September and after considering the availability of district surplus.  The commissioner shall transfer the payment for the portion of the tuition payable for which need has been demonstrated. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Extraordinary Special Education Costs Aid, such amounts as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting determines shall be charged to the Property Tax Relief Fund instead of receipts deposited into the Extraordinary Aid account. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1997, c.53 (C.18A:39-11.1) districts shall not be reimbursed for administrative fees paid to cooperative transportation service agencies. For any school district receiving amounts from the amount hereinabove appropriated for Transportation Aid, and notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, if the school district is located in a county of the third class or a county of the second class with a population of less than 235,000, according to the 1990 federal decennial census, transportation shall be provided to school pupils residing in this school district in going to and from any remote school other than a public school, not operated for profit in whole or in part, located within the State not more than 30 miles from the residence of the pupil. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 2 of P.L.1981, c.57 (C.18A:39-1a) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the maximum amount of nonpublic school transportation costs per pupil provided for in N.J.S.18A:39-1 shall equal  $1,185. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Family Crisis Transportation Aid shall be paid to districts based on applications approved from the prior year in accordance with the provisions of section 1 of P.L.2013, c.231 (C.18A:38-1.1), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for School Building Aid, a district's district aid percentage calculated for purposes of the provisions of section 10 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-10) shall equal the percentage calculated for the 2001-2002 school year. Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for School Building Aid and School Construction Debt Service Aid, the calculation of each eligible district's allocation shall include the amount based on school bond and lease purchase agreement payments for interest and principal payable during the 2024-2025 school year pursuant to sections 9 and 10 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-9 and C.18A:7G-10) and the adjustments required for prior years based on the difference between the amounts calculated using actual principal and interest amounts in a prior year and the amounts allocated and paid in that prior year. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, an eligible district's allocation of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for School Construction Debt Service Aid and School Building Aid shall be 85 percent of the district's approved November 29, 2023 application amount. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, when calculating a district's allocation of the amount hereinabove appropriated for School Construction Debt Service Aid, the provisions of subsection d. of section 9 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-9) shall also be applicable for a school facilities project approved by the Commissioner of Education and by the voters in a referendum after the effective date of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) and prior to the effective date of P.L.2008, c.39 (C.18A:7G-14.1 et al.). Notwithstanding the provisions of section 9 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-9) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, for the purpose of calculating a district's State Debt Service Aid, "M", the maintenance factor, shall equal 1. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the School Construction and Renovation Fund account to make payments under the contracts authorized pursuant to section 18 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-18), there are appropriated such other sums as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine are required to pay all amounts due from the State pursuant to such contracts. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the School Construction and Renovation Fund account is appropriated for the same purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 4 of P.L.1997, c.264 (C.26:2H-18.58g), section 17 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-17), or any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated to the School Construction and Renovation Fund such amounts as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting may determine first shall be charged to the Property Tax Relief Fund. The amount appropriated for South Brunswick School District  Capital (PTRF) shall be available to the school district for various purposes including, but not limited to, STEM program enhancements, the marching band program, and school security. The amount appropriated for Hillsborough Township Public Schools  Capital (PTRF) shall be available to the school district for various purposes including, but not limited to, STEM program enhancements, the marching band program, and the preservation of extracurricular activities. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Adjustment Aid, Equalization Aid, Special Education Categorical Aid, Security Aid, and Transportation Aid, such additional amounts as are necessary, as determined by the Commissioner of Education, to provide additional Adjustment Aid, Equalization Aid, Special Education Categorical Aid, Security Aid, and Transportation Aid to districts who have successfully appealed their aid allocations pursuant to the appeals process set forth in section 11 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-53) regarding the income data utilized in the calculation of this aid, are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount appropriated for Hunterdon Central Regional School District  Capital (PTRF) shall be available to the school district for various purposes including, but not limited to, STEM program enhancements and the marching band program. 32  Operation and Support of Educational Institutions DIRECT STATE SERVICES 12-5011 Marie H. Katzenbach School for the Deaf $6,935,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Operation and Support of Educational Institutions $6,935,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($4,030,000) Materials and Supplies ($665,000) Services Other Than Personal ($589,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($400,000) Special Purpose: 12 Transportation Expenses for Students ($40,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($1,211,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.18A:61-1 and N.J.S.18A:46-13, or any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated to the Marie H. Katzenbach School for the Deaf for the current academic year, payments from local boards of education to the school at an annual rate and payment schedule adopted by the Commissioner of Education and the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting are appropriated. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the receipt accounts for the Marie H. Katzenbach School for the Deaf are appropriated for expenses of operating the school. Any income from the rental of vacant space at the Marie H. Katzenbach School for the Deaf is appropriated for the operation and maintenance cost of the facility and for capital costs at the school, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 33  Supplemental Education and Training Programs DIRECT STATE SERVICES 20-5062 Career Readiness and Technical Education $979,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Supplemental Education and Training Programs $979,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($918,000) Materials and Supplies ($12,000) Services Other Than Personal ($49,000) GRANTS-IN-AID 20-5062 Career Readiness and Technical Education $750,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Supplemental Education and Training Programs $750,000 Grants-in-Aid: 20 Artificial Intelligence Career and Technical Education Expansion ($750,000) The amount hereinabove appropriated for Artificial Intelligence Career and Technical Education Expansion is subject to the following conditions: the Commissioner of Education shall develop a competitive grant program to support the development by vocational technical schools of programs, curricula, and career pathways related to generative artificial intelligence; establish written eligibility criteria for the selection of participating vocational technical schools; and set program goals and requirements for such programs for the 2024-2025 school year, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. STATE AID 20-5062 Career Readiness and Technical Education $4,860,000 Total State Aid Appropriation, Supplemental Education and Training Programs $4,860,000 State Aid: 20 Vocational Education ($4,860,000) Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Vocational Education, an amount not to exceed $367,000 is available for transfer to Direct State Services for the administration of vocational education programs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 34  Educational Support Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 30-5063 Standards, Assessments, and Curriculum $54,561,000 31-5060 Grants Management $1,139,000 32-5061 Recruitment, Preparation, Certification and Educator Evaluation $7,295,000 33-5067 Field Services $9,477,000 34-5068 Innovation $1,565,000 35-5069 Early Childhood Education $3,317,000 37-5069 Comprehensive Support $1,515,000 40-5064 Student Services $5,932,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Educational Support Services $84,801,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($23,906,000) Materials and Supplies ($100,000) Services Other Than Personal ($2,743,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($7,000) Special Purpose: 30 Learning Loss Program ($250,000) 30 Statewide Assessment Program ($46,275,000) 30 Reading Acceleration/Professional Integrated Development Program ($2,000,000) 30 Climate Change Education Grants to Schools ($4,000,000) 30 General Education Development ($250,000) 32 Teacher Leader Network ($250,000) 32 Paraprofessional Training Program ($1,000,000) 32 K-12 Education Workforce Diversity Programs ($550,000) 40 New Jersey Commission on Holocaust Education ($255,000) 40 New Jersey Amistad Commission ($1,010,000) 40 New Jersey Commission on Latino and Hispanic Heritage ($1,000,000) 40 Mental Health Screening in Schools Grant Program Fund (P.L.2021, c.237) ($1,000,000) 40 Youth Disconnection Prevention and Recovery Ombudsperson (P.L.2023, c.277) ($200,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($5,000) Receipts from the State Board of Examiners' fees in excess of those anticipated, and the unexpended program balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year, are appropriated for the operation of the professional development and licensure programs. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Teacher Leader Network shall be utilized in the efforts to expand the Network, as determined by the Commissioner of Education, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Paraprofessional Training Program shall be utilized to bolster paraprofessional development training programs and to fund tuition assistance for paraprofessionals who wish to become teachers, as determined by the Commissioner of Education, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for K-12 Education Workforce Diversity Programs shall be used to support Department of Education programs to increase and retain diversity in the K-12 education workforce, which shall include, but not be limited to, the program established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2019, c.102 (C.18A:6-136) and programs to provide mentorship to minority teachers and candidates for teacher preparation as determined by the Commissioner of Education, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Statewide Assessment Program, there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be necessary for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Statewide Assessment Program account is appropriated for the same purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Climate Change Education Grants to Schools, $500,000 shall be used to support the Office of Climate Change Education. The remaining funds shall be used for grants to support schools with the implementation of the new climate change education standards by providing funding for technical assistance, professional development opportunities, instructional materials, and evaluation strategies to support educators. The grant program shall give priority to "SDA districts" submitting approved applications, as determined by the Commissioner of Education, based on a districts demonstration of its readiness to implement such a program. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Paraprofessional Training Program account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amount appropriated for K-12 Education Workforce Diversity Programs, an amount may be transferred to the High Poverty School District Minority Teacher Recruitment Program account as determined by the Commissioner of Education, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the K-12 Education Workforce Diversity Programs account is appropriated for the same purposes, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 30-5063 Standards, Assessments, and Curriculum $13,925,000 32-5061 Recruitment, Preparation, Certification and Educator Evaluation $1,900,000 34-5068 Innovation $1,668,000 40-5064 Student Services $4,963,000 (From General Fund:$4,463,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$500,000) Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Educational Support Services $22,456,000 (From General Fund:$21,956,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$500,000) Grants-in-Aid: 30 Advanced Placement Exam Fee Waiver ($1,625,000) 30 K-12 Computer Science Education Initiative ($1,600,000) 30 Jobs for America's Graduates New Jersey (JAG NJ) ($350,000) 30 Bard High School Early College Newark ($400,000) 30 W.E.B. Du Bois Scholars Institute ($125,000) 30 Advanced Placement/International Baccalaureate Course Expansion Grants ($500,000) 30 Liberty Science Center - Educational Services ($675,000) 30 Engaged Learning Strategies - STEM Curriculum Program ($1,000,000) 30 Governor's Literacy Initiative ($1,900,000) 32 Heldrich Center for Workforce Development - Teacher Workforce Reporting ($350,000) 32 Culture and Climate Innovation Grants ($1,450,000) 34 NAN Newark Tech World ($600,000) 34 New Jersey STEM Innovation Fellowship ($50,000) 34 Research & Development Council of New Jersey ($243,000) 34 STEAMpark, Inc. - Educational Programs ($25,000) 34 Artificial Intelligence Innovation in Education Grants ($750,000) 40 Unified Sports Program ($13,000) 40 High Poverty School District Minority Teacher Recruitment Program ($1,000,000) 40 Restorative Justice in Education (P.L.2019, c.412) (PTRF) ($500,000) 40 School-Based Mental Health Training Grant Program (P.L.2021, c.322) ($500,000) 40 Teach for America New Jersey - New Teacher Recruitment ($600,000) 40 Good Grief, Inc. ($50,000) 40 Grants for After School and Summer Activities for At-Risk Children ($800,000) 30 Junior Achievement of New Jersey ($250,000) 32 Montclair Fund for Educational Excellence ($100,000) 30 HomeWorks Trenton - Capital Improvements ($100,000) 30 Literacy Initiatives ($5,250,000) 40 Effective School Solutions - High Acuity School-Based Care Pilot Program ($400,000) 40 New Jersey Tutoring Corps ($1,100,000) 30 Literacy Volunteers of Somerset County ($150,000) The amount hereinabove appropriated for Culture and Climate Innovation Grants is subject to the following conditions: the Commissioner of Education shall develop a competitive grant program to incentivize public school districts to address local issues related to educator quality of life, establish written eligibility criteria for the selection of participating public schools, and set program goals and requirements for the 2024-2025 school year, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Advanced Placement Exam Fee Waiver shall supplement that portion of the advanced placement exam fee that is not currently funded by The College Board test fee waiver and school test processing fee waiver for students that qualify for the Free or Reduced Price Lunch Program. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the K-12 Computer Science Education Initiative shall be used exclusively to support approved applications for the expansion and support of professional development of K-12 computer science teachers, and for advanced computer science course offerings as determined by the Commissioner of Education based on a districts demonstration of its readiness to implement such a program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Advanced Placement/International Baccalaureate Course Expansion Grants is subject to the following condition: the Commissioner of Education shall develop a competitive grant program to provide funding for districts to train or hire additional teachers for Advanced Placement or International Baccalaureate classes. The commissioner shall also establish written eligibility criteria for the selection of participating public schools and set program goals and requirements for the 2024-2025 school year, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Liberty Science Center - Educational Services shall be used to provide educational services to districts with high concentrations of at-risk students in the science education component of the New Jersey Student Learning Standards as established by law. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Literacy Initiatives is subject to the following conditions: the Commissioner of Education shall develop a competitive grant program for school districts to acquire or develop high-quality literacy screening tools for grades K-3, as determined by the Commissioner of Education, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Governor's Literacy Initiative shall be used for a grant for the Learning Through Listening program and the Excite Reading Initiative at the New Jersey Unit of Learning Ally. From the amount hereinabove appropriated for High Poverty School District Minority Teacher Recruitment Program, the Commissioner of Education shall continue the Department of Education's efforts to develop and implement a competitive grant program to provide funding to eligible organizations that recruit, train, and place new teachers, with special emphasis on minority teachers, in one or more high poverty school districts in the State. To be eligible to receive a grant under the program an organization shall meet certain conditions established by the commissioner. High poverty school district means a school district in which the percentage of students who are at-risk pupils, as defined by section 3 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-45), is equal to or greater than 40 percent. From the amount hereinabove appropriated for High Poverty School District Minority Teacher Recruitment Program, the commissioner shall appropriate not less than $250,000 to an organization that, in addition to the criteria stated above, also provides at least two years of direct coaching for teachers and does not accept tuition or fees from teachers to participate in the program. The organization shall also demonstrate a history of being able to place minority teachers in high poverty districts. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Nonpublic STEM Reimbursement Program (P.L.2019, c.256) account established pursuant to P.L.2019, c.256 (C.18A:6-137 et seq.) is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Artificial Intelligence Innovation in Education Grants is subject to the following conditions: the Commissioner of Education shall develop a competitive grant program to support the development by public school districts of programs, curricula, resources, and best practices for education on topics related to generative artificial intelligence; establish written eligibility criteria for the selection of participating public school districts; and set program goals and requirements for such programs for the 2024-2025 school year, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. STATE AID 39-5094 Teachers' Pension and Annuity Assistance $6,156,798,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$6,156,798,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, Educational Support Services $6,156,798,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$6,156,798,000) State Aid: 39 Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund - Post Retirement Medical (PTRF) ($1,232,533,000) 39 Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund (PTRF) ($3,382,053,000) 39 Social Security Tax (PTRF) ($937,333,000) 39 Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund - Non-contributory Insurance (PTRF) ($40,733,000) 39 Post Retirement Medical Other Than TPAF (PTRF) ($295,346,000) 39 Debt Service on Pension Obligation Bonds (PTRF) ($268,800,000) Such additional amounts as may be required for Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund - Post Retirement Medical are appropriated, as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Social Security Tax, there is appropriated such amounts, as determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, to make payments on behalf of school districts that do not receive sufficient State formula aid payments under this act, for amounts due and owing to the State including out-of-district placements and such amounts shall be recognized by the school district as State revenue. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Social Security Tax, there are appropriated such amounts as are required for payment of Social Security Tax on behalf of members of the Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund. Such additional amounts as may be required for the Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund - Non-Contributory Insurance, Post Retirement Medical Other Than TPAF, and Affordable Care Act fees are appropriated, as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. Such additional amounts as may be required for Debt Service on Pension Obligation Bonds are appropriated, as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Debt Service on Pension Obligation Bonds account is appropriated for the same purpose. 35  Education Administration and Management DIRECT STATE SERVICES 41-5092 Performance Management $670,000 43-5092 Office of Fiscal Accountability and Compliance $2,784,000 99-5095 Administration and Support Services $19,634,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Education Administration and Management $23,088,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($19,446,000) Materials and Supplies ($85,000) Services Other Than Personal ($3,075,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($52,000) Special Purpose: 43 Internal Auditing ($342,000) 99 State Board of Education Expenses ($63,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($25,000) Receipts from fees for school district personnel background checks and unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year of such receipts are appropriated for the operation of the criminal history review program. Such additional amounts as may be required for payments to arbitrators in accordance with section 22 of P.L.2012, c.26 (C.18A:6-17.1) are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Student Registration and Record System account is appropriated for the same purpose. Costs, including required enhancements and upgrades, attributable to the Statewide longitudinal data system, shall be paid from revenue received from the Special Education Medicaid Initiative (SEMI) program and are appropriated for these purposes to the Student Registration and Record System account upon recommendation from the Commissioner of Education, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In the event that revenues received from the Special Education Medicaid Initiative (SEMI) program are insufficient to satisfy costs, including required enhancements and upgrades, attributable to the Statewide longitudinal data system, there are appropriated to the Student Registration and Record System account such amounts as may be required as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. GRANTS-IN-AID 99-5095 Administration and Support Services $1,050,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Education Administration and Management $1,050,000 Grants-in-Aid: 99 Institute of Italian and Italian American Heritage Studies ($50,000) 99 Health Insurance Fund COVID-19 Reimbursements ($1,000,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount appropriated for Health Insurance Fund COVID-19 Reimbursements is to be used to reimburse the New Jersey Health Insurance Fund for costs incurred due to reimbursement of members' claims for COVID-19 surveillance testing. Department of Education, Total State Appropriation $21,018,647,000 Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated from the General Fund for the Department of Education, or otherwise available from federal resources, there are appropriated funds to establish the Office of School Preparedness and Emergency Planning within the Department of Education, to plan, coordinate, and conduct comprehensive school safety and preparedness assessments for schools and districts Statewide, in collaboration with law enforcement, the Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness, and the Governors School Security Task Force, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Subject to the availability of federal funds, the Commissioner of Education shall enter into a contract with a nonprofit entity, having the largest library of audio textbooks, for the provision of products and services to public schools to assist students who are unable to use standard text due to a learning disability, visual impairment, or a physical disability. The products and services to be provided may include, but need not be limited to, accessible, human-narrated audiobooks that are available through both mainstream and specialized devices, software capable of recording and reporting data for instructional purposes, and professional development opportunities for instructional and support staff. Upon the certification of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting of the availability of federal funds for the performance of the terms of such contract for the 2024-2025 school year, there is appropriated an amount of federal funds not less than $400,000 and not to exceed $1,500,000, subject to the approval of the director. In the event that sufficient funds are not appropriated to fully fund any State Aid item, the Commissioner of Education shall apportion such appropriation among the districts in proportion to the State Aid each district would have been apportioned had the full amount of State Aid been appropriated. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, should appropriations in the Property Tax Relief Fund exceed available revenues, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is authorized to transfer General Fund revenues into the Property Tax Relief Fund, provided that unrestricted balances are available from the General Fund, as determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting may transfer from one State Aid appropriations account for the Department of Education in the General Fund to another appropriations account in the same department in the Property Tax Relief Fund such funds as are necessary to effect the intent of the provisions of the appropriations act governing the allocation of State Aid to local school districts and to effect the intent of legislation enacted subsequent to the enactment of the appropriations act, provided that sufficient funds are available in the appropriations for that department. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 8 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-8), the June school aid payments are subject to the approval of the State Treasurer. From the amounts hereinabove appropriated, such amounts as are required to satisfy delayed June 2024 school aid payments are appropriated and the State Treasurer is hereby authorized to make such payment in July 2024, as adjusted for any amounts due and owing to the State as of June 30, 2024. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, payments from amounts hereinabove appropriated for State Aid may be made directly to the district bank account for the repayment of principal and interest and other costs, when authorized under the terms of a promissory note entered into under the provisions of section 1 of P.L.2003, c.97 (C.18A:22-44.2). Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Commissioner of Education may reduce the total State Aid amount payable for the 2024-2025 school year for a district in which an independent audit of the 2023-2024 school year conducted pursuant to N.J.S.18A:23-1 identifies any deviation from the Uniform Minimum Chart of Accounts after the recalculation of the district's actual Total Administrative Costs pursuant to N.J.A.C.6A:23A-8.3. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, any school district receiving a final judgment or order against the State to assume the fiscal responsibility for the residential placement of a special education student shall have the amount of the judgment or order deducted from the State Aid to be allocated to that district. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Commissioner of Education may withhold State Aid payments to a school district that has not submitted in final form the data elements requested for inclusion in a Statewide data warehouse within 60 days of the department's initial request or its request for additional information, whichever is later. In the event that sufficient balances are not available in the "School District Deficit Relief Account" for amounts recommended by the Commissioner of Education to the State Treasurer for advance State Aid payments in accordance with P.L.2006, c.15 (C.18A:7A-54 et seq.), the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is authorized to transfer such amounts as required from available balances in State Aid accounts. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there are appropriated such additional amounts as are required for the "School District Deficit Relief Account," as determined by the Commissioner of Education, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of "The State Facilities Education Act of 1979," P.L.1979, c.207 (C.18A:7B-1 et al.) and section 24 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-24), or any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount of the Department of Education State Aid appropriations made available to the Department of Human Services, the Department of Children and Families, the Department of Corrections or the Juvenile Justice Commission pursuant to P.L.1979, c.207 (C.18A:7B-1 et al.) to defray the costs of educating eligible children in approved facilities under contract with the applicable department shall be made at annual rate and payment schedule adopted by the Commissioner of Education and the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, tuition for pupils under contract for services at the Marie H. Katzenbach School for the Deaf, the Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired, or in a regional day school operated by or under contract with the Department of Human Services or the Department of Children and Families shall be withheld from State Aid and paid to the respective department. Notwithstanding the provisions of "The State Facilities Education Act of 1979," (SFEA) P.L.1979, c.207 (C.18A:7B-1 et al.) or any law or regulation to the contrary, funding forwarded to the Juvenile Justice Commission pursuant to subsection c. of section 6 of P.L.1979, c.207 (C.18A:7B-2) may be used to support the costs of SFEA students enrolled in a career and technical education program, an adult education assessment program, or a post-secondary dual and concurrent enrollment education program. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5) or any law or regulation to the contrary, for any district receiving Equalization Aid, Security Aid, Adjustment Aid, Special Education Categorical Aid, or Transportation Aid, no adjustments shall be made to State Aid amounts payable during the 2024-2025 school year based on adjustments to the 2023-2024 allocations using actual pupil counts. The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting may transfer from one appropriations account for the Department of Education in the Property Tax Relief Fund to another account in the same department and fund such funds as are necessary to effect the intent of the provisions of the appropriations act governing the allocation of State Aid to local school districts, provided that sufficient funds are available in the appropriations for that department. Summary of Department of Education Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services ........................................... $120,788,000 Grants-in-Aid ...................................................... $77,256,000 State Aid .............................................................. $20,820,603,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund ....................................................... $6,205,761,000 Property Tax Relief Fund .................................... $14,812,886,000 42  DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION 40 Community Development and Environmental Management 42  Natural Resource Management DIRECT STATE SERVICES 11-4870 Forest Resource Management $11,761,000 12-4875 Parks Management $45,970,000 13-4880 Hunters and Anglers License Fund $18,396,000 14-4885 Shellfish and Marine Fisheries Management $4,758,000 20-4880 Wildlife Management $1,903,000 21-4895 Natural Resources Engineering $1,683,000 24-4876 Palisades Interstate Park Commission $6,950,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Natural Resource Management $91,421,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($57,545,000) Employee Benefits ($1,931,000) Materials and Supplies ($5,312,000) Services Other Than Personal ($4,494,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($2,127,000) Special Purpose: 11 Fire Fighting Costs ($8,150,000) 12 Princeton Battlefield State Park ($13,000) 12 Green Acres/Open Space Administration ($6,687,000) 12 Blue Acres ($975,000) 20 Wildlife Management Grants/Technical Assistance ($660,000) 20 Endangered Species Tax Check-Off Donations ($469,000) 21 Dam Safety ($1,428,000) 12 Monmouth Battlefield State Park - State Land Acquisition Project ($100,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($1,530,000) In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Forest Resource Management, there is appropriated $800,000 from the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission. Receipts in excess of the amount anticipated from fees, leases and permit receipts from the use of Parks Management fees, leases, permits and marina rentals, and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year of such receipts, are appropriated for Parks Management, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Recreational Land Development and Conservation - Constitutional Dedication administrative account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Green Acres/Open Space Administration account may be provided as recommended by the Commissioner of the Department of Environmental Protection, in part, from five percent of any supplemental appropriations for the Preserve New Jersey Green Acres Fund or the Preserve New Jersey Blue Acres Fund, and the balance shall be transferred from the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund, the "Green Acres, Farmland, Blue Acres, and Historic Preservation Bond Act of 2007," and the "Green Acres, Water Supply and Floodplain Protection, and Farmland and Historic Preservation Bond Act of 2009," and any Green Trust Fund established pursuant to a Green Acres bond act to the General Fund, together with an amount not to exceed $403,000, and is appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection for Green Acres/Blue Acres/Open Space Administration, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Further, there are appropriated from the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund such amounts as may be required for the Departments administrative costs related to programs for buyout of flood-prone properties funded by the federal Disaster Relief Appropriations Act, 2013, provided that reimbursements to the Department of such costs from federal funding agencies shall be reimbursed to the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund. There is appropriated to the Delaware and Raritan Canal Commission such amounts as may be collected from permit review fees pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1974, c.118 (C.13:13A-12), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from police court, stands, concessions, and self-sustaining activities operated or supervised by the Palisades Interstate Park Commission, and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year of such receipts, are appropriated for the same purpose. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Hunters and Anglers License Fund, the first $13,514,000 is appropriated from that fund and any amount remaining therein and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year of the receipts in the Hunters and Anglers License Fund, together with any receipts in excess of the amount anticipated, are appropriated for the same purpose. If receipts to that fund are less than anticipated, the appropriation from the fund shall be reduced proportionately. Pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1993, c.303 (C.23:3-1f), there are appropriated such amounts as may be necessary to offset revenue losses associated with the issuance of free waterfowl stamps and hunting and fishing licenses to active members of the New Jersey National Guard and disabled veterans. The amount to be appropriated shall be certified by the Division of Fish and Wildlife and is subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Endangered Species Tax Check-Off Donations account is payable from receipts, and the unexpended balances in the Endangered Species Tax Check-Off Donations account at the end of the preceding fiscal year, together with Endangered Species Tax Check-Off receipts in excess of the amount anticipated, are appropriated for the same purpose. If receipts are less than anticipated, the appropriation shall be reduced proportionately. An amount not to exceed $4,568,000 is appropriated from the capital construction appropriation for Shore Protection Fund Projects for costs attributable to planning, operation, and administration of the shore protection program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. An amount not to exceed $1,418,000 is appropriated from the capital construction appropriation for Flood Control for costs attributable to the operation and administration of the State Flood Control Program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. An amount not to exceed $440,000 is appropriated from the capital construction appropriation for Shore Protection Fund Projects for the operation and maintenance of the Bayshore Flood Control facility. There is appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection from penalties collected under the "Safe Dam Act," P.L.1981, c.249 (C.58:4-8.1 et al.) and R.S.58:4-1 et seq., such amounts as may be necessary to remove dams that may be abandoned, have disputed ownership, or are not in compliance with current inspection or repair requirements. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year of such receipts are appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, from the Shore Protection Fund such additional amounts as are required to fund the Departments administrative costs related to the Departments oversight of flood control, coastal replenishment, and other projects funded by the federal "Disaster Relief Appropriations Act, 2013"; provided, however, that any reimbursements received by the State from the federal "Disaster Relief Appropriations Act, 2013" that reimburse the State for such departmental administrative costs shall be deposited in the Shore Protection Fund. In accordance with the "Dam, Lake, Stream, Flood Control, Water Resources, and Wastewater Treatment Project Bond Act of 2003," P.L.2003, c.162, an amount not to exceed $68,000 is appropriated from the 2003 Dam, Lake, Stream and Flood Control Project Fund-Flood Control account for administrative costs attributable to flood control and an amount not to exceed $255,000 is appropriated from the 2003 Dam, Lake and Stream Project Revolving Loan Fund-Dam Safety account for administrative costs attributable to dam safety, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 12-4875 Parks Management $4,751,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Natural Resource Management $4,751,000 Grants-in-Aid: 12 Public Facility Programming ($540,000) 12 Friends of the New Jersey School of Conservation ($2,800,000) 12 Washington Crossing Park Association, NJ - Nelson House Restoration ($111,000) 12 American Battlefield Trust - Princeton Battlefield State Park Capital Improvements ($1,300,000) Loan repayments received from dam rehabilitation projects pursuant to P.L.1999, c.347, and any unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year are appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. STATE AID 12-4875 Parks Management $8,500,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$8,500,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, Natural Resource Management $8,500,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$8,500,000) State Aid: 12 Grants for Urban Parks (PTRF) ($8,000,000) 12 Town of Clinton - Moebus Property Preservation Project (PTRF) ($500,000) The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Grants for Urban Parks (PTRF) account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION 21-4895 Natural Resources Engineering $69,500,000 Total Capital Construction Appropriation, Natural Resource Management $69,500,000 Capital Projects: 21 Shore Protection Fund Projects ($50,000,000) 21 Flood Control ($19,500,000) The amount hereinabove appropriated for Shore Protection Fund Projects is payable from the receipts of the portion of the realty transfer fee directed to be credited to the Shore Protection Fund pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1992, c.148 (C.13:19-16.1). An amount not to exceed $500,000 is allocated from the capital construction appropriation for Shore Protection Fund Projects for repairs to the Bayshore Flood Control facility. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Shore Protection Fund Projects, such additional amounts as may be required to provide the States matching funds share for federally authorized United States Army Corps of Engineers restoration and mitigation projects are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Flood Control, such additional amounts, as determined by the Commissioner of Environmental Protection, as may be required to provide the States matching funds share for federally authorized United States Army Corps of Engineers restoration and mitigation projects are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 43  Science and Technical Programs DIRECT STATE SERVICES 05-4810 Water Supply $13,628,000 07-4850 Water Monitoring and Resource Management $11,801,000 15-4890 Land Use Regulation and Management $15,932,000 18-4810 Science and Research $440,000 29-4850 Environmental Management and Preservation - Constitutional Dedication $16,172,000 90-4801 Environmental Policy and Planning $3,815,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Science and Technical Programs $61,788,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($25,560,000) Materials and Supplies ($463,000) Services Other Than Personal ($3,709,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($217,000) Special Purpose: 05 Trenton Water Works - Direct Operational Oversight ($3,000,000) 05 Water/Wastewater Operators Licenses ($43,000) 05 Safe Drinking Water Fund ($2,767,000) 07 Water Resources Monitoring and Planning ($5,369,000) 15 Tidelands Peak Demands ($4,161,000) 18 Hazardous Waste Research ($250,000) 29 Water Resources Monitoring and Planning - Constitutional Dedication ($16,172,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($77,000) The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Safe Drinking Water Fund account is appropriated from receipts received pursuant to the "Safe Drinking Water Act," P.L.1977, c.224 (C.58:12A-1 et seq.), together with an amount not to exceed $785,000, for administration of the Safe Drinking Water program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  If receipts are less than anticipated, the appropriation shall be reduced proportionately. Notwithstanding the provisions of the Spill Compensation and Control Act, P.L.1976, c.141 (C.58:10-23.11 et seq.), or any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Hazardous Waste Research account is appropriated from the available balance in the New Jersey Spill Compensation Fund for research on the prevention and the effects of discharges of hazardous substances on the environment and organisms, on methods of pollution prevention and recycling of hazardous substances, and on the development of improved cleanup, removal, and disposal operations, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Science and Research, an amount not to exceed $3,728,000 is appropriated from the Hazardous Discharge Site Cleanup Fund for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts in excess of those anticipated for Water Allocation fees, and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year of such receipts, are appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection to offset the costs of the Water Supply program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts in excess of the amounts anticipated for Well Permits, Well Drillers, Pump Installers Licenses, and the unexpended balances at the end of the preceding year of such receipts, are appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection for the Water Supply Program and for the Private Well Testing Program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts in excess of the amount anticipated from fees from the Water and Wastewater Operators Licensing program, and the unexpended balances at the end of the preceding year of such receipts, are appropriated subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Water Resources Monitoring and Planning - Constitutional Dedication shall be provided from revenue received from the Corporation Business Tax, pursuant to the "Corporation Business Tax Act (1945)," P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.), as dedicated by Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Water Resources Monitoring and Planning - Constitutional Dedication special purpose account is appropriated to be used in a manner consistent with the requirements of the constitutional dedication. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, funds appropriated in the Water Resources Monitoring and Planning - Constitutional Dedication special purpose account shall be made available to support nonpoint source pollution and watershed management programs, consistent with the constitutional dedication, within the Department of Environmental Protection, including amounts of $1,745,000 for New Jersey Geological Survey, $500,000 for Forest Resource Management, and an amount not to exceed $790,000 for the Department of Agriculture to support nonpoint source pollution control programs, at a level of $540,000, and the Conservation Assistance Program, at an amount not to exceed $250,000, on or before September 1, 2024, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts in excess of the individual amounts anticipated for "Coastal Area Facility Review Act," P.L.1973, c.185 (C.13:19-1 et seq.), Freshwater Wetlands, Stream Encroachment, Waterfront Development, and Wetlands fees, and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding year of such receipts, are appropriated for administrative costs associated with the Land Use Regulation and Management program classification, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Spill Compensation and Control Act," P.L.1976, c.141 (C.58:10-23.11 et seq.) and the "Safe Drinking Water Act," P.L.1977, c.224 (C.58:12A-1 et seq.), the Commissioner of Environmental Protection may utilize from the funds hereinabove appropriated from those sources such amounts as the commissioner may determine as necessary to broaden the Department's research efforts to address emerging environmental issues. In addition to the federal funds amount hereinabove appropriated for the Water Supply program classification, such additional amounts that may be received from the federal government for the Drinking Water State Revolving Fund program are appropriated for the same purpose. GRANTS-IN-AID The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Stormwater Management Grants account is appropriated for the same purpose. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Stormwater Management Grants and Watershed Restoration Projects programs, such amounts as are necessary or required may be transferred to the Water Resources Monitoring and Planning - Constitutional Dedication special purpose account, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Watershed Restoration Projects account is appropriated for the same purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to such amounts as may be authorized pursuant to separate legislation, there is appropriated to the Lake Hopatcong Commission $500,000 from the revenue derived from fees imposed and paid to the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission for power vessel operator licenses, to be credited to and deposited in the Lake Hopatcong Fund established pursuant to section 12 of P.L.2000, c.175 (C.58:4B-12) for the purposes of continuing operations of the Commission, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting; provided, however, that in the event that actual power vessel operator license fee collections are less than $500,000, there is appropriated such additional amounts from other revenues of the Motor Vehicle Commission as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting determines to be necessary to achieve a total amount of $500,000 to be credited to the Lake Hopatcong Fund. CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION 05-4810 Water Supply $54,600,000 Total Capital Construction Appropriation, Science and Technical Programs $54,600,000 Capital Projects: 05 Drinking Water and Clean Water Infrastructure ($54,600,000) 44  Site Remediation and Waste Management DIRECT STATE SERVICES 19-4815 Publicly-Funded Site Remediation and Response $10,589,000 23-4910 Solid and Hazardous Waste Management $5,740,000 27-4815 Remediation Management $35,703,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Site Remediation and Waste Management $52,032,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($7,361,000) Materials and Supplies ($146,000) Services Other Than Personal ($3,396,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($437,000) Special Purpose: 19 Cleanup Projects Administrative Costs ($10,589,000) 27 Hazardous Discharge Site Cleanup Fund  Responsible Party ($20,228,000) 27 New Jersey Spill Compensation Fund - Administrative Costs ($9,875,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, from the amounts hereinabove appropriated from the Hazardous Discharge Site Cleanup Fund and from the New Jersey Spill Compensation Fund, such amounts as are necessary are appropriated for costs associated with the Administration and Support Services program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove for the Hazardous Discharge Site Cleanup Fund - Responsible Party account is appropriated from responsible party cost recoveries and Licensed Site Remediation Professionals fees deposited into the Hazardous Discharge Site Cleanup Fund, together with an amount not to exceed $17,551,000 for administrative costs associated with the cleanup of hazardous waste sites, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove, there is appropriated to the Hazardous Discharge Site Cleanup Fund - Responsible Party account such additional amounts, as necessary, received from cost recoveries and from the Licensed Site Remediation Professionals fees and deposited into the Hazardous Discharge Site Cleanup Fund, for the cleanup of hazardous waste sites and the costs associated with the "Site Remediation Reform Act," P.L.2009, c.60 (C.58:10C-1 et seq.), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to site specific charges, the amount hereinabove for the New Jersey Spill Compensation Fund - Administrative Costs account is appropriated from the New Jersey Spill Compensation Fund, in accordance with the provisions of P.L.1976, c.141 (C.58:10-23.11 et seq.), together with an amount not to exceed $11,084,000 for administrative costs associated with the cleanup of hazardous waste sites, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts in excess of the amount anticipated from Solid Waste - Utility Regulation Assessments, and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year of such receipts, are appropriated to the Solid and Hazardous Waste Management program classification and "County Environmental Health Act," P.L.1977, c.443 (C.26:3A2-21 et seq.) agencies for costs incurred to oversee the State's recycling efforts and other solid waste program activities. In addition to the federal funds amount for the Publicly-Funded Site Remediation and Response program classification and the Remediation Management program classification, such additional amounts that may be received from the federal government for the Superfund Grants program are hereby appropriated for the same purpose. Receipts from the sale of salvaged materials are appropriated to offset costs incurred in the cleanup and removal of hazardous substances. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1954, c.48 (C.52:34-6 et seq.) or any other law to the contrary, monies appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection from the Clean Communities Program Fund shall be provided by the Department to the New Jersey Clean Communities Council pursuant to a contract between the Department and the New Jersey Clean Communities Council to implement the requirements of the Clean Communities Program pursuant to subsection d. of section 6 of P.L.2002, c.128 (C.13:1E-218). GRANTS-IN-AID 19-4815 Publicly-Funded Site Remediation and Response $250,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Site Remediation and Waste Management $250,000 Grants-in-Aid: 19 Replacement Firefighting Foam Grants (P.L.2023, c.243) ($250,000) The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Replacement Firefighting Foam Grants (P.L.2023, c.243) account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION 29-4850 Environmental Management and Preservation - Constitutional Dedication $54,985,000 Total Capital Construction Appropriation, Site Remediation and Waste Management $54,985,000 Capital Projects: 29 Hazardous Substance Discharge Remediation - Constitutional Dedication ($16,172,000) 29 Private Underground Storage Tank Remediation - Constitutional Dedication ($16,172,000) 29 Hazardous Substance Discharge Remediation Loans & Grants - Constitutional Dedication ($22,641,000) The amounts hereinabove appropriated for Hazardous Substance Discharge Remediation - Constitutional Dedication and Hazardous Substance Discharge Remediation Loans & Grants - Constitutional Dedication shall be provided from revenue received from the Corporation Business Tax, pursuant to the "Corporation Business Tax Act (1945)," P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.), as dedicated by Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Hazardous Substance Discharge Remediation - Constitutional Dedication, such amounts as necessary, as determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, are appropriated for site remediation costs associated with State-owned properties and State-owned underground storage tanks. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for Private Underground Storage Tank Remediation - Constitutional Dedication shall be provided from revenue received from the Corporation Business Tax, pursuant to the "Corporation Business Tax Act (1945)," P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.), as dedicated by Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution. Funds made available for the remediation of the discharges of hazardous substances pursuant to the amendments effective December 4, 2003, to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution and hereinabove appropriated, shall be appropriated to the New Jersey Economic Development Authority's Hazardous Discharge Site Remediation Fund and the Department of the Treasury's Brownfield Site Reimbursement Fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Except as otherwise provided in this act and notwithstanding the provisions of any other law or regulation to the contrary, cost recoveries, recoveries of natural resource damages received pursuant to judgments concluded prior to the effective date of Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 9 of the State Constitution, and other associated damages recovered by the State shall be deposited into the Hazardous Discharge Site Cleanup Fund established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1985, c.247 (C.58:10-23.34), and are appropriated for: direct and indirect costs of remediation, restoration, and clean up; costs for consulting, expert, and legal services incurred in pursuing claims for damages. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there are hereby appropriated from the Natural Resource Damages  Constitutional Dedication account such amounts as are required, as determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, in consultation with the Attorney General, and consistent with the requirements of the constitutional dedication pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 9 of the State Constitution, to pay the legal or other costs incurred by the State to pursue settlements and judicial administrative awards relating to natural resource damages. 45  Environmental Regulation DIRECT STATE SERVICES 01-4820 Radiation Protection and Quality Assurance $6,108,000 02-4825 Air Pollution Control $16,087,000 08-4891 Water Pollution Control $8,219,000 09-4860 Public Wastewater Facilities $3,469,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Environmental Regulation $33,883,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($19,863,000) Materials and Supplies ($164,000) Services Other Than Personal ($4,720,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($198,000) Special Purpose: 01 Nuclear Emergency Response ($1,898,000) 01 Quality Assurance - Lab Certification Programs ($1,797,000) 02 Pollution Prevention ($1,059,000) 02 Toxic Catastrophe Prevention ($1,105,000) 02 Worker and Community Right to Know Act ($824,000) 02 Oil Spill Prevention ($2,155,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($100,000) There are appropriated from the "Commercial Vehicle Enforcement Fund," established pursuant to section 17 of P.L.1995, c.157 (C.39:8-75), such amounts as may be necessary to fund the costs of the regulation of the Diesel Exhaust Emissions program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There are appropriated from the Nuclear Regulatory Commission - Agreement State account, such amounts as may be necessary to fund the costs of the Radiation Protection program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Nuclear Emergency Response account is payable from receipts received pursuant to the assessments of electrical utility companies under P.L.1981, c.302 (C.26:2D-37 et seq.). Receipts in excess of the amount anticipated, not to exceed $1,438,000, are appropriated. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Nuclear Emergency Response account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Pollution Prevention account is payable from receipts received pursuant to the "Pollution Prevention Act," P.L.1991, c.235 (C.13:1D-35 et seq.), together with an amount not to exceed $72,000, for administration of the Pollution Prevention program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. If receipts are less than anticipated, the appropriation shall be reduced proportionately. Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Worker and Community Right to Know Act," P.L.1983, c.315 (C.34:5A-1 et seq.), the amount hereinabove appropriated for the "Worker and Community Right to Know Act" account is payable out of the "Worker and Community Right to Know Fund," and the receipts in excess of the amount anticipated, not to exceed $735,000, are appropriated. If receipts to that fund are less than anticipated, the appropriation shall be reduced proportionately. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Oil Spill Prevention account is payable out of the New Jersey Spill Compensation Fund, and the receipts in excess of those anticipated, not to exceed $801,000, from the New Jersey Spill Compensation Fund for the Oil Spill Prevention program are appropriated, in accordance with the provisions of P.L.1990, c.76 (C.58:10-23.11f2 et seq.), P.L.1990, c.78 (C.58:10-23.11d1 et seq.), and section 1 of P.L.1990, c.80 (C.58:10-23.11f1), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection b. of section 1 of P.L.2005, c.202 (C.58:11B-10.2) or any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amount anticipated to the General Fund from the New Jersey Environmental Infrastructure Financing Program Administrative Fee, there is appropriated $2,600,000 to the Department of Environmental Protection for associated administrative and operating expenses, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts in excess of those anticipated from Air Pollution Fees - Minor Sources, and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year of such receipts, are appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection for expansion of the Air Pollution Control program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, there is appropriated $15,000,000 from the Clean Energy Fund to the Department of Environmental Protection for the purposes of supporting the Electric School Bus Program, established pursuant to P.L.2022, c.86 (C.26:2C-8.58). In addition to the federal funds amount for the Public Wastewater Facilities program classification, such additional amounts that may be received from the federal government for the Clean Water State Revolving Fund program are appropriated. GRANTS-IN-AID The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Electric Vehicle Charging Stations Program account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 46  Environmental Planning and Administration DIRECT STATE SERVICES 26-4805 Regulatory and Governmental Affairs $2,199,000 99-4800 Administration and Support Services $32,923,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Environmental Planning and Administration $35,122,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($23,207,000) Materials and Supplies ($397,000) Services Other Than Personal ($1,952,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($177,000) Special Purpose: 99 New Jersey Environmental Management System ($4,729,000) 99 Office of Climate Action and the Green Economy ($580,000) 99 Council on Green Jobs ($4,000,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($80,000) The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Office of the Records Custodian - Open Public Records Act account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Council on Green Jobs is appropriated from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund. STATE AID 99-4800 Administration and Support Services $8,411,000 (From General Fund:$6,815,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$1,596,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, Environmental Planning and Administration $8,411,000 (From General Fund:$6,815,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$1,596,000) State Aid: 99 Mosquito Control, Research, Administration and Operations (PTRF) ($1,596,000) 99 Administration and Operations of the Highlands Council ($3,066,000) 99 Administration, Planning and Development Activities of the Pinelands Commission ($3,749,000) Receipts from permit fees imposed by the Pinelands Commission on behalf of the Department of Environmental Protection, pursuant to a memorandum of agreement between the Pinelands Commission and the Department of Environmental Protection, are hereby appropriated to the Pinelands Commission. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Mosquito Control, Research, Administration and Operations (PTRF) account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Mosquito Control, Research, Administration and Operations (PTRF), no less than $250,000 shall be allocated for the activities of the State Mosquito Control Commission subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 47  Compliance and Enforcement DIRECT STATE SERVICES 02-4855 Air Pollution Control $5,116,000 04-4835 Pesticide Control $2,341,000 08-4855 Water Pollution Control $7,047,000 15-4855 Land Use Regulation and Management $3,152,000 23-4855 Solid and Hazardous Waste Management $6,560,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Compliance and Enforcement $24,216,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($18,279,000) Materials and Supplies ($196,000) Services Other Than Personal ($3,743,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($704,000) Special Purpose: 15 Tidelands Peak Demands ($1,294,000) Receipts in excess of the amount anticipated for Pesticide Control fees, and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year of such receipts, are appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, receipts deposited into the "Coastal Protection Trust Fund" pursuant to P.L.1993, c.168 (C.39:3-27.47 et seq.) shall be allocated in the following priority order and are appropriated in the amount of $485,000 for the cleanup or maintenance of beaches or shores, the amount of $90,000 for a program of grants for the operation of a sewage pump-out boat and the construction of sewage pump-out devices for marine sanitation devices and portable toilet emptying receptacles at public and private marinas and boatyards in furtherance of the provisions of P.L.1988, c.117 (C.58:10A-56 et seq.), the amount of $65,000 for the cost of providing monitoring, surveillance and enforcement activities for the Cooperative Coastal Monitoring Program, and the amount of $10,000 for the implementation of the "New Jersey Adopt a Beach Act," P.L.1992, c.213 (C.13:19-22 et seq.). Receipts deposited into the Coastal Protection Trust Fund in excess of $650,000, but not to exceed $1,000,000, will be distributed proportionately among the programs listed above in accordance with P.L.1993, c.168 (C.39:3-27.47 et seq.). The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year of the Coastal Protection Trust Fund may be reallocated for any of the purposes in this paragraph. Receipts deposited into the Coastal Protection Trust Fund in excess of $1,000,000 are appropriated to finance emergency shore protection projects and the cleanup of discharges into the ocean, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There is appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection, pursuant to R.S.12:5-6, all penalties, fines, recoveries of costs, and interest deposited to the "Cooperative Coastal Monitoring, Restoration and Enforcement Fund," established pursuant to subsection h. of section 18 of P.L.1973, c.185 (C.13:19-18), for the costs of coastal restoration projects, providing aircraft overflights for coastal monitoring and surveillance, and enforcement activities conducted by the Department, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. STATE AID 08-4855 Water Pollution Control $2,700,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$2,700,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, Compliance and Enforcement $2,700,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$2,700,000) State Aid: 08 County Environmental Health Act (PTRF) ($2,700,000) Department of Environmental Protection, Total State Appropriation $502,159,000 In the event that revenues are received in excess of the amount of revenues anticipated from Solid Waste Utility Regulation Assessments, Water Allocation, New Jersey Pollutant Discharge Elimination System/Stormwater Permits, Coastal Area Facility Review Act, Freshwater Wetlands Fees, Stream Encroachment, Waterfront Development Fees, Wetlands, Well Permits/Well Drillers/Pump Installers Licenses, Water/Wastewater Operators Licenses, Air Pollution Fees - Minor Sources, and Pesticide Control Fees, if the amounts of such unanticipated revenues exceed $8,224,000, the amounts of such unanticipated revenues in excess of $8,224,000 and any reappropriated balances are appropriated for information technology enhancements in the Department of Environmental Protection, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Private Underground Storage Tank Remediation - Constitutional Dedication account, an amount not to exceed $1,000,000 shall be allocated for costs associated with the State Underground Storage Tank Inspection Program, pursuant to the amendments effective July 1, 2015, to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution.  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Underground Storage Tank Inspection Program account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts in excess of the amount anticipated from New Jersey Pollutant Discharge Elimination System/Stormwater Permits, and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year of such receipts, are appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection to offset the costs of the Water Pollution Control Program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Tidelands Peak Demands accounts are payable from receipts from the sales, grants, leases, licensing, and rentals of State riparian lands. If receipts are less than anticipated, the appropriation shall be reduced proportionately. In addition, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $4,838,000 from the same source for other administrative costs, including legal services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, with regard to the fee-related appropriations provided hereinabove, the Commissioner of Environmental Protection shall obtain concurrence from the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting before altering fee schedules or any other revenue-generating mechanism under the Department's purview. Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Environmental Fee Accountability Act of 1991," P.L.1991, c.426 (C.52:27B-20.1 et seq.) and P.L.1991, c.427 (C.13:1D-9.1 et seq.), all revenues from fees and fines collected by the Department of Environmental Protection, unless otherwise herein dedicated, shall be deposited into the General Fund without regard to their specific dedication. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the federal fund amounts hereinabove appropriated for the programs included in the Performance Partnership Grant Agreement with the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the Department of Environmental Protection is authorized to reallocate the appropriations, in accordance with the grant agreement and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1954, c.48 (C.52:34-6 et seq.) or any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amounts appropriated for site remediation, the Department of Environmental Protection may enter into a contract with the United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) to provide the State's statutory matching share for EPA-led Superfund remedial actions pursuant to the State Superfund contract. Receipts in excess of $4,600,000 anticipated for Air Pollution Fines, Clean Water Enforcement Act, Stream Encroachment Fines, Waterfront Development Fines, Freshwater Wetlands Fines, Solid Waste Fines, and Hazardous Waste Fines, not to exceed $1,500,000, and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year are appropriated for the expansion of compliance, enforcement, and permitting efforts in the Department, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1954, c.48 (C.52:34-6 et seq.) or any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for water resource evaluation studies and monitoring, the Department of Environmental Protection may enter into contracts with the United States Geological Survey to provide the State's match to joint funding agreements for water resource evaluation studies and monitoring analyses. There is reappropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection an amount not to exceed $5,000,000 from the "Shore Protection Fund" established pursuant to the "Shore Protection Bond Act of 1983," P.L.1983, c.356, for the cost, as defined by that act, of State Projects, including State Projects to restore coastal protection systems and removal of sand from State waterways resulting from Superstorm Sandy, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There is hereby appropriated for the same purpose the unexpended balance of funds that were appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection from the 1996 Dredging and Containment Facility Fund, established pursuant to section 18 of the Port of New Jersey Revitalization, Dredging, Environmental Cleanup, Lake Restoration, and Delaware Bay Area Economic Development Bond Act of 1996," P.L.1996, c.70, to provide funding to the Department of Transportation for financing the cost of dredging navigation channels not located in the port region, as provided for in section 7 of P.L.1996, c.70, pursuant to a memorandum of understanding between the Department of Environmental Protection and the Department of Transportation, setting forth, among other things, a list of the channels to be dredged. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1954, c.48 (C.52:34-6 et seq.) or any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for environmental restoration and mitigation, the Department of Environmental Protection may enter into agreements with the United States Army Corps of Engineers to provide the State's matching share to any federally authorized restoration or mitigation projects. Summary of Department of Environmental Protection Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services ........................................... $298,462,000 Grants-in-Aid ...................................................... $5,001,000 State Aid .............................................................. $19,611,000 Capital Construction ........................................... $179,085,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund ....................................................... $489,363,000 Property Tax Relief Fund .................................... $12,796,000 46  DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 20 Physical and Mental Health 21 Health Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 01-4215 Vital Statistics $2,059,000 02-4220 Family Health Services $11,953,000 03-4230 Public Health Protection Services $14,487,000 05-4285 Community Health Services $10,305,000 08-4280 Laboratory Services $7,991,000 12-4245 HIV, STD, and TB Services $1,486,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Health Services $48,281,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($16,478,000) Materials and Supplies ($2,229,000) Services Other Than Personal ($2,949,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($1,730,000) Special Purpose: 02 WIC Farmers Market Program ($261,000) 02 Identification System for Children's Health and Disabilities ($300,000) 02 Maternal Feedback on Quality of Care Database ($1,200,000) 02 Healthy Corner Store Initiative (P.L.2019, c.15) ($1,750,000) 02 Breastfeeding Strategy Plan ($331,000) 02 Governor's Council for Medical Research and Treatment of Autism ($492,000) 02 Public Awareness Campaign for Black Infant Mortality ($500,000) 02 Implicit Bias Reduction Training ($450,000) 02 WIC Online Shopping Delivery Fees ($2,900,000) 02 Direct Service Workforce Development ($2,250,000) 02 Maternal Mortality Review Committee ($204,000) 03 Cancer Registry ($393,000) 03 Cancer Investigation and Education ($493,000) 03 Emergency Medical Services for Children ($50,000) 03 New Jersey Immunization Information Systems ($500,000) 03 Animal Welfare ($146,000) 03 Worker and Community Right to Know ($1,833,000) 05 Breast Cancer Public Awareness Campaign ($90,000) 05 New Jersey Commission on Cancer Research ($4,000,000) 05 Smoking Cessation and Prevention ($500,000) 05 Cancer Screening - Early Detection and Education Program ($5,000,000) 08 Tissue Bank Program (P.L.2017, c.247) (P.L.2019, c.268) (P.L.2022, c.106) ($406,000) 08 West Nile Virus - Laboratory ($630,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($216,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 5(c)(2) of P.L.2019, c.15 (C.24:4A-10) or any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Healthy Corner Store Initiatives is subject to the following condition: the maximum total grant amount available to qualified small food retailers shall not exceed $10,000 per retailer, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there is appropriated $500,000 from the Autism Medical Research and Treatment Fund for the operations of New Jersey's Autism Registry. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there are appropriated from the New Jersey Spinal Cord Research Fund such amounts as are necessary to support the award of grants for research on the treatment of spinal cord injuries, both traumatic and non-traumatic, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for WIC Online Shopping Delivery Fees shall be used to pay the costs of delivery fees incurred by WIC recipients for orders of groceries eligible under WIC and placed using online ordering platforms approved by the Commissioner of Health. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Sickle Cell Disease Pilot Program (P.L.2023, c.242) account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection c. of section 6 of P.L.1983, c.6 (C.52:9U-6), subsection c. of section 5 of P.L.2003, c.200 (C.52:9EE-5), subsection c. of section 5 of P.L.1999, c.201 (C.52:9E-5) and section 4 of P.L.1999, c.105 (C.30:6D-59) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated to the New Jersey State Commission on Brain Injury Research, New Jersey Commission on Spinal Cord Research, and the Governor's Council for Medical Research and Treatment of Autism are subject to the following condition: an amount from each appropriation, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, may be used to pay the salary and other benefits of one person who shall serve as Executive Director for all three entities, with the services of such person allocated to the three entities as shall be determined by the three entities. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there is appropriated $500,000 from the Autism Medical Research and Treatment Fund for the operations of the Governor's Council for Medical Research and Treatment of Autism. Receipts deposited into the Autism Medical Research and Treatment Fund are appropriated for the Governor's Council for Medical Research and Treatment of Autism, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there are appropriated from the Autism Medical Research and Treatment Fund such amounts as are necessary to support the award of grants for a Special Health Needs Medical Homes pilot program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there is appropriated $250,000 from the Autism Medical Research and Treatment Fund for the Autism New Jersey Helpline. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there are appropriated from the New Jersey Brain Injury Research Fund such amounts as are necessary to support the award of grants for research on the treatment of brain injuries, both traumatic and non-traumatic, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated, notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there is appropriated $154,000 from the "Emergency Medical Technician Training Fund" to fund the Emergency Medical Services for Children Program. Amounts deposited into the "New Jersey Breast Cancer Research Fund" from the gross income tax check-offs pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1995, c.26 (C.54A:9-25.7 et al.) are appropriated to the New Jersey State Commission on Cancer Research for breast cancer research projects, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Statewide Trauma Registry account are appropriated to implement a Statewide registry of hospitalization for traumatic injury, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Worker and Community Right to Know Act," P.L.1983, c.315 (C.34:5A-1 et seq.), the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Worker and Community Right to Know account is payable from the "Worker and Community Right to Know Fund." The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the New Jersey Emergency Medical Service Helicopter Response Program account is appropriated. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there are appropriated from the "Pilot Clinic Fund" such amounts as are necessary to pay the reasonable and necessary expenses of the "Animal Population Control Fund," subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from the agency surcharge on vehicle rentals pursuant to section 54 of P.L.2002, c.34 (C.App.A:9-78), not to exceed $4,890,000, are appropriated for the Medical Emergency Disaster Preparedness for Bioterrorism program and shall be deposited into a dedicated account, the expenditure of which shall be subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there is appropriated from the "Emergency Medical Technician Training Fund" $125,000 for Emergency Medical Services and $180,000 for the First Response EMT Cardiac Training Program. In the event that amounts available in the "Emergency Medical Technician Training Fund" are insufficient to support reimbursement levels of $1,500 for initial EMT training, while at the same time continuing to ensure funding for continuing EMT education at current levels, there are appropriated such amounts as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine to be necessary to maintain these increased levels for initial and continuing EMT training and education. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there is appropriated from the "Emergency Medical Technician Training Fund" $150,000 to support the web-based certification platform for all certified NJ Emergency Medical Services Personnel. In addition to the purposes set forth in section 2 of P.L.1993, c.227 (C.26:4-100.13), funds in the Hepatitis Inoculation Fund are appropriated and may be used for hepatitis prevention activities, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, $1,000,000 from the Cancer Research Fund established pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1982, c.40 (C.54:40A-37.1) is transferred to the General Fund. The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is empowered to transfer or credit appropriations to the Department of Health for diagnostic laboratory services provided to any other agency or department, provided that funds have been appropriated or allocated to such agency or department for the purpose of purchasing these services. Receipts from fees established by the Commissioner of Health for licensing of clinical laboratories, pursuant to P.L.1975, c.166 (C.45:9-42.26 et seq.), and blood banks, pursuant to P.L.1963, c.33 (C.26:2A-2 et seq.), are appropriated. Receipts from licenses, permits, fines, penalties, and fees collected by the Department of Health in health services, in excess of those anticipated, are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 02-4220 Family Health Services $214,965,000 (From General Fund:$214,449,000) (From Casino Revenue Fund:$516,000) 03-4230 Public Health Protection Services $81,181,000 05-4285 Community Health Services $3,450,000 12-4245 HIV, STD, and TB Services $33,898,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Health Services $333,494,000 (From General Fund:$332,978,000) (From Casino Revenue Fund:$516,000) Grants-in-Aid: 02 Family Planning Services ($30,029,000) 02 Maternal, Child and Chronic Health Services ($41,699,000) 02 Statewide Birth Defects Registry (CRF) ($516,000) 02 Bergen Volunteer Medical Initiative ($750,000) 02 Integrated Care Pilot Program for Military, Veterans, and First Responders ($400,000) 02 NJ Center for Tourette Syndrome and Associated Disorders ($455,000) 02 Samaritan - Expanded Access to Palliative Care ($1,000,000) 02 American Red Cross New Jersey Region ($1,500,000) 02 Poison Control Center ($587,000) 02 Family Planning Facilities Upgrades (HCFFA) ($10,000,000) 02 Early Childhood Intervention Program ($118,374,000) 02 Surveillance, Epidemiology, and End Results Expansion Program - CINJ ($2,055,000) 02 Adler Aphasia Center ($100,000) 02 Reach Out and Read New Jersey ($100,000) 02 Improving Veterans Access to Health Care ($2,500,000) 02 REED Next Autism Services Program ($900,000) 03 Cancer Institute Of New Jersey ($33,000,000) 03 South Jersey Cancer Program - Cooper University Healthcare ($32,400,000) 03 Cancer Institute of New Jersey - University Hospital Cancer Center Services ($1,000,000) 03 Cancer Institute of New Jersey - Colorectal and Lung Cancer, Service Expansion ($2,000,000) 03 Cancer Insitute of New Jersey - Pediatric Cancer Center ($10,000,000) 03 ScreenNJ ($1,000,000) 03 Worker and Community Right to Know ($281,000) 03 Public Health Infectious Disease Control ($1,500,000) 05 Implementation of Comprehensive Cancer Control Program ($1,000,000) 05 ALS Association ($500,000) 05 Pharmaceutical Services for Adults with Cystic Fibrosis ($100,000) 05 Ritesh Shah Charitable Pharmacy - Medication Support ($100,000) 12 North Jersey Community Research Initiative ($38,000) 12 HIV, STD, and TB Grants ($27,410,000) 12 Overdose Fatality Review Team ($1,500,000) 12 Harm Reduction Services ($4,500,000) 05 The Mo'Hair Foundation ($200,000) 05 Kindersmile Foundation ($250,000) 12 Hyacinth AIDS Foundation - Newark Clinic ($450,000) 05 Joan Dancy & PALS Foundation ($50,000) 02 Traumatic Brain Injury Center of Excellence at Complete Care ($4,000,000) 05 Matheny Medical and Educational Center - HVAC Replacement ($450,000) 05 Project H.O.P.E. ($800,000) Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Maternal, Child and Chronic Health Services, an amount may be transferred to Direct State Services in the Department of Health to cover administrative costs of the program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The Commissioner of Health shall, pursuant to applications, award funding for a pilot program for integrated health care for military, veterans, and first responders, to up to one health system or general hospital in the northern part of the State and up to one health system or general hospital in the southern part of the State. Receipts from the federal Medicaid (Title XIX) program for handicapped infants are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the ALS Association to provide support services to New Jersey residents, 50 percent shall be allocated to the Greater Philadelphia Chapter of the ALS Association to serve residents in southern New Jersey and 50 percent shall be allocated to the Greater New York Chapter of the ALS Association to serve residents in central and northern New Jersey. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Early Childhood Intervention Program, there is appropriated up to $4,000,000 from the Autism Medical Research and Treatment Fund for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting; provided, however, that such sums as are necessary to fund the Autism helpline and registry and any grant award approvals announced by the Governor's Council for Medical Research and Treatment of Autism after June 1, 2021 shall first be paid from the Autism Medical Research and Treatment Fund. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Early Childhood Intervention Program shall be conditioned on the Early Childhood Intervention Program's family cost sharing program involving a progressive charge for each hour of direct services provided to the child and/or the child's family in accordance with the child's Individualized Family Service Plan, based upon household size and gross income as set forth in the most recent published edition of the New Jersey Early Intervention System Family Cost Participation Handbook. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Early Childhood Intervention Program, such additional amounts as may be necessary are appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Early Childhood Intervention Program shall be conditioned on adherence to the requirements of the "Individuals with Disabilities Education Improvement Act of 2004," Pub.L. 108-446 (20 U.S.C.s.1400 et seq.), as amended, and part 303 of Title 34, Code of Federal Regulations, as set forth in the State Plan filed by the Early Childhood Intervention Program with the U.S. Department of Education, Office of Special Education Programs. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Surveillance, Epidemiology, and End Results Expansion Program-CINJ account, an amount may be transferred to Direct State Services in the Department of Health to cover administrative costs of the program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Improving Veterans Access to Health Care shall be used to support the costs of continued operations by the Vets4Warriors Program and any remaining amounts may be allocated by the Commissioner of Health on a competitive basis to fund initiatives to improve veterans' access to health care. Upon a determination by the Commissioner of Health, made in consultation with the State Treasurer, that additional State funding is necessary to reimburse centers for services to uninsured clients, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall authorize the appropriation of such sums as the commissioner determines are necessary for grants to federally qualified health centers. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 9 of P.L.2003, c.200 (C.52:9EE-9), there is appropriated from the New Jersey Brain Injury Research Fund the amount of $280,000 which shall be transferred to the Department of Human Services and allocated to the Brain Injury Alliance of New Jersey for specialized community-based services. There is appropriated $570,000 from the Alcohol Education, Rehabilitation and Enforcement Fund to fund the Fetal Alcohol Syndrome Program. From the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Cancer Institute of New Jersey, $250,000 is appropriated to the Ovarian Cancer Research Fund. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Cancer Institute of New Jersey (CINJ) shall be conditioned upon the following provision: no funds shall be expended except to support CINJ's infrastructure necessary to support cancer research, prevention, and treatment. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the South Jersey Cancer Program - Cooper University Healthcare account are appropriated to the program for cancer-related capital equipment, design, engineering, and construction expenses. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Cancer Institute of New Jersey- University Hospital Cancer Center Services is allocated to the Cancer Institute of New Jersey for the expansion of National Cancer Institute-designated Cancer Center services at University Hospital in Newark to attract clinical trials and advanced cancer care and prevention strategies to the Greater Newark Area with the goal of ensuring parity among cancer patients, including the underserved and underinsured populations. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Public Health Infectious Disease Control, up to $250,000 may be transferred to Direct State Services accounts in the Department of Health to cover administrative costs of the program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There are appropriated from the New Jersey Emergency Medical Service Helicopter Response Program Fund, established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1992, c.87 (C.26:2K-36.1), such amounts as are necessary to pay the reasonable and necessary expenses of the operation of the New Jersey Emergency Medical Service Helicopter Response Program, established pursuant to P.L.1986, c.106 (C.26:2K-35 et seq.), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. No funds hereinabove appropriated to the Department of Health shall be used for the Medical Waste Management Program. The Department of Health and the Department of Environmental Protection shall establish a transition plan to ensure provisions of the "Comprehensive Regulated Medical Waste Management Act," P.L.1989, c.34 (C.13:1E-48.1 et al.) are met. In order to permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations, amounts may be transferred between Direct State Services and Grants-In-Aid accounts within the HIV, STD, and TB Services program classification in the Department of Health, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notice thereof shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for HIV, STD, and TB Grants, savings realized from reduced transportation costs may be transferred to the AIDS Drug Distribution Program account, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in order to maximize prescription drug coverage under the Medicare Part D program established pursuant to the federal "Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003," the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the AIDS Drug Distribution Program (ADDP) shall not be spent unless the ADDP is designated as the authorized representative for the purposes of coordinating benefits with the Medicare Part D program, including enrollment and appeals of coverage determinations.  ADDP is authorized to represent program beneficiaries in the pursuit of such coverage.  ADDP representation shall not result in any additional financial liability on behalf of such program beneficiaries and shall include, but need not be limited to, the following actions: application for the premium and cost-sharing subsidies on behalf of eligible program beneficiaries; pursuit of appeals, grievances, or coverage determinations; and facilitated enrollment in a prescription drug plan or Medicare Advantage Prescription Drug plan. If any beneficiary declines enrollment in any Medicare Part D plan, that beneficiary shall be barred from all benefits of the ADDP Program. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated to the AIDS Drug Distribution Program (ADDP) is conditioned upon the Department of Health coordinating the benefits of ADDP with the prescription drug benefits of the Medicare Part D program, established pursuant to the federal "Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003," as the primary payer. The ADDP benefit and reimbursement shall only be available to cover the beneficiary cost share to in-network pharmacies and for deductible and coverage gap costs, as determined by the Commissioner of Health, associated with enrollment in Medicare Part D for ADDP beneficiaries, and for Medicare Part D premium costs for ADDP beneficiaries. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no funds appropriated in the AIDS Drug Distribution Program (ADDP) account shall be available as payment as an ADDP benefit to any pharmacy that is not enrolled as a participating pharmacy in a pharmacy network under the Medicare Part D program established pursuant to the federal "Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003." Commencing with the start of the fiscal year, and consistent with the requirements of the federal "Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003" (MMA), no funds hereinabove appropriated from the AIDS Drug Distribution Program (ADDP) account shall be expended for any individual enrolled in the ADDP program unless the individual provides all data necessary to enroll the individual in the Medicare Part D program established pursuant to the MMA, including data required for the subsidy assistance, as outlined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no amounts hereinabove appropriated for the AIDS Drug Distribution Program shall be expended for drugs used for the treatment of erectile dysfunction, or cosmetic drugs, including but not limited to drugs used for baldness and weight loss. STATE AID Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, none of the monies appropriated to the Department of Health are appropriated to public health priority programs under P.L.1966, c.36 (C.26:2F-1 et seq.) as amended. 22  Health Planning and Evaluation DIRECT STATE SERVICES 06-4260 Health Care Facility Regulation and Oversight $18,343,000 07-4270 Health Care Systems Analysis $1,753,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Health Planning and Evaluation $20,096,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($10,839,000) Materials and Supplies ($97,000) Services Other Than Personal ($6,881,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($185,000) Special Purpose: 06 Nursing Home Background Checks/Nursing Aide Certification Program ($954,000) 06 Implement Patient Safety Act ($390,000) 06 Substance Use Disorder and Mental Health Treatment Programs ($540,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($210,000) Receipts from fees charged for processing Certificate of Need applications and the unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year of such receipts are appropriated for the cost of this program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Revenues received from fees derived from the licensing of all community mental health programs as specified in N.J.A.C.10:190-1.1 et seq. are appropriated to the Health Care Facility Regulation and Oversight program classification to offset the costs of performing the required reviews. There are appropriated such sums as are required to the "Health Care Facilities Improvement Fund" to provide available resources in an emergency situation at a health care facility, as defined by the Commissioner of Health, or for closure of a health care facility, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 07-4270 Health Care Systems Analysis $581,707,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Health Planning and Evaluation $581,707,000 Grants-in-Aid: 07 Health Care Subsidy Fund Payments ($19,962,000) 07 Hospital Asset Transformation Program ($14,992,000) 07 Visiting Nurse Association of Central Jersey Community  Health Center - LGBTQ ($1,000,000) 07 Parker Health Clinic - Red Bank ($150,000) 07 Visiting Nurses Association of Central New Jersey Inc. - Children Family Health ($500,000) 07 Metropolitan Regional Diagnostic & Treatment Center - Newark Beth Israel Medical Center ($400,000) 07 Camden Coalition of Healthcare Providers-Pledge to Connect Pilot Program ($2,500,000) 07 Cooper University Healthcare-System of Care Model Program for Individuals with Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities ($1,000,000) 07 Cooper University Healthcare-Pediatric Mental Health Services ($2,000,000) 07 Robert Wood Johnson Barnabas Health - Community Health Projects ($50,000,000) 07 Valley Health System - Inpatient and Medical Department Expansion ($5,500,000) 07 City of Newark Access to Health Care Partnership ($30,000,000) 07 Graduate Medical Education ($336,500,000) 07 Holy Name Hospital, Teaneck - Palliative Care Pilot Program ($4,000,000) 07 Hackensack Meridian School of Medicine ($10,000,000) 07 Hunterdon County Medical Center - Mental Health & Substance Abuse Disorder Services ($250,000) 07 Quality Improvement Program - New Jersey (QIP-NJ) ($62,645,000) 07 Central Jersey Medical Center Integrated Behavioral Healthcare Clinic ($1,500,000) 07 The Childrens Hospital at Saint Peters University Hospital - Modernization and Expansion ($4,000,000) 07 Hackensack Meridian Jersey Shore University Medical Center - Maternal Health Services Expansion ($4,000,000) 07 CentraState Healthcare System - Fluoroscopy X-ray Imaging System ($500,000) 07 Englewood Health Physician Network - Asian Health and Wellness at Englewood Cliffs ($500,000) 07 Cooper University Hospital, Ronald McDonald House, Southern New Jersey, Camden - Facility Expansion ($750,000) 07 Overlook Medical Center Expansion ($10,000,000) Englewood Hospital and Medical Center - Advanced Medical Equipment ($1,000,000) 07 Virtua Health Maternal Behavioral Health Program ($750,000) 07 Inspira Health - Service Expansion ($1,000,000) 07 Deborah Heart and Lung Center ($308,000) 07 Hackensack Meridian Health - Drug Dispensing Technology ($3,000,000) 07 Hackensack University Medical Center for Community Impact Project Expansion ($2,500,000) 07 Saint Joseph's Hospital - Capital Improvements ($5,000,000) 07 Overlook Medical Center - Emergency Department Improvements ($5,500,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, any revenues collected from the tax on cosmetic medical procedures pursuant to P.L.2004, c.53 (C.54:32E-1) shall be deposited into the Health Care Subsidy Fund established pursuant to section 8 of P.L.1992, c.160 (C.26:2H-18.58) for the support of payments to federally qualified health centers. Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated to Robert Wood Johnson Barnabas Health - Community Health Projects and City of Newark Access to Health Care Partnership, amounts may be transferred to the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services, consistent with CMS guidelines, solely to maximize federal Medicaid payments to faculty physicians and non-physician professionals who are affiliated with Robert Wood Johnson Barnabas Health, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, as a condition of the receipt of any monies hereunder by an acute care hospital that is requesting an advance of charity care/NJ FamilyCare or payments from the "Health Care Facilities Improvement Fund" or any payments over and above this act, the hospital shall comply with a request by the Commissioner of Health for a review of its finances and operations to ensure that access to health care is maintained and public funds are utilized for their intended purposes. The cost of such review shall be borne by the acute care hospital and shall comply with any financial and operational performance requirements imposed by the commissioner as deemed necessary as a result of the review. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for Health Care Subsidy Fund Payments are conditioned upon the following provision: the Department of Health shall review, examine, or audit any and all financial information maintained by an acute care hospital to ensure appropriate use of public funds. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated from the Health Care Subsidy Fund for Charity Care payments are subject to the following conditions: (a) a disproportionate share hospital eligible for funding through the Charity Care program may decline all or part of its Charity Care payments for the fiscal year by notifying the Commissioner of Health on a form designated by the Department of Health on or before the fifteenth day following enactment. If a disproportionate share hospital declines Charity Care payments for the fiscal year the amount declined shall be redistributed in the following manner: the amount to be redistributed shall be distributed to the remaining eligible hospitals in proportion to its share of the original subsidy total to the other remaining eligible hospitals in accordance with the provisions of section 3 of P.L.2004, c.113 (C.26:2H--18.59i), as modified by this act, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting; and (b) a disproportionate share hospital that accepts Charity Care payments in the current fiscal year or in a prior fiscal year and is therefore determined through a hospital audit to have exceeded its hospital-specific disproportionate share hospital limit, potentially resulting in the State being required to reimburse the federal government, shall have its Charity Care payments reduced by the amount of any such required reimbursement. In the event that the hospital is determined to have exceeded its disproportionate share hospital limit by an amount greater than its Charity Care allocation for the current fiscal year, the entirety of its Charity Care allocation shall be withheld and the hospital shall be subject to such additional reductions or repayments, or both, as may be determined by the Commissioner of Health to be necessary to ensure compliance with federal and State requirements, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In the event that a disproportionate share hospital has its Charity Care payments reduced by the State pursuant to this paragraph, any amounts so reimbursed shall be redistributed  in the following manner: the amount to be redistributed shall be distributed to the remaining eligible hospitals proportional to each hospital's share of the Charity Care payment determined under this paragraph. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated from the Health Care Subsidy Fund for Charity Care payments are subject to the following condition: In a manner determined by the Commissioner of Health and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, eligible hospitals shall receive their charity care subsidy payments in two, equal lump sum payments, the first of which will occur in August covering the six-month period beginning July 1st through and including December 31st, and the second of which will occur in January covering the six-month period beginning January 1st through and including June 30th.  If an eligible hospital closes before June 30th, the hospital shall reimburse to the State upon closure any subsidy payments attributed on the normal monthly payment basis to after the hospitals date of closure. There are appropriated such additional sums as are required to pay all amounts due from the State pursuant to any contract entered into between the State Treasurer and the New Jersey Health Care Facilities Financing Authority pursuant to section 6 of P.L.2000, c.98 (C.26:2I-7.1) in connection with the Hospital Asset Transformation Program. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the appropriation for the Health Care Subsidy Fund Payments is subject to the following condition: the distribution of charity care subsidy payments shall be calculated using the following methodology: (1) each hospital shall be ranked in order of its hospital-specific, relative charity care percentage, or RCCP, based on the submitted 2022 Acute Care Hospital (ACH) Cost Reports, by dividing the amount of hospital-specific gross revenue for charity care patients by the hospital's total gross revenue for all patients; (2) the ten hospitals with the highest RCCP shall receive a charity care payment equal to 40 percent of each hospital's hospital-specific reimbursed documented charity care, except that such a hospital with an operating margin less than or equal to -15 percent shall receive a Charity Care reimbursement equal to 50 percent of their hospital-specific documented Charity Care, with operating margins being calculated using 2022 audited ACH cost reports with a numerator of Form L3, Line 34 minus Line 12, and a denominator of Form L3, Line 15 minus Line 12 minus Line 31; (3) notwithstanding the provisions of clause (2), the hospital with the highest hospital-specific reimbursed documented charity care in calendar year (CY) 2022 located in each of the ten municipalities in the State containing a hospital, with the lowest median annual household income according to the 2022 5-Year American Community Survey, shall receive a charity care payment equal to 30 percent of its hospital-specific reimbursed documented charity care; (4) an acute care hospital that is deemed to be a Disproportionate Share Hospital (DSH), according to s.1923(b) of the Social Security Act, as reported in Medicaid State Plan Rate Year ended June 30, 2018, shall also receive 30 percent of its CY 2022 hospital-specific documented charity care; and (5) a specialty heart hospital shall also receive 30 percent of its CY 2022 hospital-specific documented charity care. Any hospital that meets more than one of the categories pursuant to this paragraph shall only receive a Charity Care subsidy equal to the percentage of documented charity care that is the highest. Until approval by the federal government is received of the charity care subsidy payment methodology, State funds may be used to fund the entirety of the charity care subsidy using the methodology described above. The amount appropriated for City of Newark Access to Health Care Partnership shall support a program administered by Newark Beth Israel Medical Center, in partnership with University Hospital, to improve access to health care for the residents of the City of Newark.  The partnership shall present a report on the implementation and results of the program to the Commissioner of Health no later than May 30. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, and except as otherwise provided and subject to such modifications as may be required by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in order to achieve any required federal approval and full Federal Financial Participation, $34,000,000 from the amounts hereinabove appropriated from Graduate Medical Education (GME) shall be designated as Supplemental Graduate Medical Education Subsidy (GME-S), and shall be available to hospitals that meet the following eligibility criteria: (a) an eligible hospital has a Relative Medicaid Percentage (RMP) that is among the top fourteen acute care hospitals with a residency program; (b) the RMP is a ratio calculated using the 2022 Audited Acute Care Hospital (ACH) Cost Reports according to the DOH due date of August 31, 2022, as submitted by January 31, 2023 by each acute care hospital and audited by March 1, 2023; (c) the RMP numerator equals a hospitals gross revenue from patient care for Medicaid and Medicaid HMO payers as reported on Forms E5 and E6, Line 1, Column D & Column H; (d) the RMP denominator equals a hospitals gross revenue from patient care as reported on Form E4, Line 1, Column E; (e) for instances where hospitals that have a single Medicaid identification number submit a separate ACH Cost Report for each individually licensed hospital, the ACH Cost Report data for those hospitals shall be consolidated to the single Medicaid identification number; (f) the GME-S Subsidy shall be calculated using the same methodology as the GME Subsidy is calculated in this act, except the total amount of the GME-S Subsidy payments shall not exceed $34,000,000. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, and except as otherwise provided and subject to such modifications as may be required by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in order to achieve any required federal approval and full Federal Financial Participation, $218,000,000 from amounts hereinabove appropriated for Graduate Medical Education (GME) shall be designated the GME Subsidy, and shall be calculated as follows: (a) the subsidy payment shall be split into a Direct Medical Education (DME) portion and an Indirect Medical Education (IME) portion; (b) source data used for the GME calculation shall come from the Medicaid cost report for calendar year (CY) 2022 submitted by each acute care hospital by February 14,  2024 and Medicaid Managed Care encounter payments data for Medicaid and NJ FamilyCare clients as reported by insurers to the State for the following reporting period: services dates between January 1, 2022 and December 31, 2022; payment dates between January 1, 2022 and December 31,  2023; and a run-date of not later than  February 15,  2024; (c) in the event that a hospital reported less than 12 months of 2022 Medicaid costs, the number of reported months of data regarding days, costs, or payments shall be annualized. In the event the hospital completed a merger, acquisition, or business combination resulting in two cost reports filed during the calendar year, two cost reports will be combined into one or a supplemental cost report for the calendar year 2022 submitted by the affected acute care hospital by January 31, 2021 shall be used. In the event that a hospital did not report its Medicaid managed care days on the cost report utilized in this calculation, the Department of Health (DOH) shall ascertain Medicaid managed care encounter days for Medicaid and NJ FamilyCare clients as reported by insurers to the State as per source data defined in (b) above; (d) Medicaid managed care DME cost begins with the intern and residency program costs using the 2022 submitted Medicaid cost report total residency costs, reported on Worksheet B Pt I Column 21 Line 21 plus Worksheet B Pt I Column 22 Line 22 divided by the 2022 resident full time equivalent employees (FTE), reported on Worksheet S-3 Pt 1 Column 9 line 14 to develop an average cost per resident FTE for each hospital; (e) median cost per resident FTE is calculated based on the average cost per resident FTE for each hospital; (f) the median cost per resident FTE is multiplied by the 2022 resident FTEs reported on Worksheet S-3 Pt 1 Column 9 Line 14 to develop total median residency program cost for each hospital; (g) median residency costs are multiplied by the ratio of Medicaid managed care days, reported on Worksheet S-3 Column 7 Line 2, divided by the difference of total days, reported on Worksheet S-3 Column 8 Line 14, less nursery days, reported on Worksheet S-3 Column 8 Line 13 to determine the Medicaid managed care DME cost of each hospital; (h) Medicaid managed care IME cost is defined as the Medicare IME factor multiplied by Medicaid managed care encounter payments as per source data defined in (b) above; (i) the IME factor is calculated using the Medicare IME formula as follows: 1.35 * ((1 + x) ^0.405 - 1), in which x is the ratio of submitted IME resident FTEs reported on Worksheet S-3 Pt 1 Column 9 Line 14 divided by the difference of total available beds, reported on Worksheet S-3 Column 2 Line 14, less nursery beds, reported on Worksheet S-3 Column 2 Line 13; (j) total 2022 Medicaid managed care GME costs shall equal total 2022 Medicaid managed care IME costs plus total 2022 Medicaid managed care DME costs; (k) the 2022 total Medicaid managed care DME costs is divided by the total 2022 Medicaid managed care GME costs; (l) the DME allocation portion is calculated by multiplying the total subsidy amount by the ratio in (k) above; (m) each hospitals percentage of total 2022 Medicaid managed care DME costs shall be multiplied by the DME allocation to calculate its DME payment; (n) the 2022 total Medicaid managed care IME costs are divided by the total 2022 Medicaid managed care GME costs; (o) the IME allocation portion is calculated by multiplying the total subsidy amount by the ratio in (n) above; (p) each hospitals percentage of total 2022 Medicaid managed care IME costs shall be multiplied by the IME allocation to calculate its IME payment; (q) the sum of a hospitals DME and IME payments shall equal its subsidy payment. The total GME Subsidy amount and these payments shall not exceed $218,000,000 and shall be paid in 12 monthly payments; (r) in the event that a hospital believes that there are mathematical errors in the calculations, or data not matching the actual source documents used to calculate the subsidy as defined above, hospitals shall be permitted to file calculation appeals within 15 working days of receipt of the subsidy allocation letter. If upon review it is determined by the DOH that the error has occurred and would constitute at least a five percent change in the hospitals allocation amount, a revised industry-wide allocation shall be issued; (s) each hospital receiving a GME allocation shall, on or before May 31, 2025, provide a report to the Commissioner of Health indicating the total number of physicians who completed their training during the preceding calendar year, and the number of those physicians who plan to practice medicine within the State of New Jersey. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Graduate Medical Education (GME) is subject to the following condition: participating hospitals shall provide to residents and fellows participating in the GME program instruction concerning prevention of opioid addiction as well as diagnosis, assessment, and treatment strategies: provided, however, that such instruction may also be provided to other students and providers including, but not limited to, physicians, nurses, pharmacists, and social workers, working within the hospital or in the outpatient setting. To satisfy this condition, participating hospitals may develop an internal training program, enter into a partnership with a school or university, or provide financial support for residents and fellows to participate in independent educational programs or conferences that provide continuing medical education credits that are specifically focused in the subject area of addiction. To document compliance, participating hospitals shall complete a report to the Department of Health no later than May 31, 2025. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, and except as otherwise provided and subject to such modifications as may be required by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in order to achieve any required federal approval and full Federal Financial Participation, $84,500,000 from the amounts hereinabove appropriated from Graduate Medical Education (GME) shall be designated as Trauma Center Graduate Medical Education Subsidy (GME-T), and shall be available to hospitals that have a residency program and are designated as Level 1 or Level 2 Trauma Centers by the Department of Health.  The GME-T Subsidy shall be calculated using the same methodology as the GME Subsidy is calculated in this act, except the total aggregate amount of the GME-T Subsidy payments to eligible hospitals shall not exceed $84,500,000. In order to permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations and ensure timely payments to hospitals, amounts may be transferred from the State, dedicated, and federal Quality Improvement Program  New Jersey (QIP  NJ) program accounts to the General Medical Services program classification in the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services in the Department of Human Services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Funds appropriated to Hackensack Meridian School of Medicine are authorized to be used as necessary by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting and the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services, to the extent allowed pursuant to federal law and consistent with Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services guidelines, solely to maximize federal Medicaid payments to faculty physicians and non-physician professionals who are affiliated with the aforementioned medical school. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Health Care Systems Analysis, an amount not to exceed $1,000,000 is appropriated from amounts assessed and collected by the Department of Banking and Insurance pursuant to section 9 of P.L.2007, c.330 (C.17:1D-2), for the purpose of funding costs associated with the development and maintenance of the New Jersey Health Information Network, subject to a plan prepared by the Department of Health and approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 23 Behavioral Health Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 15-4291 Patient Care and Health Services $312,180,000 99-4291 Administration and Support Services $61,158,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Behavioral Health Services $373,338,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($344,299,000) Materials and Supplies ($12,441,000) Services Other Than Personal ($7,945,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($3,783,000) Special Purpose: 15 Interim Assistance ($654,000) 15 Medical Security Officer Units Pilot ($3,200,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($1,016,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated to Greystone Psychiatric Hospital, such additional amounts as may be necessary are appropriated for the J.M., S.C., A.N., and P.T. et al. v. Elnahal, et al. settlement, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Division of Behavioral Health Services for State facility operations and the amount appropriated as State Aid for the costs of county facility operations are first charged to the federal disproportionate share hospital (DSH) reimbursements anticipated as Medicaid uncompensated care. As such, DSH revenues earned by the State related to services provided by county psychiatric hospitals which are supported through this State Aid appropriation, shall be considered as the first source supporting the State Aid appropriation. Receipts to the General Fund from charges to residents' trust accounts for maintenance costs are appropriated for use as personal needs allowances for residents who have no other source of funds for these purposes; except that the total amount herein for these allowances shall not exceed $450,000 and any increase in the maximum monthly allowance shall be approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. To effectuate the orderly consolidation or closure of a psychiatric hospital, amounts hereinabove appropriated for the State psychiatric hospitals may be transferred to accounts throughout the Department of Health in accordance with the plan adopted pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1996, c.150 (C.30:1-7.4) to consolidate or close a State psychiatric hospital, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Interim Assistance program accounts in the mental health institutions are appropriated for the same purpose. Receipts recovered from advances made under the Interim Assistance program in the mental health institutions are appropriated for the same purpose. In order to permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations, amounts may be transferred to and from the various items of appropriation within the Patient Care and Health Services and Administration and Support Services program classifications within the psychiatric hospitals accounts, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 4299 Division of Behavioral Health Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 99-4299 Administration and Support Services $8,726,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Division of Behavioral Health Services $8,726,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($4,972,000) Materials and Supplies ($18,000) Services Other Than Personal ($303,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($37,000) Special Purpose: 99 Office of Long-Term Care Resiliency ($1,100,000) 99 Mission Critical Long-Term Care Team ($2,224,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($72,000) 25  Health Administration DIRECT STATE SERVICES 11-4297 Office of the Chief State Medical Examiner $4,334,000 99-4210 Administration and Support Services $25,071,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Health Administration $29,405,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($17,620,000) Materials and Supplies ($63,000) Services Other Than Personal ($1,264,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($5,000) Special Purpose: 11 State Medical Examiner Opioid Detection ($1,200,000) 99 Office of Minority and Multicultural Health ($1,462,000) 99 Centralized Analytics Hub ($750,000) 99 Maternal Data Center and NJ Report Card of Hospital Maternity Care ($630,000) 99 Office of Healthcare Affordability and Transparency ($1,125,000) 99 Stillbirth Prevention Public Health Campaign ($100,000) 99 Integrated Population Health Data Project ($400,000) 99 Substance Use Disorder Health Information Technology Interoperability Project ($2,700,000) 99 Opioid Reduction Options Project ($500,000) 99 Single License for Primary Care, Mental Health Care and Substance Use Disorder Treatment ($1,306,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($280,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, from the amount hereinabove appropriated for Administration and Support Services, the Division of Public Health in the Department of Health, in collaboration with the Division of Consumer Affairs and the State Board of Medical Examiners and the New Jersey Board of Nursing, shall establish and publicize best practices, including funding mechanisms, for local boards of health to actively engage with local primary care physicians and nurses to address public health at the local level and further public health campaigns. Department of Health, Total State Appropriation $1,395,047,000 Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.2005, c.237 or any other law or regulation to the contrary, $32,000,000 from the surcharge on each general hospital and each specialty heart hospital is appropriated to fund federally qualified health centers. Any unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Health Care Subsidy Fund received through the hospital and other health care initiatives account during the preceding fiscal year is appropriated for payments to federally qualified health centers. Receipts from licenses, permits, fines, penalties, and fees collected by the Department of Health, in excess of those anticipated, are appropriated, subject to a plan prepared by the department and approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 7 of P.L.1992, c.160 (C.26:2H-18.57) or any law or regulation to the contrary, the first $1,200,000 in per adjusted admission charge assessment revenues, attributable to $10 per adjusted admission charge assessments made by the Department of Health, shall be anticipated as revenue in the General Fund available for health-related purposes.  Furthermore, the remaining revenue attributable to this fee shall be available to carry out the provisions of section 7 of P.L.1992, c.160 (C.26:2H-18.57), as determined by the Commissioner of Health, and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the State Treasurer shall transfer to the Health Care Subsidy Fund, established pursuant to section 8 of P.L.1992, c.160 (C.26:2H-18.58), only those additional revenues generated from third party liability recoveries, excluding NJ FamilyCare, by the State arising from a review by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting of hospital payments reimbursed from the Health Care Subsidy Fund with service dates that are after the date of enactment of P.L.1996, c.29. Any change in program eligibility criteria and increases in the types of services or rates paid for services to or on behalf of clients for all programs under the purview of the Department of Health, not mandated by federal law, first shall be approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, fees, fines, penalties and assessments owed to the Department of Health shall be offset against payments due and owing from other appropriated funds. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated, receipts from the federal Medicaid (Title XIX) program for health services-related programs throughout the Department of Health are appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated to the Office of the Chief State Medical Examiner, there are appropriated to the respective State departments and agencies such amounts as may be received or receivable from any instrumentality, municipality, or public authority for direct and indirect costs of all services furnished thereto, except as to such costs for which funds have been included in appropriations otherwise made to the respective State departments and agencies as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. Summary of Department of Health Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services ........................................... $479,846,000 Grants-in-Aid ...................................................... $915,201,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund ....................................................... $1,394,531,000 Casino Revenue Fund .................................... $516,000 54  DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES 20 Physical and Mental Health 23 Behavioral Health Services 7700  Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 09-7700 Addiction Services $22,215,000 99-7700 Administration and Support Services $17,263,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services $39,478,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($13,618,000) Materials and Supplies ($73,000) Services Other Than Personal ($3,152,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($149,000) Special Purpose: 09 Medication Assisted Treatment - Training for Medical Professionals ($850,000) 09 Reducing Opioid Rx in Hospital Emergency Rooms ($188,000) 09 County Jail Medication Assisted Treatment Initiative ($5,400,000) 09 Interim Managing Entity Expansion ($1,181,000) 09 Information Technology Enhancements - Community Based Substance Use Disorder Providers ($425,000) 09 Addictions Public Awareness and Media Campaign ($1,000,000) 09 Substance Exposed Infants ($6,105,000) 09 Supportive Housing Subsidies ($3,291,000) 09 Recovery Housing ($525,000) 09 Expansion of Opioid Recovery Pilot Program ($3,250,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($271,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Expanded Addiction Initiatives shall be used to develop, support, and expand programs and services, including providing grants to entities providing such programs and services, that the Commissioner of Health, the Commissioner of Human Services, the Commissioner of Corrections, and the Commissioner of Children and Families determine to be most effective in directly addressing the Statewide public health crisis associated with substance use disorders, including opioid use disorder, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Such programs and services may include, but shall not be limited to, efforts to improve access to community-based behavioral health care, develop the States anti-addiction infrastructure, support enhanced integration of care, provide medication-assisted treatment to incarcerated persons prior to release as recommended by a physician, and address relevant social and economic factors; the amount appropriated may be expended or transferred. There are appropriated from the "Alcohol Education, Rehabilitation and Enforcement Fund" such amounts as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of P.L.1983, c.531 (C.26:2B-32 et seq.). Notwithstanding the provisions of the New Jersey Cannabis Regulatory, Enforcement Assistance, and Marketplace Modernization Act, P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I--31 et al, there is appropriated $1,000,000 from Cannabis Regulatory, Enforcement Assistance, and Marketplace Modernization Fund to fund the Partnership for a Drug Free New Jersey. GRANTS-IN-AID 08-7700 Community Services $421,194,000 09-7700 Addiction Services $51,507,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services $472,701,000 Grants-in-Aid: 08 Community Care ($365,957,000) 08 Univ. Behavioral Healthcare Centers - Newark (Rutgers, the State University) ($6,251,000) 08 Univ. Behavioral Healthcare Centers - Piscataway (Rutgers, the State University) ($11,945,000) 08 Gun Violence and Suicide Prevention Grant ($250,000) 08 Justice Involved Mental Health Pilot ($1,600,000) 08 Monmouth Mental Health Association ($125,000) 08 Bilingual Mental Health Professional Residencies ($800,000) 08 9-8-8 Mental Health Crisis and Suicide Prevention Hotline ($28,824,000) 08 Mental Health Professionals Capacity Expansion Initiatives ($4,592,000) 09 Substance Use Disorder Treatment for DCP&P/Work-First Mothers ($1,401,000) 09 Community Based Substance Use Disorder Treatment and Prevention - State Share ($41,979,000) 09 Medication Assisted Treatment Initiative ($5,805,000) 09 Compulsive Gambling ($683,000) 09 Mutual Agreement Parolee Rehabilitation Project for Substance Use Disorders ($1,239,000) 09 Mental Health Association of Essex and Morris County ($150,000) 08 Sloan Kettering Middletown - Mental Health Services ($100,000) 08 Open Heart Yoga - Mental Health Counseling Services ($100,000) 09 SONORA Remote Methadone Dosing Pilot Program ($250,000) 08 NJ 2-1-1 Partnership Operating Aid ($650,000) An amount not to exceed $2,490,000 may be transferred from the Community Care account to the Health Care Subsidy Fund Payments account in the Department of Health, to increase the Mental Health Subsidy Fund portion of this account in order to maintain an amount not to exceed the fiscal 2008 per bed allocation for Short-Term Care Facility (STCF) beds, for new STCF beds which opened after January 1, 2008, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In order to permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations and assure timely payment to service providers during the conversion to a fee-for-service reimbursement structure, funds may be transferred from the Community Care account to the Division of Childrens System of Care in the Department of Children and Families to support mental health treatment programs for children, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Community Care, an amount not to exceed $250,000, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, shall be allocated to support the Rabbinical College of America/Chabad of New Jersey mental health initiative to provide mental health training and workshops to promote mental health awareness. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Community Care, an amount not to exceed $250,000, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, shall be allocated to Seton Hall University to support the Great Minds Dare to Care initiative to support a comprehensive and collaborative suicide prevention initiative and promote the reduction of stigma surrounding mental health. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Community Care, $4,000,000 is allocated for the Psychiatry Residency Expansion Program and shall be made available by the Department of Human Services to existing accredited New Jersey psychiatry residency training programs that have maximized Medicare funding available for this purpose. Funding shall be available on a competitive basis for the sole purpose of supporting new four-year residency slots that supplement existing psychiatry resident training slots including those both publicly funded and those supported with non-governmental funds, within the limits of the available appropriation. Funded resident training shall include training in and the provision of services at standard reimbursement rates to uninsured and underinsured individuals served by the Department, including individuals with mental health and substance use disorders and individuals dually diagnosed with mental health conditions and intellectual and developmental disabilities. In order to permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations and assure timely payment to service providers, funds may be transferred within the Grants-In-Aid accounts within the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services, in a cumulative amount not to exceed $5,000,000, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In order to permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations and ensure the timely payment of claims to providers of mental health and substance use disorder services, amounts may be transferred to and from the various items of appropriation within the General Medical Services program classification in the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services and the Community Services and Addiction Services program classifications in the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Justice Involved Mental Health Pilot program shall be made available to fund no less than two county-based pilot programs designed to serve clients with mental health conditions. Part of this amount shall be allocated to the Mental Health Association of Essex and Morris, Inc. to implement a pilot program in Morris County. The remaining amount shall be allocated to at least one other county-based pilot program in a county selected pursuant to a competitive process as determined by the Commissioner of Human Services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount appropriated for Mental Health Professional Capacity Expansion Initiatives is allocated as follows: $2,852,000 for the cost to add seven new medical residency positions; $920,000 to add four new child and adolescent psychiatry fellowship positions; $720,000 to support the new residency positions supported herein; and $100,000 for outreach to medical students to promote new residency positions in the State, with a focus on outreach to underrepresented in medicine students. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1998, c.149 or any law or regulation to the contrary, $400,000 is appropriated from the "Body Armor Replacement Fund" to the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services for the purposes of the Law Enforcement Officer Crisis Intervention Services Hotline and the reporting and operations of the Cop 2 Cop program. In order to permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations and ensure the timely payment of claims to providers of medical services, the amounts hereinabove appropriated may be transferred from the Substance Use Disorder Treatment for DCP&P/Work-First Mothers, Community Based Substance Use Disorder Treatment and Prevention - State Share, Medication Assisted Treatment Initiative, and Mutual Agreement Parolee Rehabilitation Project for Substance Use Disorders accounts in the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services to the various items of appropriation within the General Medical Services program classification in the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  Notice thereof shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Substance Use Disorder Treatment for DCP&P/Work-First Mothers, Community Based Substance Use Disorder Treatment and Prevention - State Share, Medication Assisted Treatment Initiative, and Mutual Agreement Parolee Rehabilitation Project for Substance Use Disorders are subject to the following condition: all providers of addiction services under these programs shall be required, not later than January 1, 2015, to enroll as NJ FamilyCare providers and to bill the State NJ FamilyCare program for all appropriate services provided to eligible beneficiaries who are covered under the Medicaid State Plan. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Community Based Substance Use Disorder Treatment and Prevention - State Share account, an amount not to exceed $1,500,000, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, shall be allocated to the New Bridge Medical Center for the provision of addiction services. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Community Based Substance Use Disorder Treatment and Prevention - State Share, an amount not to exceed $500,000 is appropriated to support a pilot Medication Assisted Treatment program to serve individuals reintegrating into society, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law or regulation to the contrary, monies in the "Alcohol Treatment Programs Fund" established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2001, c.48 (C.26:2B-9.2), and the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Community Based Substance Use Disorder Treatment and Prevention - State Share, are hereby appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, for the purpose of engaging the Division of Property Management and Construction (DPMC) to retain architects and consultants as deemed necessary by DPMC to review the proposed plans for capital construction projects for facilities providing addiction treatment services submitted by providers of addiction treatment services to the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services to enable DPMC to determine the best facility layout at the lowest possible cost, to monitor the capital projects during design and construction, to provide assistance to the grantee with respect to the undertaking of the capital projects, and to advise the Assistant Commissioner or designee of the Department of Human Services as may be required. Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Community Based Substance Use Disorder Treatment and Prevention - State Share, an amount not to exceed $7,902,000 may be transferred to the Division of Children's System of Care in the Department of Children and Families to support substance use disorder treatment programs as specified in the Memorandum of Agreement between the Department of Human Services and the Department of Children and Families, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Community Based Substance Use Disorder Treatment and Prevention -- State Share, an amount not to exceed  $1,000,000, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, shall be allocated to New Beginnings to provide support for addiction, housing, and rehabilitation services in South Jersey. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year of appropriations made to the Department of Human Services by section 20 of P.L.1989, c.51 for State-licensed or approved drug use disorder prevention and treatment programs is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Compulsive Gambling, an amount not to exceed $200,000 is appropriated from the annual assessment against permit holders to the Department of Human Services for prevention, education, and treatment programs for compulsive gambling pursuant to the provisions of section 34 of P.L.2001, c.199 (C.5:5-159), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Compulsive Gambling, an amount equal to one-half of forfeited winnings collected by the Division of Gaming Enforcement, not to exceed $50,000 annually, shall be deposited into the State General Fund for appropriation to the Department of Human Services to provide funds for compulsive gambling treatment and prevention programs, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2001, c.39 (C.5:12-71.3), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, such amounts as are determined by the Director of Budget and Accounting, in consultation with the Chief Administrator of the Motor Vehicle Commission, to be necessary to supplement any anticipated shortfall in funds appropriated for transfer to the "Alcohol Treatment Programs Fund" from the "Motor Vehicle Surcharges Revenue Fund," not to exceed $7,500,000, are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services and the Community Services and Addictions Services program classifications within the Department of Human Services, are subject to the following condition: notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary and subject to any required federal approval, the Commissioner of Human Services shall implement a new rate methodology as part of the ongoing fee-for-service conversion, which implementation may include, but need not be limited to, modifications to reimbursement levels, as well as contract and service modifications, with respect to mental health and substance use disorder services. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1983, c.531 (C.26:2B-32 et seq.) or any law or regulation to the contrary, the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the "Alcohol Education, Rehabilitation and Enforcement Fund" is appropriated and shall be distributed to counties for the treatment of alcohol and drug use disorders and for education purposes, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There is appropriated $420,000 from the "Alcohol Education, Rehabilitation and Enforcement Fund" to fund the Local Alcoholism Authorities-Expansion Program. STATE AID 08-7700 Community Services $146,164,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$146,164,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services $146,164,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$146,164,000) State Aid: 08 Support of Patients in County Psychiatric Hospitals (PTRF) ($146,164,000) The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Support of Patients in County Psychiatric Hospitals account is appropriated for the same purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S.30:4-78, or any law or regulation to the contrary, the State share of payments from the Support of Patients in County Psychiatric Hospitals account to the several county psychiatric facilities on behalf of the reasonable cost of maintenance of patients deemed to be county indigents shall be at the rate of 125 percent of the rate established by the Commissioner of Human Services, in consultation with the Commissioner of Health, for the period July 1 to December 31 and at the rate of 45 percent of the rate established by the Commissioner of Human Services, in consultation with the Commissioner of Health, for the period January 1 to June 30 such that the total amount to be paid by the State on behalf of county indigent patients for the calendar year shall not exceed 85 percent of the total reasonable per capita cost; and further provided that the rate at which the State will reimburse the county psychiatric hospitals shall not exceed 100 percent of the per capita rate at which each county pays to the State for the reasonable cost of maintenance and clothing of each patient residing in a State psychiatric facility, excluding the depreciation, interest and carry-forward adjustment components of this rate, and including the depreciation, interest, and carry-forward adjustment components of each individual county psychiatric hospital's rate established for the period January 1 to December 31 by the Commissioner of Human Services in consultation with the Commissioner of Health. The initial determination of whether a county hospital rate exceeds the per capita rate that counties pay to the State on behalf of applicable patients residing in a State psychiatric facility will be based on a comparison of estimated cost used to set reimbursement rates for the upcoming calendar year. A second comparison of the actual per diem costs of the county psychiatric hospital and State psychiatric hospitals will be completed after actual cost reports for the period are available including an inflationary adjustment for the six-month difference in fiscal reporting periods between State and county hospitals. The county hospital carry-forward adjustment to be included in rates paid by the State will exclude costs found to exceed 100 percent of the actual cost rate of the State psychiatric facilities. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Support of Patients in County Psychiatric Hospitals is conditioned upon the following provision: payments to county psychiatric hospitals will only be made after receipt of their claims by the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services. County psychiatric hospitals shall submit such claims no less frequently than quarterly and within 15 days of the close of each quarter. With the exception of all past, present, and future revenues representing federal financial participation received by the State from the United States that is based on payments to hospitals that serve a disproportionate share of low-income patients, which shall be retained by the State, the sharing of revenues received to defray the State Aid appropriation for the costs of maintaining patients in State and county psychiatric hospitals shall be based on the same percent as costs are shared between the State and counties. The amount hereinabove appropriated for State Aid reimbursement payments for maintenance of patients in county psychiatric facilities shall be limited to inpatient services only, except that such reimbursement shall be paid to a county for outpatient and partial hospitalization services as defined by the Department of Human Services, if outpatient and/or partial hospitalization services had been previously provided at the county psychiatric facility prior to January 1, 1998. These outpatient and partial hospitalization payments shall not exceed the amount of State Aid funds paid to reimburse outpatient and partial hospitalization services provided during calendar year 1997. In addition, any revision or expansion to the number of inpatient beds or inpatient services provided at such hospitals which will have a material impact on the amount of State Aid payments made for such services, must first be approved by the Department of Human Services before such change is implemented. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services for State facility operations and the amount appropriated as State Aid for the costs of county facility operations are first charged to the federal Disproportionate Share Hospital (DSH) reimbursements anticipated as Medicaid uncompensated care. Accordingly, DSH revenues earned by the State related to services provided by county psychiatric hospitals which are supported through this State Aid appropriation shall be considered as the first source supporting the State Aid appropriation. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Support of Patients in County Psychiatric Hospitals, in the event that the Assistant Commissioner of the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services determines that, in order to provide the least restrictive setting appropriate, a patient should be admitted to a county psychiatric hospital in a county other than the one in which the patient is domiciled rather than to a State psychiatric hospital, there are hereby appropriated such additional amounts as may be required, as determined by the Assistant Commissioner to reimburse a county for the extra costs, if any, which were incurred in connection with the care of such patient in a county psychiatric hospital which exceeded the cost of care which would have been incurred had the patient been placed in a State psychiatric hospital, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Support of Patients in County Psychiatric Hospitals is conditioned upon the following provisions: County psychiatric hospitals shall: (1) enroll and continue to maintain enrollment as providers in the State's NJ FamilyCare program; (2) complete or pursue in good faith the completion of eligibility applications for patients who could be NJ FamilyCare eligible; (3) bill the NJ FamilyCare program for all applicable services; and (4) neither admit nor discharge patients based upon NJ FamilyCare eligibility. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Support of Patients in County Psychiatric Hospitals is conditioned upon the county psychiatric hospitals providing and certifying all information that is required by the State, in the form specified by the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services, to prepare a complete, accurate, and timely claim to federal authorities for Medicaid Disproportionate Share Hospital claim revenues. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S.30:4-78, or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Support of Patients in County Psychiatric Hospitals is conditioned upon the following provisions: for rates effective January 1, 2013, and any prior year rate adjustments that may be required beginning January 1, 2013, the approval of the State House Commission shall not be required for the setting of such rates and the Commissioner of Human Services, in consultation with the Commissioner of Health, shall set: (1) the per capita cost rates to be paid by the State to the several counties on behalf of the reasonable cost of maintenance of State and county patients in any county psychiatric facility, including outpatient psychiatric services, (2) the per capita rates which each county shall pay to the Treasurer for the reasonable cost of maintenance and clothing of each patient residing in a State psychiatric facility having a legal settlement in such county (County Patients), (3) the rates to be paid for the reasonable cost of maintenance and clothing of the convict and criminal mentally ill in any State psychiatric facility and the cost of maintenance of County Patients residing in State developmental centers or receiving other residential functional services for the developmentally disabled.  Such rates will be fixed no later than October 1 of each calendar year. Notice of such rates shall be provided by the Commissioner of Human Services to the clerk of the respective boards of chosen freeholders. In the event that the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services is notified that a county psychiatric hospital will cease operations for the current fiscal year, or any portion thereof, in order to assure continuity of care for patients who otherwise would have been served by the county hospital, as well as to preserve patient and public safety, the Division shall have the authority to transfer funds from the Support of Patients in County Psychiatric Hospitals account to Direct State Services and Grants-In-Aid accounts in the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services, for the fiscal year, subject to a plan approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S.30:4-78, or any law or regulation to the contrary, with respect to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Support of Patients in County Psychiatric Hospitals, commencing January 1, 2010, the State shall pay to each county an amount equal to 35 percent of the total per capita costs for the reasonable cost of maintenance and clothing of county patients in State psychiatric facilities. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Support of Patients in County Psychiatric Hospitals (PTRF), such additional amounts as determined by the Commissioner of Human Services are appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 24  Special Health Services 7540  Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 21-7540 Health Services Administration and Management $70,255,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services $70,255,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($16,841,000) Materials and Supplies ($109,000) Services Other Than Personal ($23,839,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($63,000) Special Purpose: 21 Episodes of Care - P.L.2019. c.86 ($2,000,000) 21 Payments to Fiscal Agents ($26,473,000) 21 Professional Standards Review Organization - Utilization Review ($301,000) 21 Drug Utilization Review Board- Administrative Costs ($10,000) 21 Community Doula Directory ($450,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($169,000) The amounts hereinabove appropriated for Personal Services are conditioned upon the Department of Human Services working collaboratively with the various county corrections agencies to promote the proper enrollment in the NJ FamilyCare program of all eligible incarcerated persons requiring medical services. The department shall provide guidance to the county corrections agencies on this subject and, upon request, shall provide such additional assistance as may be necessary to support the counties in ensuring that all eligible Medicaid reimbursements are properly claimed consistent with federal law. Such funds as are necessary from the Health Care Subsidy Fund are appropriated to the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services for payment to disproportionate share hospitals for uncompensated care costs as defined in P.L.1991, c.187 (C.26:2H-18.24 et seq.), and for subsidized children's health insurance in the NJ FamilyCare Program established in P.L.2005, c.156 (C.30:4J-8 et al.) to maximize federal Title XXI funding, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, all past, present, and future revenues representing federal financial participation received by the State from the United States and that are based on payments made by the State to hospitals that serve a disproportionate share of low-income patients shall be deposited into the General Fund and may be expended only upon appropriation by law. Additional federal Title XIX revenue generated from the claiming of uncompensated care payments made to disproportionate share hospitals shall be deposited into the General Fund as anticipated revenue. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, all revenues received from health maintenance organizations shall be deposited into the General Fund. From the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Services Other Than Personal, there are appropriated such sums as are necessary for the department to contract for a comprehensive evaluation of the existing Medicaid-managed care contract and relevant Medicaid program regulations, which shall recommend opportunities to improve MCO performance and compliance. Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Services Other Than Personal, an amount not to exceed $2,750,000, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, is allocated for support of New Jersey's Regional Health Hubs to effectuate P.L.2019, c.517 (C.30:4D-8.16 et seq.). Payments to an individual Regional Health Hub (Hub) from this line item shall not exceed $1,375,000 in State and matching federal funds per Hub. Consistent with P.L.2019, c.517 (C.30:4D-8.16 et seq.), a Regional Health Hub shall not receive funding until the Regional Health Hub has submitted an annual proposal. A portion of such funding shall be contingent on the Regional Health Hubs achievement of deliverables and performance metrics, as specified in the Regional Health Hubs approved proposal. In addition to funding appropriated here, State Departments shall have the discretion to support a Regional Health Hubs innovation projects that advance Medicaid priorities using other available dollars and may direct such dollars independently of the Department of Human Services. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year, in the Payments to Fiscal Agents account are appropriated for the same purpose. GRANTS-IN-AID 22-7540 General Medical Services $6,069,483,000 (From General Fund:$6,065,483,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$4,000,000) Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services $6,069,483,000 (From General Fund:$6,065,483,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$4,000,000) Grants-in-Aid: 22 Medical Coverage - Aged, Blind and Disabled ($1,624,032,000) 22 Medical Coverage - Community-Based Long Term Care Recipients ($1,589,580,000) 22 Medical Coverage - Nursing Home Residents ($586,793,000) 22 Medical Coverage - Title XIX Parents and Children ($673,838,000) 22 Medical Coverage - ACA Expansion Population ($475,142,000) 22 Medicare Parts A and B ($313,620,000) 22 Medicare Part D ($719,561,000) 22 Eligibility and Enrollment Services ($26,042,000) 22 Eligibility and Enrollment Services (PTRF) ($4,000,000) 22 Provider Settlements and Adjustments ($56,875,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated in the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following conditions: in order to promote accuracy, efficiency and accountability in the third party liability (TPL) program, the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services shall require that any third party as defined in subsection m. of section 3 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-3), or in 42 U.S.C. s.1396a(a)(25)(A), including, but not limited to, a pharmacy benefit manager and any entity writing health, casualty, workers compensation, or malpractice insurance policies in the State or covering residents of this State, enter into an agreement with the Division or the States authorized third party liability services contractor, or both, as determined by the Commissioner of Human Services, to permit and assist, no less frequently than on a twice monthly basis, the matching of the Medicaid/NJ FamilyCare, Charity Care, and Work First New Jersey General Public Assistance eligibility files and adjudicated claims files against that third partys full and complete eligibility file, including indication of coverage derived from the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003, Pub.L.108-173, and adjudicated claims file for the purpose of coordination of benefits and recovery when appropriate, utilizing, if necessary, social security numbers as common identifiers and other personal identifying information consistent with federal and State law. Provided further that the Division also shall require that a third party must respond within a reasonable period, not to exceed 60 calendar days, to an inquiry by the State regarding a claim for payment for any health care item or service that is submitted less than three years after the date of the provision of such health care item or service; failure to pay or deny a claim within a reasonable period after receipt of the claim shall create an uncontestable obligation to pay the claim and payments made by a third party to the State shall be considered final two years after payment is made; provided further that a third party shall agree not to deny a claim submitted by the State solely on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the type or format of the claim form, a failure to obtain prior authorization, or a failure to present proper documentation at the point-of-sale that is the basis of the claim, if both of the following apply: the claim is submitted by the State within the three-year period beginning on the date on which the item or service was furnished; and any action by the State to enforce its rights with respect to the claim is commenced within six years of the State's submission of the claim. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary and subject to any required federal approval, from the amounts hereinabove appropriated in the General Medical Services program classification, payment may be made for services provided as part of the Integrated Care for Kids model for beneficiaries residing in Monmouth and Ocean counties. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following condition: Payments by the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services are authorized to be made to Managed Care Organizations and medical care providers to enroll in NJ FamilyCare any child who, except for immigration status, meets financial and other eligibility provisions of the program. In order to permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations and ensure the timely payment of claims to providers of medical services, amounts may be transferred to and from accounts within the General Medical Services program classification in the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services.  All such transfers are subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notice thereof shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated in the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following conditions: the base payment rate per medical encounter, as described in N.J.A.C.10:66-4.1, for a federally qualified health center (FQHC) shall be equal to 100 percent of the Medicare FQHC prospective payment system base rate, as adjusted according to the geographic location of the FQHC, plus an add-on payment of $19.35 and an additional amount that when aggregated for all FY 2025 payments totals $2,000,000. The amounts hereinabove appropriated within the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following provisions: the Commissioner of Human Services shall apply the emergency room triage reimbursement fee of $140, established pursuant to P.L.2018, c.51 (C.30:4D-7p et seq.), for any applicable claim submitted for a patient enrolled in the State Medicaid program. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (13) of subsection i. of section 3 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-3) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, and subject to federal approval, a pregnant woman whose family income does not exceed the highest income eligibility level for pregnant women established under the State plan under Title XIX and Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act shall continue to be eligible for coverage until the end of the 365-day period beginning on the last day of her pregnancy. Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (8) of subsection i. of section 3 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-3) and subparagraphs (3), (4), and (5) of subsection g. of section 6 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-6), or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated in the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following conditions: in order to encourage home and community based services as an alternative to nursing home placement, consistent with the federally approved Section 1115 Medicaid demonstration waiver and any approved amendments thereto, the Commissioner of Human Services is authorized to adjust financial eligibility and other requirements and services for medically needy eligibility groups and the Managed Long Term Services and Supports population, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting and subject to any other required federal approval. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated in the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following condition: effective January 1, 2015, the Commissioner of Human Services is authorized to provide any or all types and levels of services that are provided through the Medicaid State Plans Alternative Benefit Plan to any or all of the types of qualified applicants described in subparagraphs (1), (2), (4), (6), (7), (9), (10), (11), (12), (13), (16(a)), (17), (18) and (19) of subsection i. of section 3 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-3), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting and subject to any required federal approval. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary and subject to any required federal approval, the amounts appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following condition: premiums shall not be required to be collected from families enrolled in the NJ FamilyCare program established pursuant to P.L.2005, c.156 (C.30:4J-8 et al.), as amended. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection f. of section 5 of P.L.2015, c.154 (C.30:4J-12) or any other law or regulation to the contrary and subject to any required federal approval, the amounts appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following condition: disenrollment from employer-sponsored group or other health insurance coverage shall not cause a child or parent to be ineligible to enroll in the NJ FamilyCare program established pursuant to P.L.2005, c.156 (C.30:4J-8 et al.), as amended. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, all object accounts appropriated in the General Medical Services program classification shall be conditioned upon the following provision: when any action by a county welfare agency, whether alone or in combination with the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services, results in a recovery of improperly granted medical assistance, the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services may reimburse the county welfare agency in the amount of 25 percent of the gross recovery. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for payments to providers on behalf of medical assistance recipients, such additional amounts as may be required are appropriated from the General Fund to cover costs consequent to the establishment of presumptive eligibility for children, pregnant women, single adults or couples without dependent children, and parents and caretaker relatives in the NJ FamilyCare program, as established pursuant to P.L.2005, c.156 (C.30:4J-8 et al.). Of the amount hereinabove appropriated within the General Medical Services program classification, the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services, subject to federal approval, shall implement policies that would limit the ability of persons who have the financial ability to provide for their own long-term care needs to manipulate current NJ FamilyCare rules to avoid payment for that care. The Division shall require, in the case of a married individual requiring long-term care services, that the portion of the couples resources that is not protected for the needs of the community spouse be used solely for the purchase of long-term care services. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, all object accounts appropriated in the General Medical Services program classification shall be conditioned upon the following provision: the Commissioner of Human Services shall have the authority to convert individuals enrolled in a State-funded program who are also eligible for a federally matchable program, to the federally matchable program without the need for regulations. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, a sufficient portion of receipts generated or savings realized in General Medical Services program classification Grants-In-Aid accounts from initiatives may be transferred to the Health Services Administration and Management program classification accounts to fund costs incurred in realizing these additional receipts or savings, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, and subject to federal approval, of the amounts appropriated in the General Medical Services program classification, the Commissioner of Human Services is authorized to develop and introduce optional service plan innovations to enhance client choice for users of NJ FamilyCare optional services, while containing expenditures. The appropriations within the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following conditions: the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services, in coordination with the county welfare agencies, shall continue a program to outstation eligibility workers in disproportionate share hospitals and federally qualified health centers, provided, however, that if an alternate eligibility function at an outstanding location complies with the outstation process at 42 U.S.C. s.1396a(a)(55), the county welfare agency worker may be removed from the outstation location. For the purposes of account balance maintenance, all object accounts appropriated in the General Medical Services program classification shall be considered as one object. This will allow timely payment of claims to providers of medical services but ensure that no overspending will occur in the program classification. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification are conditioned upon the Commissioner of Human Services making changes to such programs to make them consistent with the federal "Deficit Reduction Act of 2005," Pub.L.109-171. All funds recovered pursuant to P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.) and P.L.1975, c.194 (C.30:4D-20 et seq.) during the current fiscal year are appropriated for payments to providers in the same program classification from which the recovery originated. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services first shall be charged to the federal disproportionate share hospital reimbursements anticipated as Medicaid uncompensated care. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1962, c.222 (C.44:7-76 et seq.) or any law or regulation to the contrary, no funds are appropriated to the Medical Assistance for the Aged program, which has been eliminated. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification are available for the payment of obligations applicable to prior fiscal years. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, and subject to the notice provisions of 42 C.F.R. s.447.205, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification, personal care assistant services shall be authorized prior to the beginning of services by the Director of the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services. The hourly rate for personal care services shall be $26.68. Notwithstanding any other law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated in the General Medical Services program classification is appropriated to pay for rate increases as determined by the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services in the Department of Human Services for NJ Family Care pediatric specialty services in the categories of acute care, outpatient facility care, clinic services, professional services, ancillary services, mental health and substance use disorder services, subject to the following conditions; (i) any required federal approval; and (ii) prior to expending any of this amount, the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services in the Department of Human Services shall conduct a market rate study of current NJ Family Care fee-for-service and managed care payment rates and reimbursement practices, which shall make recommendations to the Commissioner of Human Services on rate adjustments for the aforementioned services, and establish a methodology that may include, but is not limited to, factors for service type, care setting, and delivery mechanisms for in and out-of-State care. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following conditions: as of January 1, 2014 or on such date established by the federal government for the Health Insurance Marketplace pursuant to the "Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act," the following groups of current enrollees shall be transitioned to the State Health Insurance Exchange for continued health care coverage: a) adults or couples without dependent children who were enrolled in the New Jersey Health ACCESS program on October 31, 2001; b) all parents or caretakers who: (i) have gross family income that does not exceed 200 percent of the poverty level; (ii) have no health insurance, as determined by the Commissioner of Human Services; (iii) are ineligible for NJ FamilyCare, or (iv) are adult aliens lawfully admitted for permanent residence, but who have lived in the United States for less than five full years after such lawful admittance, and are enrolled in NJ FamilyCare; and c) Essential Persons (Spouses) whose coverage is funded solely by the State. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following condition: only the following individuals shall be excluded from mandatory enrollment in the Medicaid/NJ FamilyCare managed care program: (1) individuals who are institutionalized in an inpatient psychiatric institution, an inpatient psychiatric program for children under the age of 21, or a residential facility including facilities characterized by the federal government as ICFs/MR, except that individuals who are eligible through the Division of Child Protection and Permanency (DCP&P) and are placed in a DCP&P non-Joint Commission on Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations accredited children's residential care facility and individuals in a mental health or substance abuse residential treatment facility shall not be excluded from enrollment pursuant to this paragraph; (2) individuals in out-of-State placements; (3) special low-income Medicare beneficiaries;  (4) individuals in the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly program; and (5) Medically Needy segment of the NJ FamilyCare. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following condition: Non-contracted hospitals providing emergency services to NJ FamilyCare members enrolled in the managed care program shall accept as payment in full 90 percent of the amounts that the non-contracted hospital would receive from NJ FamilyCare for the emergency services and/or any related hospitalization if the beneficiary were enrolled in NJ FamilyCare fee-for-service. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following condition: Effective July 1, 2011, the following services, which were previously covered by NJ FamilyCare fee-for-service, shall be covered and provided instead through a managed care delivery system for all clients served by and/or enrolled in that system: 1) home health agency services; 2) medical day care, including both adult day health services and pediatric medical day care; 3) prescription drugs; and 4) rehabilitation services, including occupational, physical, and speech therapies. The above condition shall be effective for personal care assistant services. Of the revenues received as a result of sanctions to health maintenance organizations participating in NJ FamilyCare managed care, an amount not to exceed $500,000 is appropriated to the General Medical Services program classification or NJ KidCare - Administration account to improve access to medical services and quality care through such activities as outreach, education, and awareness, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following condition: the Director of the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services may restrict the number of provider agreements with managed care entities, if such restriction does not substantially impair access to services. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification, there are appropriated such amounts as may be necessary for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, effective at the beginning of the current fiscal year and subject to federal approval, of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification, inpatient medical services provided through the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services shall be conditioned upon the following provision: No funds shall be expended for hospital services during which a preventable hospital error occurred or for hospital services provided for the necessary inpatient treatment arising from a preventable hospital error, as shall be defined by the Commissioner of Human Services. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification, the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services is authorized to competitively bid and contract for performance of federally mandated inpatient hospital utilization reviews, and the funds necessary for the contracted utilization review of these hospital services are made available from the General Medical Services program classification, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Such amounts as may be necessary are appropriated from enhanced audit recoveries obtained by the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services to fund the costs of enhanced audit recovery efforts of the division within the General Medical Services program classification, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, all financial recoveries obtained through the efforts of any entity authorized to undertake the prevention and detection of NJ FamilyCare fraud, waste, and abuse are appropriated to the General Medical Services program classification in the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary and subject to notice provisions of 42 C.F.R. s.447.205 where applicable, the amount hereinabove appropriated for fee-for-service prescription drugs in the General Medical Services program classification is subject to the following conditions: the maximum allowable cost for legend and non-legend drugs shall be calculated based on Actual Acquisition Cost (AAC) defined as the lowest of: (i) the National Average Drug Acquisition Cost (NADAC) Retail Price Survey, in accordance with subsection (f) of section 1927 of the Social Security Act; (ii) Wholesale Acquisition Cost (WAC) less a volume discount of two percent in the absence of a NADAC price; (iii)  the federal upper limit; (iv) the State upper limit (SUL); (v) cost acquisition data submitted by providers of pharmaceutical services for brand-name multi-source and multi-source drugs in the absence of any alternative pricing benchmarks. For legend and non-legend drugs purchased through the 340B Drug Pricing program, the maximum allowable cost shall be based on the 340B ceiling price.  In the absence of a 340B ceiling price, the alternative benchmark used shall be the WAC minus a volume discount of 25 percent. The 340B ceiling price or the alternative benchmark shall only apply when its price is the lowest compared to the pricing formulas described by (i) through (v) above. Reimbursement for covered outpatient drugs shall be calculated based on: (i) the lower of the AAC plus a professional fee of $10.92; or a providers usual and customary charge; or (ii) the lower of cost acquisition data submitted by providers of pharmaceutical services for brand-name multi-source and multi-source drugs, where an alternative pricing benchmark is not available, plus a professional fee of $10.92; or a providers usual and customary charge; or (iii) for COVID-19 vaccinations, an administration fee(s) equivalent to the Medicare rate(s) or a providers usual and customary charge. To effectuate the calculation of SUL rates and/or the calculation of single-source and brand-name multi-source legend and non-legend drug costs where an alternative pricing benchmark is not available, the Department of Human Services shall mandate ongoing submission of current drug acquisition data by providers of pharmaceutical services and no funds hereinabove appropriated shall be paid to any entity that fails to submit required data. Reimbursement for covered outpatient drugs dispensed to beneficiaries residing in long-term-care facilities shall be calculated based on: (i) the lower of the AAC plus a professional fee of $10.92; or a providers usual and customary charge; or (ii) the lower of cost acquisition data submitted by providers of pharmaceutical services for brand-name multi-source and multi-source drugs, where an alternative pricing benchmark is not available, plus a professional fee of $10.92; or a providers usual and customary charge.  To effectuate the calculation of SUL rates and/or the calculation of single-source and brand-name multi-source legend and non-legend drug costs where an alternative pricing benchmark is not available, the Department of Human Services shall mandate ongoing submission of current drug acquisition data by providers of pharmaceutical services and no funds hereinabove appropriated shall be paid to any entity that fails to submit required data. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the appropriations for the General Medical Services program classification shall be conditioned upon the following provision: each prescription order for protein nutritional supplements and specialized infant formulas dispensed shall be filled with the generic equivalent unless the prescription order states "Brand Medically Necessary" in the prescriber's own handwriting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no funds hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification are available to any pharmacy that does not agree to allow NJ FamilyCare to bill on its behalf any third party, as defined in subsection m. of section 3 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-3), by participating in a billing agreement executed between the State and the pharmacy. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, and subject to the notice provisions of 42 C.F.R. s.447.205, approved nutritional supplements which are hereinabove appropriated in the General Medical Services program classification shall be consistent with reimbursement for legend and non-legend drugs. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated to the General Medical Services program classification, no payment shall be expended for drugs used for: (1)  the treatment of erectile dysfunction, select cough/cold medications as defined by the Commissioner of Human Services, or cosmetic drugs, including, but not limited todrugs used for baldness and purely cosmetic skin conditions; and (2) weight loss, unless deemed medically necessary to meaningfully promote the proper function of the body or prevent or treat illness or disease, and until the Department of Human Services, in consultation with the Department of Health, completes and submits to the Legislature an examination of the viability and likely cost to the State of providing coverage for such drugs in the NJ FamilyCare Program, Pharmaceutical Assistance for the Aged and Disabled program, and AIDS Drug Distribution Program, and additional funding has been appropriated for payments for drugs used for weight loss  by the Legislature. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the hereinabove appropriation for the General Medical Services program classification shall be conditioned upon the following provision: no funds shall be appropriated for the refilling of a prescription drug until such time as the original prescription is 85 percent finished. Rebates from pharmaceutical manufacturing companies during the current fiscal year for prescription expenditures made to providers on behalf of NJ FamilyCare clients are appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification shall be conditioned upon the following provision: certifications shall not be granted for new or relocating offsite hospital-based entities in accordance with N.J.A.C.10:52-1.3 with the exception of providers whose services are deemed necessary to meet special needs by the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification is subject to the following condition: payment is authorized for limited prenatal medical care for New Jersey pregnant women who, except for financial requirements, are not eligible for any other State or federal health insurance program. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification is subject to the following condition: payment is authorized for contraceptives for individuals who can become pregnant and would be eligible for medical assistance if not for the provisions of 8 U.S.C. s.1611 or 8 U.S.C. s.1612, and who are not otherwise eligible for any other State or federal health insurance program. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the appropriations for the General Medical Services program classification shall be conditioned upon the following provision: reimbursement for the cost of physician administered drugs shall not exceed the lowest of: (i) the Wholesale Acquisition Cost for the drugs administered in a practitioner's office less a volume discount of one percent, (ii) the federal upper limit, (iii) the State upper limit, or (iv) the practitioner's usual and customary charge. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts expended from the General Medical Services program classification shall be conditioned upon the following: reimbursement for adult incontinence briefs and oxygen concentrators shall be set at 70 percent of reasonable and customary charges. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of N.J.A.C.10:60-5.7 and subsection (b) of N.J.A.C.10:60-11.2 to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification is conditioned upon the following: the minimum hourly fee-for-service and managed care reimbursement rates for Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis and Treatment/Private Duty Nursing services shall be $63 per hour for registered nurses and $51 for licensed practical nurses. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification, the Commissioners of Human Services and Health shall establish a system to utilize unopened and unexpired prescription drugs previously dispensed but not administered to individuals residing in nursing facilities. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification is subject to the following condition: payment is authorized for limited prenatal medical care provided by clinics, or in the case of radiology and clinical laboratory services ordered by a clinic, as well as prenatal outpatient hospital services and perinatal doula services, for New Jersey pregnant women who, except for financial requirements, are not eligible for any other State or federal health insurance program. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, effective July 1, 2009, no payments for partial care services in mental health clinics, as hereinabove appropriated in the General Medical Services program classification shall be provided unless the services are given prior authorization by professional staff designated by the Department of Human Services. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification may be used to pay financial rewards to individuals or entities who report instances of health care-related fraud and/or abuse involving the programs administered by the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services (DMAHS), the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled (PAAD) or Work First New Jersey General Public Assistance programs. Rewards may be paid only when the reports result in a recovery by DMAHS, and only if other conditions established by DMAHS are met, and shall be limited to 10 percent of the recovery or $15,000, whichever is less. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, but subject to any necessary federal approval and/or change in federal law, receipt of such rewards shall not affect an applicant's individual financial eligibility for the programs administered by DMAHS, or for PAAD or Work First New Jersey General Public Assistance programs. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following condition: the Commissioner of Human Services is authorized to implement a pilot program, effective on or after January 1, 2015, to remove the NJ FamilyCare eligibility determination and redetermination process from one or more county welfare agencies, as determined by the Commissioner of Human Services, subject to any required federal approval. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated in the General Medical Services program classification, there shall be transferred to various accounts, including Direct State Services and State Aid accounts, such amounts, not to exceed $11,500,000, as are necessary to pay for the administrative costs of the program classification, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated to the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following conditions: (a) as of July 1, 2011, all parents or caretakers whose applications to enroll in the NJ FamilyCare program were received on or after March 1, 2010: (i) whose family gross income does not exceed 200 percent of the federal poverty level; (ii) who have no health insurance, as determined by the Commissioner of Human Services; and (iii) who are ineligible for Medicaid shall not be eligible for enrollment in the NJ FamilyCare program and there shall be no future enrollments of such persons in the NJ FamilyCare program; and (b) as of July 1, 2011, any adult alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence, but who has lived in the United States for less than five full years after such lawful admittance and whose enrollment in the NJ FamilyCare program was terminated on or before July 1, 2010 shall not be eligible to be enrolled in the NJ FamilyCare program; provided, however, that this termination of enrollment and benefits shall not apply to such persons who are either (i) pregnant or (ii) under the age of 19. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection d. of section 5 of P.L.2005, c.156 (C.30:4J-12) or any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for NJ FamilyCare are subject to the following condition: the Department of Human Services may determine eligibility for the NJ FamilyCare program by verifying income through any means authorized by the "Children's Health Insurance Program Reauthorization Act of 2009," Pub.L.111-3, including through electronic matching of data files provided that any consents, if required, under State or federal law for such matching are obtained. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following condition: the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services shall enroll, under standard procedures, and reimburse, for qualified services, any midwife licensed to practice by the State Board of Medical Examiners pursuant to R.S.45:10-1 et seq. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amounts appropriated hereinabove to support the State share of Medicaid home and community based services (HCBS), an amount not to exceed the total enhanced federal matching rate provided for such services pursuant to the "American Rescue Plan Act of 2021," Pub. L. 117-2, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, is appropriated to implement program and rate adjustments that enhance, expand, or strengthen Medicaid HCBS services, as required by federal law; provided, however, that such program and rate changes shall be determined by the Commissioner of Human Services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, and shall be consistent with Initial and Quarterly HCBS Spending Plans as submitted to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and required by the "American Rescue Plan Act of 2021" and federal regulation. Such amounts as may be necessary are hereinabove appropriated from enhanced audit recoveries obtained by the Department of Human Services to fund the costs of enhanced audit recovery efforts of the department within the General Medical Services program classification, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification are available for the payment of obligations applicable to prior fiscal years. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, payments from appropriations hereinabove in the General Medical Services program classification for special hospital prospective per diem reimbursements for Medicaid fee-for-service recipients are subject to the following condition: subject to the approval of any required State plan amendment by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, special hospitals licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.) with more than 60 but less than 102 special beds shall be reimbursed at a prospective per diem rate for Medicaid fee-for-service recipients established by the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services. The base year prospective per diem rate shall be equal to the per diem rate in effect and paid on June 30, 2015 and shall be updated by the economic factor specified in N.J.A.C. 10:52-5.13. Provided however, in the event that the number of licensed beds decreases by 20 percent or more, the prospective per diem rate may be renegotiated. Any Medicaid cost reports not final settled for Medicaid fee-for-service reimbursement prior to July 1, 2016 shall be prospectively settled based on the per diem rate in effect and paid on June 30, 2015, adjusted to deflate to the applicable cost report year. Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for General Medical Services, effective January 1, 2018 such sums as are necessary shall be made available to reimburse medical professionals for advance care planning visits consistent with current Medicare reimbursement policy. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in order to ensure compliance with 42 C.F.R. 433.138(d)(4)(i) and (ii) and 42 C.F.R. 433.138(g) (2) and (3), the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission and the New Jersey Division of Workers Compensation shall make their records available to the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services or the States authorized third party liability services contractor for the purpose of matching no less frequently than on a monthly basis with the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services' records in order to identify current or former Medicaid/NJ FamilyCare beneficiaries who have recovered or may recover payments from any third party as defined in subsection m. of section 3 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-3) or in 42 U.S.C.s.1396a(a)(25)(A), for the purpose of coordination of benefits and recovery when appropriate, utilizing, if necessary, personal identifying information as common identifiers consistent with federal law. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification is subject to the following condition: amounts received by the State from a Class II facility with greater than 500 licensed beds pursuant to an intergovernmental transfer agreement are appropriated to serve as the non-federal share of supplemental Medicaid reimbursements, subject to federal approval, and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following condition: from the amounts hereinabove appropriated, payments may be made, subject to any required federal approval, to support any authorized demonstration program undertaken by the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services pursuant to Section 1115 of the Social Security Act upon receipt of federal approval, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary and subject to any required federal approval, in order to implement the perinatal episode of care pilot program established pursuant to P.L.2019, c.86, from the amounts hereinabove appropriated in the General Medical Services program classification, payments may be made to support shared savings initiatives, incentive payments, and other quality and cost improvements, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification is subject to the following condition: amounts received by the State from Bergen County pursuant to an intergovernmental transfer agreement established via the New Jersey Medicaid Access to Physician Services Program are authorized to be used as necessary by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting and the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services, consistent with Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services guidelines, solely to maximize federal Medicaid payments to physicians and non--physician professionals who are affiliated or employed by New Bridge Medical Center. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amounts hereinabove appropriated in the General Medical Services program classification, an amount not to exceed $10,000,000 is appropriated to pay for payment rate increases per medical encounter for reproductive health services as determined by the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services in the Department of Human Services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary and subject to any required federal approval, from the amounts appropriated in the General Medical Services program classification, Managed Care Organizations are to establish a program that provides an enhanced payment for well--child and sick visit claims submitted for children under four years of age at Healthy Steps sites who show proof they are meeting or are on track to meet Healthy Steps model fidelity. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated within the General Medical Services program classification are conditioned on the following: subject to any federal regulation to the contrary, federally qualified health centers shall be funded for any reduction in revenue due to the decrease in Medicare Prospective Payment System rates during State Fiscal Year 2022, that were applied during State Fiscal Year 2023, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.A.C.10:49-7.1 et seq. or any other law or regulation to the contrary, and subject to approval by the federal government, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following condition: the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services shall increase reimbursement for ambulance services, including basic life support emergency and nonemergency ambulance services and specialty care transport services, provided to Medicaid Managed Care and Medicaid fee for service recipients who are also Medicare eligible to the applicable Medicare rate. Subject to federal approval, the appropriations for those programs within the General Medical Services program classification are conditioned upon the Department of Human Services implementing policies that would limit the ability of individuals who have the financial ability to provide for their own long-term care needs to manipulate current NJ FamilyCare rules to avoid payment for that care. The Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services shall require, in the case of a married individual requiring long-term care services, that the portion of the couple's resources which are not protected for the needs of the community spouse be used solely for the purchase of long-term care services. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated to the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following condition: assisted living facilities, comprehensive personal care homes, and assisted living programs, shall receive a per diem rate of no less than $89.50, $79.50, and $69.50, respectively, as reimbursement for each NJ FamilyCare beneficiary under their care. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated within the General Medical Services program classification for medical day care services shall be conditioned upon the following provision: the minimum fee--for--service and managed care per diem reimbursement rates for adult medical day care providers shall be  $92.08. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no payment for NJ FamilyCare adult or pediatric medical day care services, as hereinabove appropriated in the General Medical Services program classification, shall be provided unless the services are given prior authorization by professional staff designated by the Department of Human Services. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, as a condition of receipt of any NJ FamilyCare payments a nursing home shall provide to the Commissioner of Human Services information on the facilitys finances comparable to the information provided by hospitals to the Department of Health pursuant to N.J.A.C.8:31B-3.1 et seq. and N.J.A.C.8:31B-4.1 et seq., as requested by the commissioner, and the commissioner shall periodically assess the financial status of the industry. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Medical Coverage - Aged, Blind and Disabled account is appropriated for the same purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated within the General Medical Services program classification for medical day care services shall be conditioned on the following provision: physical therapy, occupational therapy, and speech therapy shall no longer serve as a permissible criteria for eligibility in the adult Medical Day Care Program. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated within the General Medical Services program classification for medical day care services shall be conditioned on the following provision: effective August 15, 2010, no payments for NJ FamilyCare adult medical day care services shall be provided on behalf of any beneficiary who received prior authorization for these services based exclusively on the need for medication administration. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following condition: nursing facilities shall not receive payments for bed hold or therapeutic leave days for NJ FamilyCare beneficiaries, provided that nursing facilities shall continue to reserve beds for NJ FamilyCare beneficiaries who are hospitalized or on therapeutic leave as required by N.J.A.C. 8:85-1.14. Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.A.C.8:85-1.1 et seq. or any other law or regulation to the contrary, and subject to any required federal approval, the amounts hereinabove appropriated within the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following conditions: (1) Class I (private), Class II (county), and Class III (special care) nursing facilities being paid on a fee-for-service basis shall be reimbursed at a per diem rate no less than the rate received on June 30, 2024, minus the first provider tax add-on and any performance add-on amounts, subject to the condition that Class III (special care) facilities shall be reimbursed the greater of this rate or $450 per diem, and that Class III (special care) nursing facilities licensed pursuant to a Certificate of Need to operate a traumatic brain injury unit as of July 1, 2023, shall be reimbursed the greater of this rate or at a base per diem reimbursement rate that is $400 above the special care nursing facilitys base per diem reimbursement rate as of June 30, 2022 and that Class III (special care) nursing facilities licensed pursuant to a Certificate of Need to operate a neurologically impaired young adult unit as of July 1, 2024 shall be reimbursed, at a minimum, the greater of the special care nursing facility's FY 2024 base per diem rate or $804 per diem; (2) nursing facilities that are being paid by a Managed Care Organization (MCO) for custodial care through a provider contract that includes a negotiated rate shall receive that negotiated rate; (3) any Class I and Class III nursing facility that is being paid by an MCO for custodial care through a provider contract but has not yet negotiated a rate shall receive the equivalent fee-for-service per diem reimbursement rate as it received on June 30, 2024, minus the first provider tax add-on and any performance add-on amounts, and any Class II nursing facility that is being paid by an MCO for custodial care through a provider contract but has not yet negotiated a rate shall receive the equivalent fee-for-service per diem reimbursement rate as it received on June 30, 2024, minus any performance add-on amounts, had it been a Class I nursing facility; (4) monies designated pursuant to subsection c. of section 6 of P.L.2003, c.105 (C.26:2H-97) for distribution to nursing facilities, less the portion of those funds to be paid as pass-through payments in accordance with paragraph (1) of subsection d. of section 6 of P.L.2003, c.105 (C.26:2H-97) and less the actual amounts expended during fiscal year 2024 on performance add-ons and expenditures to establish a minimum per diem of $188.35, shall be combined with amounts hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification for the purpose of calculating NJ FamilyCare reimbursements for nursing facilities; (5) for the purposes of this paragraph, a nursing facility's per diem reimbursement rate or negotiated rate shall not include, if the nursing facility is eligible for reimbursement, the difference between the full calculated provider tax add-on and the quality-of-care portion of the provider tax add-on, which difference shall be payable as an allowable cost pursuant to subsection d. of section 6 of P.L.2003, c.105 (C.26:2H-97); (6) the add-ons used for fiscal year 2024 shall be applied from July 1, 2024, through September 30, 2024, and the first add-on as calculated in section 4 above shall be applied to both MCO and fee-for-service per diem reimbursement rates effective October 1, 2024; (7) each Class I, Class II, and Class III nursing facility that has, no later than the deadline established by the Commissioner of Human Services, submitted to the Department of Human Services (DHS) the DHS Fiscal Year 2025 CoreQ Long-Stay Survey Sample Size Calculation Grid with affirmative answers, as defined by the Department, CoreQ vendor intent, and completion of the CoreQ Long-Stay Survey sample size calculation and, if eligible for CoreQ, no later than the deadline established by the Commissioner of Human Services, submitted demographics to the CoreQ vendor to initiate the CoreQ survey process, and, during calendar year 2023, has not been included on the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) Special Focus Facility Lists A, B, E or F, ranked as a one-star facility by the CMS Five-Star Quality Rating System, or cited by the Department of Health for two or more Level G or higher licensing violations (a) shall receive a performance add-on of $3.00 for each of the following CMS nursing home long stay quality measures where the nursing facility has not failed to report data for any of the reporting periods Q4 2022, Q1 2023, Q2 2023 and Q3 2023, and the simple average of the quarters, as calculated by the Department with available data, is at or below the lower of the New Jersey or national average, as calculated by CMS, for the percentage of long-stay residents who are losing too much weight and high risk residents with a pressure ulcer, (b) shall receive a performance add-on of $3.00 for the following CMS nursing home long stay quality measure where the nursing facility has not failed to report data for any of the reporting periods Q3 2022, Q4 2022, Q1 2023 and Q2 2023, and the simple average of the quarters, as calculated by the Department with available data, is at or below the lower of the New Jersey or national average, as calculated by CMS, for the number of hospitalizations per 1,000 long-stay resident days, (c) shall receive a performance add-on of $3.00 if the nursing facility has been deemed eligible to participate in the CoreQ survey process as determined by the Department and received a composite score of 85 percent or greater, as calculated by the DHS vendor, on the CoreQ Resident and Family Experience Survey for the fiscal year 2025 survey period, (d) shall receive a performance add-on of $4.50 for the following CMS staff measure where the nursing facility has not failed to report data for any of the reporting periods Q4 2022, Q1 2023, Q2 2023 and Q3 2023 and the simple average of the quarters, as calculated by the Department with the available data, is at or below 30 percent, as calculated by CMS, for the percentage of total nursing staff that are no longer employed at the facility, (e) shall receive a performance add-on of $4.50 for the following CMS staff measure where the nursing facility has not failed to report data for any of the reporting periods Q4 2022, Q1 2023, Q2 2023 and Q3 2023 and the simple average of the quarters, as calculated by the Department with the available data, is at or above the New Jersey average and below 4.1 hours per resident day, as calculated by CMS, for the total nurse staffing hours adjusted per resident day, (f) shall receive a performance add-on of $6.75 for the following CMS staff measure where the nursing facility has not failed to report data for any of the reporting periods Q4 2022, Q1 2023, Q2 2023 and Q3 2023 and the simple average of the quarters, as calculated by the Department with the available data, is at or above 4.1 hours per resident day, as calculated by CMS, for the total nurse staffing hours adjusted per resident day, and (g) shall receive a performance add-on of $1.25 for the following CMS staff measures where the nursing facility has not failed to reported any data for any of the reporting periods Q4 2021, Q1 2022, Q2 2022, Q3 2022, Q4 2022, Q1 2023, Q2 2023 and Q3 2023 and the simple average  of Q4 2022, Q1 2023, Q2 2023 and Q3 2023, as calculated by the Department using available data, is equal to or greater than 100.5 percent of the simple average of Q4 2021, Q1 2022, Q2 2022, and Q3 2022, as calculated by the Department using available data, and is at or above 3.6 hours per resident day and below 4.1 hours per resident day, as calculated by CMS, for total nurse staffing hours adjusted per resident day,  (8) each nursing facility shall be eligible to receive a per diem adjustment that shall be calculated based upon an additional  $37,200,000 in State and  $37,200,000 in federal appropriations, except that if the Department promulgates regulations implementing a new rate setting methodology in the current fiscal year, nursing facilities shall be reimbursed in accordance with that rate setting methodology, plus the performance add-ons defined above, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting; and (9) within 30 days of setting nursing facility Medicaid reimbursement rates based upon Medicaid cost reports submitted by nursing homes, the Commissioner of Human Services shall report to the Legislature on the differential between the average per diem nursing home Medicaid rate and the average per diem cost of providing nursing home care to Medicaid beneficiaries. Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.A.C.10:166-1.1 et seq. or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated within the General Medical Services program classification for medical day care services shall be subject to the following condition: the daily reimbursement for fee-for-service pediatric medical day care services shall remain at the rate established in the preceding fiscal year. Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.A.C.8:85-1.1 et seq. or any other law or regulation to the contrary, and subject to any required federal approval, the amounts hereinabove appropriated within the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following conditions: (1) Long-Term Care Behavioral Health nursing facilities approved pursuant to the Department of Health's expedited certificate of need being paid on a fee-for-service basis for custodial care shall be reimbursed at a per diem rate equal to 85 percent of the simple average of all Class III (special care) Long-Term Care Specialized Behavior Modification nursing facility rates minus any performance add-on amounts; (2) for the purposes of this paragraph, a nursing facility's per diem reimbursement rate or negotiated rate shall not include, if the nursing facility is eligible for reimbursement, the difference between the full calculated provider tax add-on and the quality-of-care portion of the provider tax add-on, which difference shall be payable as an allowable cost pursuant to subsection d. of section 6 of P.L.2003, c.105 (C.26:2H-97); and (3) the add-ons used for fiscal year 2024 shall be applied from July 1, 2024, through September 30, 2024 and the first add-on as calculated in herein shall be applied to both MCO and fee-for-service per diem reimbursement rates effective October 1, 2024; except that if the Department promulgates regulations implementing a new rate setting methodology in the current fiscal year, nursing facilities shall be reimbursed in accordance with that rate setting methodology, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Such amounts as may be necessary are hereinabove appropriated from the General Fund for the payment of increased nursing home rates to reflect the costs incurred due to the payment of a nursing home provider assessment, pursuant to the "Nursing Home Quality of Care Improvement Fund Act," P.L.2003, c.105 (C.26:2H-92 et seq.), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated in  the General Medical Services program classification for the managed care state directed payment program pursuant to 42 CFR 438.6(c) that provides a supplemental payment for each acute care hospital outpatient visit is subject to the condition that hospitals  shall demonstrate by January 1, 2025 participation in the New Jersey Department of Healths New Jersey Health Information Network (NJHIN); so long as the NJHIN and its vendors maintain policies and procedures to ensure that the minimum necessary personal health information (PHI) is collected, used, disclosed or stored; develops and implements a cyber security incident program; maintains adequate cyber security insurance; and, assumes sole responsibility for notification of any breach of PHI. For purposes of this paragraph, demonstrated participation in the NJHIN shall mean: (1) the hospital has directly, or indirectly through another Trusted Data Sharing Organization, executed the NJHIN Data Use and Reciprocal Support Agreement and the NJHIN Business Associate Agreement; (2) the hospital participates in bi-directional Statewide Admission, Discharge, Transfer Notification using industry standard data exchange technology, and (3) the hospital participates in bi-directional Continuity of Care document (CCDA) exchange using industry standard data exchange technology with at least 90% data conformance to standards as reported in hospital performance reports as determined by the Commissioner of Health; except hospitals may apply for a hardship exception to be adjudicated by the Commissioner of Health. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, such sums as shall be necessary, as determined by the Commissioner of Human Services, to implement the provisions of P.L.2023, c.181 (C.30:4D-7ll.1 et seq) requiring an enhanced per diem reimbursement rate for nursing facilities providing services to a NJ FamilyCare beneficiary residing in a single occupancy room are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, an amount up to the total collected in liquidated damages from Managed Care Organizations pursuant to P.L.2021, c.276 (C.30:4D-7ff et seq.) for failure to meet network adequacy standards may be transferred to administration accounts to fund costs incurred in monitoring network adequacy, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, and subject to any required federal approval, the amounts hereinabove appropriated within the General Medical Services program classification are subject to the following conditions: (1) the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services shall establish a managed care state directed payment program pursuant to 42 CFR 438.6(c) and that provides a supplemental payment for each acute care hospital outpatient visit for which NJ FamilyCare is the primary payer and there is no third-party liability; (2) an outpatient visit is defined as all services billed on a single UB-92, UB-04 or successor claim form related to a singular diagnosis or treatment of services, which did not result in hospitalization; (3) public hospitals shall receive a Medicaid outpatient add-on equal to the difference between the statewide average commercial rate (ACR) and the average managed care payment per hospital outpatient visit, where (a) the average managed care payment per hospital outpatient visit shall be calculated by dividing the total amount of managed care hospital outpatient payments by the number of visits, calculated on managed care encounter payments for which NJ FamilyCare was the primary payer for calendar year 2022, with payment dates between January 1, 2022, and June 30, 2023, with a run-date of not later than September  12, 2023, (b) the ACR shall be calculated using the 2022 Audited Acute Care Hospital (ACH) Cost Reports submitted to the Department of Health as follows: (i) the ACR numerator equals a hospital's gross revenue from patient care for payers as reported on Form E6, Line 1, Column A, Column B, Column F, and Column I minus prior year allowances and adjustments as reported on Form E6, Line 2, Column A, Column B, Column F, and Column I minus current year allowances as reported on Form E6, Line 3, Column A, Column B, Column F and Column I, (ii) the ACR denominator equals the sum of the hospital's visits as reported on Form B6, Column L, Line 1, Line 2, Line 6 and Line 9, and (iii) the ACR equals the sum of the ACR numerators divided by the sum of the ACR denominators for all hospitals submitting an ACH cost report; (4)(a) the remaining non-public, acute care hospitals shall be ranked by their Relative Medicaid Percentage (RMP) from highest to lowest, which shall be calculated using the 2022 ACH Cost Reports submitted to the Department of Health and shall be calculated as follows: (i) the RMP numerator equals a hospital's gross revenue from patient care as reported on Forms E5 and E6, Line 1, Column D and Column H, (ii) the RMP denominator equals a hospital's gross revenue from patient care as reported on Form E4, Line 1, Column E, (iii) the RMP equals the RMP numerator divided by the RMP denominator for each hospital submitting an ACH cost report, and (iv) for instances where hospitals that have a single Medicare identification number submit a separate ACH Cost Report for each individually licensed hospital, the ACH Cost Report data for those hospitals shall be consolidated to the single Medicare identification number, and (b) the top 15 hospitals ranked with the highest RMPs shall receive an outpatient add-on equal to $200 per visit, hospitals with an RMP ranking of 16 through 30 shall receive an outpatient add on equal to $150 per visit, hospitals with an RMP ranking of 31 through 45 shall receive an outpatient add on equal to $100 per visit, and hospitals ranked 46 and lower shall receive an outpatient add on equal to $50 per visit; (5) each of the hospitals located in the ten municipalities in the State containing a hospital that have the lowest median annual household income according to Table S1901 from the 2022 American Community Survey (ACS) 5-Yr Estimate Released December 7, 2023, shall be ranked from the hospital with the highest hospital-specific reimbursed Medicaid and NJ FamilyCare managed care outpatient hospital services to the hospital with the lowest hospital-specific reimbursed Medicaid and NJ FamilyCare managed care outpatient hospital services, as calculated on managed care encounter payments for which NJ FamilyCare was the primary payer for calendar year 2022, with payment dates between January 1, 2022, and June 30, 2023, with a run-date of not later than September  12, 2023, and the hospital in each of the ten municipalities, if any, with the highest reimbursed Medicaid and NJ FamilyCare managed care outpatient hospital services shall receive a 25 percent increase to their designated tier's add-on payment, unless such hospital is publicly owned; (6) hospitals shall receive interim  quarterly Medicaid managed care outpatient hospital payments on or about the 15th of the first month of each  quarter based on calendar year 2022 outpatient visits as calculated in (5) above, which shall be reconciled to actual fiscal year utilization in the subsequent fiscal year's April payment.  In addition, notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, from the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the General Medical Services program classification, the Department of Human Services shall conduct an assessment of the viability and cost to the State of a supplemental Medicaid add-on payment to physician practices that are affiliated with hospital systems for services provided to Medicaid recipients, which may differentiate based on delivery systems employed in different health systems.  The Commissioner of Human Services shall report to the Legislature whether such funding is consistent with federal approvals and does not jeopardize any federal funding. 26  Division of Aging Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 20-7530 Medical Services for the Aged $3,043,000 24-7530 Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled $5,469,000 55-7530 Programs for the Aged $1,330,000 (From General Fund:$459,000) (From Casino Revenue Fund:$871,000) 57-7530 Office of the Public Guardian $2,459,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Division of Aging Services $12,301,000 (From General Fund:$11,430,000) (From Casino Revenue Fund:$871,000) Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($8,967,000) Salaries and Wages (CRF) ($796,000) Materials and Supplies ($137,000) Materials and Supplies (CRF) ($14,000) Services Other Than Personal ($1,715,000) Services Other Than Personal (CRF) ($47,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($372,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges (CRF) ($2,000) Special Purpose: 55 Federal Programs for the Aged ($139,000) 55 NJ Elder Index ($100,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment (CRF) ($12,000) When any action by a county welfare agency, whether alone or in combination with the Department of Human Services, results in a recovery of improperly granted medical assistance, the Department of Human Services may reimburse the county welfare agency in the amount of 25 percent of the gross recovery. Receipts from the Office of the Public Guardian for Elderly Adults are appropriated to the Office of the Public Guardian. GRANTS-IN-AID 24-7530 Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled $89,824,000 (From General Fund:$84,735,000) (From Casino Revenue Fund:$5,089,000) 55-7530 Programs for the Aged $60,397,000 (From General Fund:$44,563,000) (From Casino Revenue Fund:$15,834,000) Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Division of Aging Services $150,221,000 (From General Fund:$129,298,000) (From Casino Revenue Fund:$20,923,000) Grants-in-Aid: 24 Senior Save Navigator Grant Program (P.L.2023, c.79) ($6,700,000) 24 Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged - Claims ($666,000) 24 Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled - Claims ($74,253,000) 24 Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled - Claims (CRF) ($5,089,000) 24 Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program ($3,116,000) 55 Holocaust Survivor Assistance Program, Samost Jewish Family and Children's Services Southern NJ ($650,000) 55 Community Based Senior Programs ($42,663,000) 55 Community Based Senior Programs (CRF) ($15,834,000) 55 Jewish Federation of New Jersey - Meals on Wheels Program ($500,000) 55 Bright Side Manor, Teaneck ($500,000) 55 Jewish Community Housing Corporation of Metropolitan New Jersey - Assited Living Services to Low-Income Seniors ($250,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, amounts hereinabove appropriated for Aging and Disability Resource Connections (ADRC) shall be conditioned upon the following: federal matching funds derived from ADRC or Area Agencies on Aging Medicaid costs, pursuant to an approved cost allocation plan, shall be disbursed to counties solely for the expansion of long-term care services and supports for older adults and individuals seeking home and community based services. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated in the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled-Claims program, notwithstanding the provisions of section 3 of P.L.1975, c.194 (C.30:4D-22) or any law or regulation to the contrary, the copayment in the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled program shall be $5 for generic drugs and $7 for brand name drugs. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled (PAAD) programs are conditioned upon the Department of Human Services coordinating the benefits of the PAAD programs with the prescription drug benefits of the federal "Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003," Pub.L.108-173, as the primary payer due to the current federal prohibition against State automatic enrollment of PAAD program recipients in the federal program. The PAAD program benefit and reimbursement shall only be available to cover the beneficiary cost share to in-network pharmacies and for deductible and coverage gap costs, as determined by the Commissioner of Human Services, associated with enrollment in Medicare Part D for beneficiaries of the PAAD and Senior Gold Prescription Discount programs, and for Medicare Part D premium costs for PAAD beneficiaries. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled program is subject to the following condition: any third party, as defined in subsection m. of section 3 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-3), or in 42 U.S.C. s.1396a(a)(25)(A), including, but not limited to, a pharmacy benefit manager writing health, casualty, or malpractice insurance policies in the State or covering residents of this State, shall enter into an agreement with the Department of Human Services to permit and assist the matching of the Department of Human Services' program eligibility and/or adjudication claims files against that third party's eligibility and/or adjudicated claims files for the purpose of the coordination of benefits, utilizing, if necessary, social security numbers as common identifiers. All funds recovered pursuant to P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.) and P.L.1975, c.194 (C.30:4D-20 et seq.) during the preceding fiscal year are appropriated for payments to providers in the same program classification from which the recovery originated. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, a sufficient portion of receipts generated or savings realized in the Medical Services for the Aged or Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled Grants-In-Aid accounts from initiatives included in the current fiscal year appropriations act may be transferred to administration accounts to fund costs incurred in realizing these additional receipts or savings, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Benefits provided under the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled (PAAD) program, P.L.1975, c.194 (C.30:4D-20 et seq.), and the Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program, P.L.2001, c.96 (C.30:4D-43 et seq.), shall be the last resource benefits, notwithstanding any provisions contained in contracts, wills, agreements, or other instruments. Any provision in a contract of insurance, will, trust agreement, or other instrument which reduces or excludes coverage or payment to an individual because of that individual's eligibility for, or receipt of, PAAD or Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program benefits shall be void, and no PAAD and Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program payments shall be made as a result of any such provision. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no funds appropriated in the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled program classification and the Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program account shall be expended for fee-for-service prescription drug claims with no Medicare Part D coverage except under the following conditions: (1) the maximum allowable cost for legend and non-legend drugs shall be calculated based on Actual Acquisition Cost (AAC) defined as the lowest of (i) the National Average Drug Acquisition Cost (NADAC) Retail Price Survey, developed in accordance with subsection (f) of section 1927 of the Social Security Act;  (ii) Wholesale Acquisition Cost (WAC) less a volume discount, in the absence of a NADAC price, that is consistent with the NJ FamilyCare Program; (iii) the federal upper limit; or (iv) the State upper limit (SUL); and (v) cost acquisition data submitted by providers of pharmaceutical services for brand-name multi-source drugs and multi-source drugs in the absence of  any alternative pricing benchmarks; (2) pharmacy reimbursement for legend and non-legend drugs shall be calculated based on (i) the lower of the AAC plus a professional fee, that is consistent with the NJ FamilyCare Program; or a providers usual and customary charge; or (ii) the lower of cost acquisition data submitted by providers of pharmaceutical services for brand-name multi-source and multi-source drugs, where an alternative pricing benchmark is not available, plus a professional fee that is consistent with the NJ FamilyCare Program; or a providers usual and customary charge. For legend drugs purchased through the 340B Drug Pricing Program, the maximum allowable cost shall be based on the 340B ceiling price.  In the absence of a 340B ceiling price, the alternative benchmark used shall be the WAC minus a volume discount of 25 percent. The 340B ceiling price or the alternative benchmark shall only apply when its price is the lowest compared to the pricing formulas described by (i) through (v) above. Reimbursement for covered outpatient drugs shall be calculated based on: (i) the lower of the AAC plus a professional fee of $10.92; or a providers usual and customary charge; or (ii) the lower of cost acquisition data submitted by providers of pharmaceutical services for brand-name multi-source and multi-source drugs, where an alternative pricing benchmark is not available, plus a professional fee of $10.92; or a providers usual and customary charge. To effectuate the calculation of SUL rates and/or the calculation of single-source and brand-name multi-source legend and non-legend drug costs where an alternative pricing benchmark is not available, the Department of Human Services shall mandate ongoing submission of current drug acquisition data by providers of pharmaceutical services. No funds hereinabove appropriated shall be paid to any entity that fails to submit required data. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no funds appropriated for the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled (PAAD) program, pursuant to P.L.1975, c.194 (C.30:4D-20 et seq.), or the Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program (Senior Gold), pursuant to P.L.2001, c.96 (C.30:4D-43 et seq.), shall be expended, when PAAD or Senior Gold is the primary payer, unless participating pharmaceutical manufacturing companies execute contracts with the Department of Human Services. Name brand manufacturers must provide for the payment of rebates to the State on the same basis as provided for in subsections (a) through (c) of section 1927 of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. s.1396r-8. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no funds appropriated for the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled (PAAD) program pursuant to P.L.1975, c.194 (C.30:4D-20 et seq.), and the Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program, pursuant to P.L.2001, c.96 (C.30:4D-43 et seq.), shall be expended unless participating pharmaceutical manufacturing companies execute contracts with the Department of Human Services, providing for the payment of rebates to the State provided, however, nothing in this paragraph shall apply to insulin products. Furthermore, rebates from pharmaceutical manufacturing companies for prescriptions purchased by the PAAD program and the Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program shall continue during the current fiscal year, provided that the manufacturer's rebates for PAAD claims paid as secondary to Medicare Part D and for the Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program shall apply only to the amount paid by the State under the PAAD and Senior Gold Prescription Discount Programs. All revenues from such rebates during the current fiscal year are appropriated for the PAAD program and the Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled and the Senior Gold Prescription Discount programs, there are appropriated such additional amounts from the General Fund and available federal matching funds as may be required for the payment of claims, credits, and rebates, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the appropriations for the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled program and the Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program are conditioned upon the Department of Human Services coordinating benefits with any voluntary prescription drug mail-order or specialty pharmacy in a Medicare Part D provider network or private third party liability plan network for beneficiaries enrolled in a Medicare Part D program or beneficiaries with primary prescription coverage that requires use of mail order. The mail-order program may waive, discount, or rebate the beneficiary copayment and mail-order pharmacy providers may dispense up to a 90-day supply on prescription refills with the voluntary participation of the beneficiary, subject to the approval of the Commissioner of Human Services and the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Consistent with the requirements of the federal "Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003," Pub.L.108-173, and the current federal prohibition against State automatic enrollment of Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled (PAAD) programs and Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program recipients, no funds hereinabove appropriated to the PAAD program or Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program accounts shall be expended for any individual unless the individual enrolled in the PAAD program or Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program provides all data necessary to enroll the individual in Medicare Part D, including data required for the subsidy assistance, as outlined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled (PAAD) programs, and Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program shall be conditioned upon the following provision: no funds shall be appropriated for the refilling of a prescription drug when paid by PAAD or the Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program as the primary payer until such time as the original prescription is 85 percent finished. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled program or the Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program shall be expended for diabetic testing materials and supplies which are covered under the federal Medicare Part B program, or for vitamins, cough/cold medications, drugs used for the treatment of erectile dysfunction, or cosmetic drugs, including, but not limited to: drugs used for baldness, weight loss, and skin conditions. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled (PAAD) program or the Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program shall be expended to cover medications not on the formulary of a PAAD program or Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program beneficiary's Medicare Part D plan.  This exclusion shall not apply to those drugs covered by the PAAD program and Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program which are specifically excluded by the federal Medicare Prescription Drug Program.  In addition, this exclusion shall not impact the beneficiary's rights, guaranteed by the "Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003", Pub.L.108-173, to appeal the medical necessity of coverage for drugs not on the formulary of a Medicare Part D plan. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for payments for the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled program, P.L.1975, c.194 (C.30:4D-20 et seq.), the Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program, P.L.2001, c.96 (C.30:4D-43 et seq.), and Community Based Senior Programs are available for the payment of obligations applicable to prior fiscal years. From the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged - Claims and Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program, an amount not to exceed $2,850,000 may be transferred to various accounts as required, including Direct State Services accounts, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no funds appropriated in the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled (PAAD) program and Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program accounts shall be available as payment as a PAAD program or the Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program benefit to any pharmacy that is not enrolled as a participating pharmacy in a pharmacy network under Medicare Part D. In order to permit flexibility in implementing ElderCare Initiatives hereinabove appropriated as part of Community Based Senior Programs, amounts may be transferred between Direct State Services and Grants-In-Aid accounts, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notice thereof shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled program, there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be required from the Casino Revenue Fund and available federal matching funds for the payment of claims, credits, and rebates, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for payments for the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled program, P.L.1975, c.194 (C.30:4D-20 et seq.), are available for the payment of obligations applicable to prior fiscal years. Benefits provided under the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled (PAAD) program, P.L.1975, c.194 (C.30:4D-20 et seq.), shall be the last resource benefits, notwithstanding any provision contained in contracts, wills, agreements, or other instruments. Any provision in a contract of insurance, will, trust agreement, or other instrument which reduces or excludes coverage or payment to an individual because of that individual's eligibility for or receipt of PAAD benefits shall be void, and no PAAD payments shall be made as a result of any such provision. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated in the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled-Claims program, notwithstanding the provisions of section 3 of P.L.1975, c.194 (C.30:4D-22) or any law or regulation to the contrary, the copayment in the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled program shall be $5 for generic drugs and $7 for brand name drugs. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, subject to the approval of a plan by the Commissioner of Human Services, no funds appropriated for the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled (PAAD) program, pursuant to P.L.1975, c.194 (C.30:4D-20 et seq.), shall be expended, when PAAD is the primary payer, unless participating pharmaceutical manufacturing companies execute contracts with the Department of Human Services.  Name brand manufacturers must provide for the payment of rebates to the State on the same basis as provided for in subsections (a) through (c) of section 1927 of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. s.1396r-8. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no funds appropriated for the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled (PAAD) program, pursuant to P.L.1975, c.194 (C.30:4D-20 et seq.), shall be expended unless participating pharmaceutical manufacturing companies execute contracts with the Department of Human Services, providing for the payment of rebates to the State provided, however, nothing in this paragraph shall apply to insulin products. Furthermore, rebates from pharmaceutical manufacturing companies for prescriptions purchased by the PAAD program shall continue during the current fiscal year, provided that the manufacturers' rebates for PAAD claims paid as secondary to Medicare Part D shall apply only to the amount paid by the State under the PAAD program. All revenues from such rebates during the current fiscal year are appropriated for the PAAD program. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the appropriations for the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled program are conditioned upon the Department of Human Services coordinating benefits with any voluntary prescription drug mail-order or specialty pharmacy in a Medicare Part D provider network or private third party liability plan network for beneficiaries enrolled in a Medicare Part D program or beneficiaries with primary prescription coverage that requires use of mail-order. The mail-order program may waive, discount, or rebate the beneficiary copayment and mail-order pharmacy providers may dispense up to a 90-day supply on prescription refills with the voluntary participation of the beneficiary, subject to the approval of the Commissioner of Human Services and the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated to the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled (PAAD) program is conditioned upon the Department of Human Services coordinating the benefits of the PAAD program with the prescription drug benefits of the federal "Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003," Pub.L.108-173, as the primary payer due to the current federal prohibition against State automatic enrollment of PAAD program recipients in the federal program. The PAAD program benefit and reimbursement shall only be available to cover the beneficiary cost share to in-network pharmacies and for deductible and coverage gap costs, as determined by the Commissioner of Human Services, associated with enrollment in Medicare Part D for beneficiaries of the PAAD and the Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program, and for Medicare Part D premium costs for PAAD program beneficiaries. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no funds appropriated in the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled (PAAD) program and the Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program accounts shall be available as payment as a PAAD program or Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program benefit to any pharmacy that is not enrolled as a participating pharmacy in a pharmacy network under Medicare Part D. Consistent with the requirements of the federal "Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003," Pub.L.108-173, and the current federal prohibition against State automatic enrollment of Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled (PAAD) program recipients, no funds hereinabove appropriated from the PAAD account shall be expended for any individual enrolled in the PAAD program unless the individual provides all data that may be necessary to enroll the individual in Medicare Part D, including data required for the subsidy assistance, as outlined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled (PAAD) program shall be conditioned upon the following provision: no funds shall be appropriated for the refilling of a prescription drug paid by PAAD as a primary payer until such time as the original prescription is 85 percent finished. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled (PAAD) program shall be expended to cover medications not on the formulary of a PAAD program beneficiary's Medicare Part D plan. This exclusion shall not apply to those drugs covered by PAAD which are specifically excluded by the federal Medicare Prescription Drug Program.  In addition, this exclusion shall not impact the beneficiary's rights, guaranteed by the "Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003," Pub.L.108-173, to appeal the medical necessity of coverage for drugs not on the formulary of a Medicare Part D plan. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled (PAAD) program shall be expended for diabetic testing materials and supplies which are covered under the federal Medicare Part B program, or for vitamins, cough/cold medications, drugs used for the treatment of erectile dysfunction, or cosmetic drugs including but not limited to: drugs used for baldness, weight loss, and skin conditions. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no funds appropriated in the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled program classification and the Senior Gold Prescription Discount Program account shall be expended for fee-for-service prescription drug claims with no Medicare Part D coverage except under the following conditions: (1) the maximum allowable cost for legend and non-legend drugs shall be calculated based on Actual Acquisition Cost (AAC) defined as the lowest of (i) the National Average Drug Acquisition Cost (NADAC) Retail Price Survey, developed in accordance with subsection (f) of section 1927 of the Social Security Act;  (ii) Wholesale Acquisition Cost (WAC) less a volume discount, in the absence of a NADAC price, that is consistent with the NJ FamilyCare program; (iii) the federal upper limit; or (iv) the State upper limit (SUL); and (v) cost acquisition data submitted by providers of pharmaceutical services for brand-name multi-source drugs and multi-source drugs in the absence of  any alternative pricing benchmarks; (2) pharmacy reimbursement for legend and non-legend drugs shall be calculated based on (i) the lower of the AAC plus a professional fee, that is consistent with the NJ FamilyCare Program; or a providers usual and customary charge; or (ii) the lower of cost acquisition data submitted by providers of pharmaceutical services for brand-name multi-source and multi-source drugs, where an alternative pricing benchmark is not available, plus a professional fee that is consistent with the NJ FamilyCare Program; or a providers usual and customary charge. For legend drugs purchased through the 340B Drug Pricing Program, the maximum allowable cost shall be based on the 340B ceiling price.  In the absence of a 340B ceiling price, the alternative benchmark used shall be the WAC minus a volume discount of 25 percent. The 340B ceiling price or the alternative benchmark shall only apply when its price is the lowest compared to the pricing formulas described by (i) through (v) above. Reimbursement for covered outpatient drugs shall be calculated based on: (i) the lower of the AAC plus a professional fee of $10.92; or a providers usual and customary charge; or (ii) the lower of cost acquisition data submitted by providers of pharmaceutical services for brand-name multi-source and multi-source drugs, where an alternative pricing benchmark is not available, plus a professional fee of $10.92; or a providers usual and customary charge. To effectuate the calculation of SUL rates and/or the calculation of single-source and brand-name multi-source legend and non-legend drug costs where an alternative pricing benchmark is not available, the Department of Human Services shall mandate ongoing submission of current drug acquisition data by providers of pharmaceutical services. No funds hereinabove appropriated shall be paid to any entity that fails to submit required data. All funds recovered under P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.) and P.L.1975, c.194 (C.30:4D-20 et seq.), during the current fiscal year are appropriated for payments to providers in the same program classification from which the recovery originated. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, a sufficient portion of receipts generated or savings realized in the Casino Revenue Fund or Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled Grants-In-Aid accounts from initiatives included in the current fiscal year's annual appropriations act may be transferred to administration accounts to fund costs incurred in realizing these additional receipts or savings, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Community Based Senior Programs (CRF) account, $140,000 shall be charged to the Casino Simulcasting Fund. STATE AID 55-7530 Programs for the Aged $6,992,000 (From General Fund:$4,538,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$2,454,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, Division of Aging Services $6,992,000 (From General Fund:$4,538,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$2,454,000) State Aid: 55 County Offices on Aging (PTRF) ($2,454,000) 55 Older Americans Act  State Share ($4,538,000) 27  Disability Services 7545  Division of Disability Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 27-7545 Disability Services $2,256,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Division of Disability Services $2,256,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($1,724,000) Materials and Supplies ($4,000) Services Other Than Personal ($269,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($9,000) Special Purpose: 27 Disability Information Hub ($250,000) GRANTS-IN-AID 27-7545 Disability Services $16,207,000 (From General Fund:$12,473,000) (From Casino Revenue Fund:$3,734,000) Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Division of Disability Services $16,207,000 (From General Fund:$12,473,000) (From Casino Revenue Fund:$3,734,000) Grants-in-Aid: 27 Personal Assistance Services Program ($7,375,000) 27 Personal Assistance Services Program (CRF) ($3,734,000) 27 Transportation/Vocational Services for the Disabled ($2,098,000) 27 New Jersey Association of Centers for Independent Living ($3,000,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1 of P.L.2009, c.181 (C.30:4D-7j), or any other law or regulation to the contrary, providers of Medicaid-funded Personal Care Assistance services shall no longer be required to file cost reports with the Division of Disability Services. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for New Jersey Association of Centers for Independent Living, an amount not to exceed $500,000 shall be allocated to the Centers in amounts to be determined by the Director of the Division of Disability Services for purpose of providing case management services to individuals and supporting the costs of data collection and reporting required by the Division of Disability Services. 30  Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 32  Operation and Support of Educational Institutions DIRECT STATE SERVICES 05-7610 Residential Care and Habilitation Services $65,233,000 99-7610 Administration and Support Services $21,371,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Operation and Support of Educational Institutions $86,604,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($44,179,000) Materials and Supplies ($23,636,000) Services Other Than Personal ($9,541,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($8,288,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($960,000) The State appropriation for the States developmental centers is based on ICF/IDD revenues of $269,236,000, provided that if the ICF/IDD revenues exceed $269,236,000, an amount equal to the excess ICF/IDD revenues may be deducted from the State appropriation for the developmental centers, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In order to permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations and ensure timely payments to service providers, funds may be transferred to and from the various items of appropriation in the Residential Care and Habilitation Services and Administration and Support Services program classifications within the developmental centers accounts, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Operation and Support of Educational Institutions of the Division of Developmental Disabilities, such other amounts provided in Inter-Departmental accounts for Employee Benefits, as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine, are considered as appropriated on behalf of the developmental centers and are available for matching federal funds. 7601  Community Programs DIRECT STATE SERVICES 08-7601 Community Services $7,545,000 99-7601 Administration and Support Services $8,480,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Community Programs $16,025,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($7,381,000) Materials and Supplies ($169,000) Services Other Than Personal ($2,086,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($1,840,000) Special Purpose: 08 New Jersey Donated Dental Program ($170,000) 08 START Regional Response Teams to Address Behavioral Health Crisis in Individuals with Intellectual or Developmental Disabilities ($3,200,000) 99 Developmental Disabilities Council ($298,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($881,000) GRANTS-IN-AID 01-7601 Purchased Residential Care $1,247,113,000 (From General Fund:$657,162,000) (From Casino Revenue Fund:$589,951,000) 02-7601 Social Supervision and Consultation $153,494,000 03-7601 Adult Activities $301,683,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Community Programs $1,702,290,000 (From General Fund:$1,112,339,000) (From Casino Revenue Fund:$589,951,000) Grants-in-Aid: 01 CCP - Individual Supports ($462,151,000) 01 CCP - Individual Supports (CRF) ($589,951,000) 01 Skill Development Homes ($5,498,000) 01 Client Housing ($38,990,000) 01 Contracted Services ($97,200,000) 01 Direct Support Professionals Wage Increase ($53,148,000) 02 Office for Prevention of Developmental Disabilities ($559,000) 02 CCP - Individual and Family Support Services ($43,668,000) 02 Supports Program - Individual and Family Support Services ($109,267,000) 03 Supports Program - Employment and Day Services ($113,673,000) 03 CCP - Employment and Day Services ($188,010,000) 01 LADACIN Network - Monmouth County ($100,000) 01 Recycle Ramp Program - Habitat for Humanity Salem County ($75,000) Cost recoveries from consumers with developmental disabilities collected during the current fiscal year, not to exceed $5,000,000, are appropriated for the continued operation of the Division of Developmental Disabilities community-based residential programs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for CCP - Individual and Family Support Services is conditioned upon the following: the fee-for-service rate for behavioral supports assessment/plan development shall be $22.05 for each 15 minutes and the fee-for-service rate for behavioral supports monitoring shall be no less than $8.26 for each 15 minutes. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Supports Program  Employment and Day Services is conditioned upon the following: the rate for supported employment services shall be no less than $63 per hour. Such amounts as may be necessary are appropriated from the General Fund for the payment of any provider assessments to State ICF/IDD facilities, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting of a plan to be submitted by the Commissioner of Human Services. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, only the federal share of funds anticipated from these assessments shall be available to the Department of Human Services for the purposes set forth in P.L.1998, c.40 (C.30:6D-43 et seq.). Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, $1,338,638,000 of federal Community Care Program funds is appropriated for community-based programs in the Division of Developmental Disabilities. The appropriation of federal Community Care Program funds above this amount is conditional upon the approval of a plan submitted by the Department of Human Services that must be approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In order to permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations and assure timely payment to service providers, funds may be transferred within the Grants-In-Aid accounts within the Division of Developmental Disabilities, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Purchased Residential Care, Social Supervision and Consultation, and Adult Activities program classifications, such additional amounts as may be necessary are appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 33  Supplemental Education and Training Programs 7560  Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired DIRECT STATE SERVICES 11-7560 Services for the Blind and Visually Impaired $8,715,000 99-7560 Administration and Support Services $2,663,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired $11,378,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($8,893,000) Materials and Supplies ($126,000) Services Other Than Personal ($766,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($456,000) Special Purpose: 11 Tuition Reimbursements for Teachers of the Visually Impaired ($213,000) 11 Technology for the Visually Impaired ($746,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($178,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1967, c.271 (C.18A:61-1 et seq) and R.S.18A:46-13, or any law or regulation to the contrary, local boards of education shall reimburse the Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired for the documented costs of providing services to children who are classified as "educationally handicapped"; provided, however, each local board of education shall pay that portion of cost which the number of children classified "educationally handicapped" bears to the total number of such children served; provided further, however, that payments shall be made by each local board in accordance with a schedule adopted by the Commissioners of Education and Human Services, and further, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is authorized to deduct such reimbursements from the State Aid payments to the local boards of education. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Technology for the Visually Impaired account are appropriated for the Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There is appropriated from funds recovered from audits or other collection activities, an amount sufficient to pay vendors' fees to compensate the recoveries and the administration of the State's vending machine program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts in excess of $130,000 are appropriated for the purpose of expanding vision screening services and other prevention services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year of such receipts is appropriated. GRANTS-IN-AID 11-7560 Services for the Blind and Visually Impaired $3,900,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired $3,900,000 Grants-in-Aid: 11 State Match for Federal Grants ($617,000) 11 Educational Services for Children ($2,021,000) 11 Services to Rehabilitation Clients ($1,262,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.A.C.10:91-7.1 or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the amount appropriated for Services to Rehabilitation Clients for reimbursement to providers for vision exam services shall be: $250 for a low vision exam; $275 for a comprehensive low vision exam; and $65 for a low vision follow-up exam. 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 53  Economic Assistance and Security 7550  Division of Family Development DIRECT STATE SERVICES 15-7550 Income Maintenance Management $40,213,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Division of Family Development $40,213,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($17,120,000) Materials and Supplies ($330,000) Services Other Than Personal ($4,944,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($843,000) Special Purpose: 15 Electronic Benefit Transfer/Distribution System ($5,529,000) 15 Work First New Jersey - Technology Investment ($10,489,000) 15 Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program - Process  Technology Improvements ($750,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($208,000) In order to permit flexibility, amounts may be transferred between various items of appropriation within the Income Maintenance Management program classification, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notice thereof shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in accounts where expenditures are required to comply with Maintenance of Effort requirements as specified in the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996," Pub.L.104-193, are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in order to improve the timeliness of benefit deliveries, operational efficiencies, and cost savings and to minimize fraud, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall participate in a no cost, 90 day pilot by which they shall obtain real-time employment and income information, which shall include up-to-date, non-modeled employment and income data provided by employers, from a third-party commercial consumer reporting agency, in accordance with the federal "Fair Credit Reporting Act," 15 U.S.C. s.1681 et seq., for the purpose of assisting with the determination of an individual's eligibility to receive Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and Temporary Assistance for Needy Families and unemployment benefits, including to conduct an analysis on the pilot; and shall undertake efforts to incorporate such real-time employment and income information into existing verification and eligibility determination procedures. GRANTS-IN-AID 15-7550 Income Maintenance Management $539,206,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Division of Family Development $539,206,000 Grants-in-Aid: 15 Work First New Jersey - Training Related Expenses ($1,967,000) 15 Work First New Jersey Support Services ($26,460,000) 15 Work First New Jersey Child Care ($482,505,000) 15 Kinship Care Initiatives ($5,416,000) 15 Hackensack Meridian Health- Fresh Match Program Expansion ($1,500,000) 15 SSI Attorney Fees ($1,823,000) 15 Utility Assistance Payments ($3,297,000) 15 Substance Use Disorder Initiatives ($15,113,000) 15 South Jersey Dream Center - Food Distribution Center ($100,000) 15 The Care Center of New Jersey - Food for HOPE ($1,025,000) In order to permit flexibility, amounts may be transferred between various items of appropriation within the Income Maintenance Management program classification, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notice thereof shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in accounts where expenditures are required to comply with Maintenance of Effort requirements as specified in the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996," Pub.L.104-193, are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amounts appropriated for Work First New Jersey, amounts may be transferred to the various departments in accordance with the Division of Family Development's agreements, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Any unobligated balances remaining from funds transferred to the departments shall be transferred back to the Division of Family Development, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In order to permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations and ensure the timely payment for services provided to clients within Division programs, including but not limited to Social Services for the Homeless, amounts may be transferred between the various items of General Fund and Property Tax Relief Fund appropriations within the Income Maintenance Management program classification, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notice thereof shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Work First New Jersey Program are subject to the following condition: such sums as may be necessary are allocated for the provision of voluntary intensive case management services to all eligible program recipients. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Work First New Jersey Child Care, an amount not to exceed  $50,100,000 is appropriated from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund established pursuant to section 9 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D--9), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no funds hereinabove appropriated for before-school, after-school, and summer wrap around child care shall be expended except in accordance with the following condition: Effective September 1, 2010, families with incomes between 101 percent and 250 percent of the federal poverty level who reside in districts who received Preschool Expansion Aid or Education Opportunity Aid in the 2007-2008 school year shall be subject to a copayment for wrap around child care, based upon a schedule approved by the Department of Human Services and published in the New Jersey Register, and effective September 1, 2010, families who reside in districts who received Preschool Expansion Aid or Education Opportunity Aid in the 2007-2008 school year must meet the eligibility requirements under the New Jersey Cares for Kids child care program, set forth in N.J.A.C.10:15-5.1 et seq., in order to receive free or subsidized wrap around child care. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Work First New Jersey Child Care, there are appropriated such amounts as may be necessary, as determined by the Commissioner of the Department of Human Services, to fund the Work First New Jersey Child Care Program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Social Services for the Homeless, there is appropriated to the Division of Family Development in the Department of Human Services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, an amount not to exceed $5,000,000 to be used to provide case management services to individuals who qualify for such services pursuant to P.L.1997, c.14 (C 44:10-44 et seq.), as amended by P.L.2019, c.74. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Thriving By Three Act (P.L.2022, c.25) account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, every household in the State that is eligible to receive benefits under the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) established pursuant to the "Food and Nutrition Act of 2008," Pub.L.110-246 (7 U.S.C. s.2011 et seq.) shall receive a minimum annual energy assistance payment of $21 in order to qualify the household for a heating and cooling standard utility allowance under SNAP, in accordance with 7 U.S.C. s.2014(e)(6)(C), unless a standard utility allowance would have been unavailable to the household under the State and federal criteria for SNAP and any applicable energy assistance programs that were in place as of July 1, 2013. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Hackensack Meridian Health- Fresh Match Program Expansion account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. STATE AID 15-7550 Income Maintenance Management $384,669,000 (From General Fund:$264,130,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$120,539,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, Division of Family Development $384,669,000 (From General Fund:$264,130,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$120,539,000) State Aid: 15 County Administration Funding (PTRF) ($46,916,000) 15 Work First New Jersey - Client Benefits ($16,230,000) 15 Social Services for the Homeless (PTRF) ($16,220,000) 15 Code Blue (PTRF) ($2,500,000) 15 Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program - Minimum Benefit ($30,250,000) 15 General Assistance Emergency Assistance Program ($47,362,000) 15 Payments for Cost of General Assistance ($45,070,000) 15 Work First New Jersey - Emergency Assistance ($13,754,000) 15 Payments for Supplemental Security Income ($81,096,000) 15 State Supplement Security Income Administrative Fee ($27,618,000) 15 General Assistance County Administration (PTRF) ($26,610,000) 15 Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program Administration - State ($250,000) 15 Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program Administration - State (PTRF) ($28,293,000) 15 Work First New Jersey Menstrual Hygiene and Diaper Benefits Programs ($2,500,000) The net State share of reimbursements and the net balances remaining after full payment of amounts due the federal government of all funds recovered under P.L.1997, c.38 (C.44:10-55 et seq.) and P.L.1950, c.166 (C.30:4B-1 et seq.), at the end of the preceding fiscal year are appropriated for the Work First New Jersey Program. Receipts from State administered municipalities during the preceding fiscal year are appropriated for the same purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Income Maintenance Management are available for payment of obligations applicable to prior fiscal years. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for Income Maintenance Management are conditioned upon the following provision: any change by the Department of Human Services in the standards upon which or from which grants of categorical public assistance are determined, first shall be approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In order to permit flexibility and ensure the timely payment of benefits to welfare recipients, amounts may be transferred between the various items of appropriation within the Income Maintenance Management program classification, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notice thereof shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is authorized to withhold State Aid payments to municipalities to satisfy any obligations due and owing from audits of that municipality's General Assistance program. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in accounts where expenditures are required to comply with Maintenance of Effort requirements as specified in the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996," Pub.L.104-193, and in the Payments for Cost of General Assistance and General Assistance Emergency Assistance Program accounts are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S.46:30B-74 or any other law or regulation to the contrary, balances in the Unclaimed Child Support Trust Fund are appropriated to the Division of Family Development in the Department of Human Services to offset unpaid receivables for the child support program. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated, to the extent that federal child support incentive earnings are available, such additional amounts are appropriated from federal child support incentive earnings to pay on behalf of individuals on whom is imposed a $35 annual child support user fee, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There is appropriated an amount equal to the difference between actual revenue loss reflected in the Earned Income Tax Credit program and the amount anticipated as the revenue loss from the Earned Income Tax Credit to meet federal Maintenance of Effort requirements to allow the Department of Human Services to comply with the Maintenance of Effort requirements as specified in the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996," Pub.L.104-193, and as legislatively required by the Work First New Jersey program established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1997, c.38 (C.44:10-58), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Work First New Jersey - Client Benefits and General Assistance Emergency Assistance Program accounts, an amount not to exceed $6,900,000 is appropriated from the Universal Service Fund for utility payments for Work First New Jersey recipients, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1997, c.14 (C.44:10-49) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Income Maintenance Management program classification shall be subject to the following condition: an assistance unit with two or more children that is eligible for benefits under the Work First New Jersey Program and in receipt of child support shall receive, in addition to its regular grant of cash assistance benefits, a monthly amount of child support based on the current child support received for the month and adjusted for the number of children in the assistance unit, in accordance with federal law. Notwithstanding section 7 of P.L.1997, c.38 (C.44:10-61) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the level of cash assistance benefits payable to an assistance unit with dependent children shall increase as a result of a child having been born to the assistance unit while the assistance unit is receiving assistance. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 2 of P.L.2007, c.97 (C.44:10-63.1) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Income Maintenance Management program classification shall be subject to the following condition: in an assistance unit with a single adult or couple with dependent children, an adult that fails to actively cooperate with the Work First New Jersey Program, established pursuant to P.L.1997, c.38 (C.44:10-55 et seq.), or participate in work activities under the program without good cause, and has therefore entered a pro-rata sanction period, shall have until the end of the sixth month of the pro-rata sanction period to actively cooperate with the program or participate in work activities before the assistance unit's cash assistance case shall be suspended. Notwithstanding any other law or regulation to the contrary, the maximum benefit levels provided to Work First New Jersey recipients shall be 20 percent greater than the assistance levels in effect in State fiscal year 2019. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Work First New Jersey - Emergency Assistance, Payments for Supplemental Security Income and General Assistance Emergency Assistance Program, there is appropriated to the Division of Family Development in the Department of Human Services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, an amount not to exceed $20,000,000 to be used to provide emergency assistance benefits to individuals who qualify for such benefits pursuant to P.L.1997, c.14 (C.44:10-44 et seq.), as amended by P.L.2018, c.164 and P.L.2019, c.74. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program - Minimum Benefit account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Division of Family Development may replace Work First New Jersey and Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits that are determined by the Division to have been stolen through card skimming, card cloning, or similar fraudulent methods, subject to the same conditions that apply to the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, set forth in the federal Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2023, P.L. 117-328, regarding EBT benefit fraud and prevention, and such amounts as may be necessary for the payment of any benefit replacement may be transferred from the various items of State and federal appropriations within the Income Maintenance Management program classification or are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Payments for Cost of General Assistance and General Assistance Emergency Assistance Program are subject to the following condition: the per diem reimbursement rate for hotels and motels shall be $10 greater than the rates in effect during fiscal year 2024. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Payments for Cost of General Assistance and General Assistance Emergency Assistance Program are subject to the following condition:  no funds shall be expended to provide benefits to recipients enrolled in college. For purposes of this provision, "college" is defined as that term is defined at N.J.A.C.9A:1-1.2. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Income Maintenance Management program classification are conditioned upon the following provision: benefits for the General Assistance and General Assistance Emergency Assistance programs shall be made available to individuals regardless of a conviction for distribution of a controlled substance as outlined in paragraph (7) of subsection b. of section 5 of P.L.1997, c.14 (C.44:10-48), provided the individual meets all other eligibility criteria and program rules. From the amount appropriated hereinabove for Payments for Cost of General Assistance, the commissioner shall allocate not less than $6,600,000 to Volunteers of America Delaware Valley to provide enhanced navigation and coordination of housing and homeless services in locations to include but not limited to Camden and Atlantic counties. Receipts from counties for persons receiving Old Age Assistance, Disability Assistance, and Assistance for the Blind under the Supplemental Security Income program are appropriated for the purpose of providing State Aid to the counties, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 3 of P.L.1973, c.256 (C.44:7-87) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for State Supplemental Security Income Administrative Fee is subject to the following condition: in order to expedite and improve efficiency in the administration of the State Supplemental Security Income Program (Program), the Division of Family Development may enter into contracts with one or more other states to issue, on behalf of the State of New Jersey, State Supplemental Social Security checks to clients approved by the State of New Jersey to receive payments under the Program and to pay the state or states for any costs incurred under such contract, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 55  Social Services Programs 7580  Division of the Deaf and Hard of Hearing DIRECT STATE SERVICES 23-7580 Services for the Deaf $2,371,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Division of the Deaf and Hard of Hearing $2,371,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($943,000) Services Other Than Personal ($40,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($1,000) Special Purpose: 23 Services to Deaf Clients ($783,000) 23 Leveling the Playing Field Early Intervention Program ($550,000) 23 Communication Access Services ($54,000) GRANTS-IN-AID 23-7580 Services for the Deaf $320,000 (From Casino Revenue Fund:$320,000) Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Division of the Deaf and Hard of Hearing $320,000 (From Casino Revenue Fund:$320,000) Grants-in-Aid: 23 Hearing Aid Assistance to the Aged and Disabled Program (CRF) ($320,000) In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Hearing Aid Assistance for the Aged and Disabled programs, there are appropriated from the Casino Revenue Fund and available federal matching funds such additional amounts as may be required for the payment of claims, credits, and rebates, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, amounts appropriated for the Hearing Aid Assistance to the Aged and Disabled program are subject to the following condition: reimbursements are available to eligible program participants for hearing aids up to a maximum reimbursement of $500 per hearing aid per calendar year, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 76  Management and Administration 7500  Division of Management and Budget DIRECT STATE SERVICES 96-7500 Institutional Security Services $8,268,000 99-7500 Administration and Support Services $57,099,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Division of Management and Budget $65,367,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($39,141,000) Materials and Supplies ($363,000) Services Other Than Personal ($11,684,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($865,000) Special Purpose: 96 Human Services Police Dispatch ($730,000) 99 Nurture NJ ($2,000,000) 99 Office of State Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion ($850,000) 99 Language Access and Translation Services (P.L.2023, c.263) ($1,000,000) 99 Long-Term Care Integrity and Oversight ($1,150,000) 99 Transfer to State Police for Fingerprinting/Background Checks of Job Applicants ($6,484,000) 99 Office of New Americans ($500,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($600,000) Revenues representing receipts to the General Fund from charges to residents' trust accounts for maintenance costs are appropriated for use as personal needs allowances for patients/residents who have no other source of funds for these purposes; except that the total amount herein for these allowances shall not exceed $150,000 and any increase in the maximum monthly allowance shall be approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount appropriated for Legal Services of New Jersey, $8,200,000, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, shall be made available by the Department of Human Services to one or more qualified organizations as determined by the Commissioner of Human Services for the provision of legal services and related costs to individuals at risk of detention or deportation based on their immigration status. GRANTS-IN-AID 99-7500 Administration and Support Services $12,930,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Division of Management and Budget $12,930,000 Grants-in-Aid: 99 Legal Services ($4,500,000) 99 Unit Dose Contracting Services ($3,000,000) 99 Consulting Pharmacy Services ($3,930,000) 99 Kids In Need of Defense (KIND) - Legal Services for Unaccompanied Minors ($1,500,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Legal Services shall be made available to Kids in Need of Defense (KIND) and subgrantees as determined by the Commissioner of the Department of Human Services to provide legal representation and case management to unaccompanied children and similarly situated youth living in New Jersey, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Department of Human Services, Total State Appropriation $9,851,331,000 Balances on hand at the end of the preceding fiscal year of funds held for the benefit of patients in the several institutions, and such funds as may be received, are appropriated for the use of the patients. Funds received from the sale of articles made in occupational therapy departments of the several institutions are appropriated for the purchase of additional material and other expenses incidental to such sale or manufacture. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated to the Department of Human Services shall be conditioned upon the following provision: any change in program eligibility criteria and increases in the types of services or rates paid for services to or on behalf of clients for all programs under the purview of the Department of Human Services, not mandated by federal law, first shall be approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, receipts from payments collected from clients receiving services from the Department of Human Services and collected from their chargeable relatives, are appropriated to offset administrative and contract expenses related to the charging, collecting, and accounting of payments from clients receiving services from the department and from their chargeable relatives pursuant to R.S.30:1-12, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Payment to vendors for their efforts in maximizing federal revenues is appropriated and shall be paid from the federal revenues received, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in this account is appropriated. Unexpended State balances may be transferred among Department of Human Services accounts in order to comply with the State Maintenance of Effort requirements as specified in the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996," Pub.L.104-193, and as statutorily required by the Work First New Jersey Program established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1997, c.38 (C.44:10-58), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notice of such transfers that would result in appropriations or expenditures exceeding the State's Maintenance of Effort requirement obligation shall be subject to the approval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee. In addition, unobligated balances remaining from funds allocated to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development for Work First New Jersey as of June 1 of each year are to be reverted to the Work First New Jersey-Client Benefits account in order to comply with the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996," and as statutorily required by the Work First New Jersey Program. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Department of Human Services is authorized to identify opportunities for increased recoveries to the General Fund and to the department. Such funds collected are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, in accordance with a plan prepared by the department, and approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. To effectuate the orderly consolidation or closure of a developmental center, amounts hereinabove appropriated for the State developmental centers may be transferred to accounts throughout the Department of Human Services in accordance with the plan adopted pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1996, c.150 (C.30:1-7.4) to consolidate or close a developmental center, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year due to opportunities for increased recoveries in the Department of Human Services are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. These recoveries may be transferred to the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services to support the General Medical Services program classification, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1985, c.286 (C.30:4D-6a) and subsection h. of section 3 of P.L.1973, c.256 (C.44:7-87) or the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the minimum monthly personal needs allowance provided to persons residing in nursing facilities, State or county psychiatric hospitals, and State Developmental Centers who are eligible for Medicaid or SSI benefits shall be $50. To effectuate the purposes of this provision, amounts may be transferred from General Medical Services appropriations to other accounts in the department and the Department of Health, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Purchased Residential Care, Social Supervision and Consultation, Adult Activities, Community Services, Addiction Services, and Administration and Support Services program classifications are available for the payment of obligations applicable to prior fiscal years, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Summary of Department of Human Services Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services ........................................... $346,248,000 Grants-in-Aid ...................................................... $8,967,258,000 State Aid .............................................................. $537,825,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund ....................................................... $8,962,375,000 Property Tax Relief Fund .................................... $273,157,000 Casino Revenue Fund ....................................... $615,799,000 62 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 51  Economic Planning and Development DIRECT STATE SERVICES 99-4565 Administration and Support Services $3,650,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Economic Planning and Development $3,650,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($789,000) Materials and Supplies ($11,000) Services Other Than Personal ($748,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($25,000) Special Purpose: 99 Healthcare Ombudsperson ($1,327,000) 99 Center for Occupational Employment Information ($750,000) Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Administration and Support Services program classification, $538,000 is appropriated from the Unemployment Compensation Auxiliary Fund. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Administration and Support Services program, an amount not to exceed $550,000 is appropriated from the Unemployment Compensation Auxiliary Fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Fines and penalties collected pursuant to violations of P.L.1945, c.169 (C.10:5-1 et seq.) are hereby appropriated for program costs. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Administration and Support Services program, $31,000 is payable out of the State Disability Benefits Fund and, in addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Administration and Support Services program, there are appropriated from the State Disability Benefits Fund such additional amounts as may be required to administer the program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Unemployment Processing Modernization and Improvements account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of the "New Jersey Urban Enterprise Zones Act," P.L.1983, c.303 (C.52:27H-60 et seq.), there is appropriated to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development from the Enterprise Zone Assistance Fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, such amounts as are necessary to pay for employer rebate awards as approved by the Commissioner of Community Affairs. The amount necessary to provide administrative costs incurred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development to meet the statutory requirements of the "New Jersey Urban Enterprise Zones Act," P.L.1983, c.303 (C.52:27H-60 et seq.) is appropriated from the Enterprise Zone Assistance Fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Administration and Support Services, there is appropriated $1,600,000 from the New Jersey Builders Utilization Initiative for Labor Diversity, pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2009, c.313 (C.52:38-7), for enforcing the provisions of P.L.2009, c.335 (C.52:40-1 et seq.), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 53  Economic Assistance and Security DIRECT STATE SERVICES 03-4520 State Disability Insurance Plan $33,617,000 04-4520 Private Disability Insurance Plan $5,685,000 05-4525 Workers' Compensation $14,552,000 06-4530 Special Compensation $2,268,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Economic Assistance and Security $56,122,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($35,956,000) Materials and Supplies ($343,000) Services Other Than Personal ($6,440,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($2,938,000) Special Purpose: 03 State Disability Insurance Plan ($300,000) 03 State Disability Benefits Fund - Joint Tax Functions ($5,500,000) 03 Family Leave Insurance ($4,142,000) 04 Private Disability Insurance Plan ($100,000) 05 Workers' Compensation ($363,000) 06 Special Compensation ($40,000) An amount not to exceed $150,000 for the cost of notifying unemployment compensation recipients of the availability of New Jersey Earned Income Tax Credit information, pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2005, c.210 (C.43:21-4.2), is appropriated from the Unemployment Compensation Auxiliary Fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount necessary to pay interest due on any advances made from the federal unemployment account under Title XII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C.s.1321 et seq.) is hereby appropriated from the Unemployment Compensation Auxiliary Fund if the Commissioner of Labor determines that there are sufficient moneys in the Unemployment Compensation Auxiliary Fund to repay all or a portion of the interest amount due on September 30 of that calendar year.  Additionally, the amount necessary to pay interest due on any advances made under Title XII of the Social Security Act is appropriated from Unemployment Compensation Interest Repayment Fund established in the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated, there is appropriated from the Unemployment Compensation Auxiliary Fund, an amount not to exceed $45,000,000 to support the Unemployment Insurance program as well as costs associated with certain State required notifications to Unemployment Insurance claimants and for the support of the workforce development system, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for administrative costs associated with the State Disability Insurance Plan, there is appropriated from the State Disability Benefits Fund an amount not to exceed $10,000,000, such amount to include $1,000,000 for a reengineering study of the business process, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for the State Disability Insurance Plan and Private Disability Insurance Plan are payable out of the State Disability Benefits Fund. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the State Disability Insurance Plan and Private Disability Insurance Plan, there are appropriated from the State Disability Benefits Fund such additional amounts as may be required to pay disability benefits, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the State Disability Insurance Plan and the Private Disability Insurance Plan, there are appropriated from the State Disability Benefits Fund such additional amounts as may be required to administer the State Disability Insurance Plan and the Private Disability Insurance Plan. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the State Disability Insurance Plan, there are appropriated from the Family Temporary Disability Leave Account within the State Disability Benefits Fund such amounts as may be required to pay benefits during periods of family temporary disability leave and the associated administrative costs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Workers' Compensation program, there are appropriated receipts in excess of the amount anticipated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Special Compensation program, there are appropriated receipts in excess of the amount anticipated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Special Compensation program shall be payable from the Second Injury Fund and, notwithstanding the $12,500 limitation set forth in R.S.34:15-95, in addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Special Compensation program, there are appropriated from the Second Injury Fund such additional amounts as may be required for costs of administration and beneficiary payments. There is appropriated from the balance in the Second Injury Fund an amount not to exceed $1,000,000 to be deposited to the credit of the Uninsured Employer's Fund for the payment of benefits as determined in accordance with section 11 of P.L.1966, c.126 (C.34:15-120.2). Any amount so transferred shall be included in the next Uninsured Employer's Fund surcharge imposed in accordance with section 10 of P.L.1966, c.126 (C.34:15-120.1) and any amount so transferred shall be returned to the Second Injury Fund without interest and shall be included in net assets of the Second Injury Fund pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection c. of R.S.34:15-94. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the funds appropriated for Second Injury Fund benefits are available for the payment of obligations applicable to prior fiscal years. Amounts to administer the Uninsured Employer's Fund are appropriated from the Uninsured Employer's Fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S.43:21-16 or any other law or regulation to the contrary, any recoveries from fines and penalties assessed on or before October 21, 2013 in connection with fraudulently obtained unemployment insurance benefits are appropriated and shall be deposited into the Unemployment Compensation Auxiliary Fund. From the funds made available to the State under section 903(d)(4) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. s.1103 et seq.), as amended, the amount of $19,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the continued maintenance and improvement of services to unemployment insurance claimants through the improvement and modernization of the benefit payment system and other technology improvements and to employment service clients through the continued development and maintenance of one-stop offices throughout the State and other investments in technology, processes, and services that will enhance job opportunities for clients. An amount not to exceed $3,000,000 is appropriated from the funds made available to the State under section 903(d)(4) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. s.1103 et seq.), as amended, for enhancing the Departments effort in auditing and collection of unemployment contribution obligations, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 54 Workforce and Employment Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 07-4535 Vocational Rehabilitation Services $2,704,000 09-4545 Employment Services $11,329,000 10-4545 Employment and Training Services $5,500,000 12-4550 Workplace Standards $13,241,000 16-4555 Public Sector Labor Relations $4,249,000 17-4560 Private Sector Labor Relations $1,300,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Workforce and Employment Services $38,323,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($22,777,000) Materials and Supplies ($33,000) Services Other Than Personal ($1,288,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($26,000) Special Purpose: 09 Workforce Development Partnership Program ($1,909,000) 09 Workforce Development Partnership - Counselors ($81,000) 09 Workforce Literacy and Basic Skills Program ($2,000,000) 10 Opioid Initiatives ($5,000,000) 10 Teacher Apprenticeships ($500,000) 12 Worker and Community Right to Know Act ($30,000) 12 Worker Health & Safety ($750,000) 12 Teen Summer Working Hours Database (P.L.2022, c.63) ($1,000,000) 12 Public Works Contractor Registration ($2,790,000) 12 Safety Commission ($3,000) 12 Domestic Work Enforcement Program (P.L.2023, c.262) ($100,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($36,000) The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Vocational Rehabilitation Services program classification is appropriated from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Vocational Rehabilitation Services program classification is available for the payment of obligations applicable to prior fiscal years. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Salaries and Wages for the Vocational Rehabilitation Services program classification shall be conditioned on the following: a) prior to determination of funding levels for the various services funded by any State or federal funds for vocational rehabilitation services, including but not limited to slot values and transportation, the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development shall consult with the sheltered workshop provider community to ensure a fair and adequate allocation of funding; and b) the Commissioner shall notify the Joint Budget Oversight Committee not less than 10 days prior to implementation of any change in rates for vocational rehabilitation services. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there is appropriated for the Council on Gender Parity an amount not to exceed $72,000 from the Unemployment Compensation Auxiliary Fund for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Workforce Development Partnership Program and Workforce Development Partnership - Counselors shall be appropriated from receipts from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund, pursuant to P.L.1992, c.44 (C.34:15D-12 et seq.), together with such additional amounts as may be required to administer the Workforce Development Partnership Program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, up to 15 percent of the amount available from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund for the Supplemental Workforce Development Benefits Program shall be appropriated as necessary to fund additional administrative costs relating to the processing and payment of benefits, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1992, c.44 (C.34:15D-12 et seq.), or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Workforce Development Partnership Fund is appropriated to such fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Workforce Literacy and Basic Skills Program shall be appropriated from receipts received pursuant to P.L.2001, c.152 (C.34:15D-21 et seq.), together with such additional amounts as may be required to administer the Workforce Literacy Program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts in excess of the amount anticipated for the Workplace Standards program and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year are appropriated for the same program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Supplemental Workforce Fund for Basic Skills," P.L.2001, c.152 (C.34:15D-21 et seq.), or any law or regulation to the contrary, the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Supplemental Workforce Fund for Basic Skills is appropriated to such fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Any excess receipts that are appropriated to the Workplace Standards program and that are available may be used by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development as match for any federal programs requiring a State match. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Workplace Standards Salaries and Wages, an amount not less than $2,000,000 shall be allocated for the costs of additional staff assigned to enforce the provisions of the New Jersey Prevailing Wage Act, P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.). Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Workplace Standards Salaries and Wages, an amount not less than $1,000,000 shall be allocated to the Office of Strategic Enforcement for the costs of additional staff assigned to enforce the provisions of the New Jersey Prevailing Wage Act, P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.). The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Teen Summer Working Hours Database (P.L.2022, c.63) is appropriated from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Temporary Worker - Bill of Rights (P.L.2023, c.10) account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Worker and Community Right To Know Act," P.L.1983, c.315 (C.34:5A-1 et seq.), the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Worker and Community Right To Know Act account is payable from the Worker and Community Right To Know Fund.  If receipts to that fund are less than anticipated, the appropriation shall be reduced proportionately. Receipts in excess of the amount anticipated for the Public Works Contractor Registration program and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year are appropriated for the Public Works Contractor Registration program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of the "New Jersey Employer-Employee Relations Act," P.L.1941, c.100 (C.34:13A-1 et seq.), the cost of fact-finding shall be borne equally by the public employer and the exclusive employee representative. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Private Sector Labor Relations program classification is appropriated from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund. From the appropriation provided hereinabove in support of office leases, and notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1992, c.130 (C.52:18A-191.1 et seq.), the State Treasurer, in consultation with the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development, is hereby authorized to enter into cost-sharing agreements with any authorized non-State partner that offers programs and activities supported primarily by federal funds from the United States Departments of Labor and Education in the State's one-stop centers for the purpose of co-locating such partner in an office with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development providing rent costs shall be equitably shared in accordance with a cost allocation plan approved by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development. There are appropriated from the Wage and Hour Trust Fund and the Prevailing Wage Act Trust Fund such amounts as may be necessary for payments. GRANTS-IN-AID 07-4535 Vocational Rehabilitation Services $54,644,000 (From General Fund:$52,448,000) (From Casino Revenue Fund:$2,196,000) 10-4545 Employment and Training Services $29,376,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Workforce and Employment Services $84,020,000 (From General Fund:$81,824,000) (From Casino Revenue Fund:$2,196,000) Grants-in-Aid: 07 Vocational Rehabilitation Services ($41,938,000) 07 Vocational Rehabilitation Services (CRF) ($2,196,000) 07 Services to Clients (State Share) ($4,432,000) 07 Direct Support Professionals Wage Increase ($1,678,000) 07 Mid-Atlantic States Career and Education Center ($1,000,000) 07 ACCSES NJ - Extended Employment ($2,700,000) 07 ACCSES NJ - Extended Employment - Transportation ($700,000) 10 New Jersey Youth Corps ($2,325,000) 10 Work First New Jersey Work Activities ($26,751,000) 10 Progress 360 ($250,000) 10 Camden County Youth Services Commission - Job Training and Workforce Investment Pilot Program ($50,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Vocational Rehabilitation Services, there is appropriated  $20,000,000 from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund. Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Vocational Rehabilitation Services, an amount not less than $46,776,000 shall be allocated for the Extended Employment client slots and shall be paid in 12 equal monthly payments of $3,898,000, commencing in July 2024. These funds shall be contracted in July, and the first payment shall be paid to providers in July 2024. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Vocational Rehabilitation Services is conditioned upon the following: the rates for Pre-Placement, Supported Employment Intensive Job Coaching, Time-Limited Job Coaching, and Long-Term Follow Along services shall be no less than $64 per hour. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Vocational Rehabilitation Services, there is appropriated $9,114,000 from the Supplemental Workforce Fund for Basic Skills. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Vocational Rehabilitation Services, such sums as may be necessary to allow for the matching of federal funds made available pursuant to 29 U.S.C.  s.730 are hereby appropriated from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Vocational Rehabilitation Services program classification is available for the payment of obligations applicable to prior fiscal years. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Vocational Rehabilitation Services, there is appropriated an additional $5,000,000 from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund for Extended Employment (Center based jobs), Extended Employment Transportation, and Long-Term Follow Along Services which shall be allocated in the same amounts as in Fiscal Year 2020. Further, there is appropriated an additional $5,000,000 from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund, of which $3,600,000 shall be allocated for the Extended Employment client slots, and $1,400,000 shall be allocated for Extended Employment Transportation. Further, there is appropriated an additional $10,500,000 from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund for Extended Employment. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Vocational Rehabilitation Services, an amount not to exceed $2,000,000 to allow for the matching of federal funds made available pursuant to 29 U.S.C. s.730 is hereby appropriated from the Supplemental Workforce Fund for Basic Skills, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Future of Work Initiatives account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Employment and Training Services program classification, an amount not to exceed $50,000 is appropriated from the Unemployment Compensation Auxiliary Fund for costs incurred by the Disadvantaged Youth Employment Opportunities Council, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for New Jersey Youth Corps, $2,325,000 is appropriated from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund, section 9 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-9) and an amount not to exceed 10 percent from all funds available to the program shall be made available for administrative costs incurred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Work First New Jersey Work Activities and Work First New Jersey-Training Related Expenses, $8,190,000 is appropriated from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund, section 9 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-9), together with such additional amounts as may be required to administer the Work First New Jersey Program, as determined by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Work First New Jersey Work Activities, an amount not to exceed three percent shall be made available for administrative costs incurred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Work First New Jersey Work Activities and Work First New Jersey-Training Related Expenses accounts, an amount not to exceed $21,500,000 is appropriated from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund, section 9 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-9), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Employment and Training Services, an amount not to exceed $27,500,000 is appropriated from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund, section 9 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-9), for the purpose of funding the New Jersey Apprenticeship Network, the Career Accelerator Internship Program, the Workforce Development Policy and Evaluation Lab, the New Jersey Career Network, the New Jersey Economic Development Authority Workforce Development Partnership, and such other priority additional workforce initiatives recommended by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount appropriated for Employment and Training Services program classification, there is appropriated an additional $6,000,000 from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund for NJ Community College Consortium for Workforce and Economic Development. 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 74  General Government Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 22-4575 General Administration, Agency Services, Test Development and Analytics $23,009,000 24-4580 Appeals and Regulatory Affairs $3,818,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, General Government Services $26,827,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Civil Service Commission ($5,000) Salaries and Wages ($24,176,000) Materials and Supplies ($332,000) Services Other Than Personal ($1,331,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($141,000) Special Purpose: 22 Test Validation/Police Testing ($434,000) 22 Americans with Disabilities Act ($60,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($348,000) Receipts from fees charged to applicants for open competitive or promotional examinations, and the unexpended fee balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year, collected from firefighter and law enforcement examination receipts, are appropriated for the costs of administering these exams, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from fees charged for appeals to the Civil Service Commission are appropriated for the costs of administering the appeals process, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from Training and Development (CLIP) and any unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year are appropriated for costs related to that program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Department of Labor and Workforce Development, Total State Appropriation $208,942,000 Summary of Department of Labor and Workforce Development Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services ........................................... $124,922,000 Grants-in-Aid ...................................................... $84,020,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund ....................................................... $206,746,000 Casino Revenue Fund ........................................ $2,196,000 66  DEPARTMENT OF LAW AND PUBLIC SAFETY 10 Public Safety and Criminal Justice 12 Law Enforcement DIRECT STATE SERVICES 06-1200 State Police Operations $431,266,000 09-1020 Criminal Justice $62,136,000 30-1460 Gaming Enforcement $68,685,000 (From Casino Control Fund:$68,685,000) 99-1200 Administration and Support Services $37,846,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Law Enforcement $599,933,000 (From General Fund:$531,248,000) (From Casino Control Fund:$68,685,000) Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($290,701,000) Salaries and Wages (CCF) ($60,413,000) Cash in Lieu of Maintenance ($46,313,000) Cash in Lieu of Maintenance (CCF) ($1,006,000) Materials and Supplies ($17,974,000) Materials and Supplies (CCF) ($350,000) Services Other Than Personal ($26,951,000) Services Other Than Personal (CCF) ($2,518,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($6,333,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges (CCF) ($2,348,000) Special Purpose: 06 Nuclear  Emergency Response Program ($373,000) 06 Drunk Driver Fund Program ($350,000) 06 State Police DNA Laboratory Enhancement ($4,904,000) 06 Urban Search and Rescue ($1,000,000) 06 Rural Section Policing ($87,002,000) 06 Waterfront Operations ($4,000,000) 06 ARRIVE Together Pilot Program (P.L.2022, c.36) ($300,000) 06 Expungement Unit ($13,000,000) 09 Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program ($4,200,000) 09 Division of Criminal Justice - State Match ($750,000) 09 Office of Public Integrity & Accountability ($8,517,000) 09 Police Training Commission ($3,200,000) 09 Expenses of State Grand Jury ($356,000) 09 Medicaid Fraud Investigation - State Match ($1,758,000) 09 Victim and Witness Advocacy Fund ($500,000) 30 Gaming Enforcement (CCF) ($1,500,000) 99 Emergency Operations Center and Hamilton TechPlex Maintenance ($3,473,000) 99 N.C.I.C. 2000 Project ($1,575,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($7,718,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment (CCF) ($550,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Criminal Justice salaries, an amount not to exceed $1,000,000, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, shall be used for the costs of increased staffing for labor enforcement matters. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Division of Criminal Justice - State Match, an amount not to exceed $600,000 is appropriated to provide State matching funds for the purpose of strengthening and expanding services related to Internet Crimes Against Children cases, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Police Training Commission program is appropriated from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, all fees and receipts collected pursuant to section 21 of P.L.2022, c.65 (C.52:17B-71h) are appropriated to fund a portion of the operational costs of the Police Training Commission program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, receipts from the recovery of costs associated with the implementation of the "Criminal Justice Act of 1970," P.L.1970, c.74 (C.52:17B-97 et seq.), are appropriated for the purpose of offsetting the costs of the Division of Criminal Justice, and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Criminal Justice Cost Recovery account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Victim and Witness Advocacy Fund account, together with receipts pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1979, c.396 (C.2C:43-3.1) is appropriated. Such additional amounts as may be required to carry out the provisions of the "New Jersey Antitrust Act" P.L.1970, c.73 (C.56:9-1 et seq.) are appropriated from the General Fund, provided, however, that any expenditures therefrom shall be subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts in excess of the amount anticipated from license fees and/or audits conducted to insure compliance with "The Private Detective Act of 1939," P.L.1939, c.369 (C.45:19-8 et seq.), are appropriated to defray the cost of this activity. Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated to the Division of State Police, there shall be credited against such amounts such monies as are received by the Division of State Police pursuant to a Memorandum of Understanding between the Division of State Police and the New Jersey Schools Development Authority for services rendered by the Division of State Police in connection with the school construction program. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law or regulation to the contrary, none of the monies appropriated to the Division of State Police shall be used to provide police protection to the inhabitants of rural sections pursuant to R.S.53:2-1 in a municipality in which such services were not provided in the previous fiscal year or to expand such services in a municipality beyond the level at which such services were provided in the previous fiscal year. All fees and receipts collected, pursuant to paragraph (7) of subsection 1. of N.J.S.2C:39-6, the Retired Officer Handgun Permits program, and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year, are appropriated to offset the costs of administering the application process, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated in the Rural Section Policing account, amounts may be transferred to salary and other operating accounts within the Division of State Police, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Drunk Driver Fund Program, there is appropriated $612,000 from the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission for the Drunk Driver Fund Program. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Waterfront Operations, there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be required to support the New Jersey State Police waterfront operations in accordance with P.L.2017, c.324 (C.53:2-8 et seq.) and to pay for the costs and expenses of transitioning the responsibilities of the Waterfront Commission to the New Jersey State Police, including long-term costs and expenses resulting from the transition, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Drunk Driver Fund Program account, together with any receipts in excess of the amount anticipated in the Drunk Driving Fines account in the Department of Transportation, are appropriated to the Drunk Driver Fund Program account in the Department of Law and Public Safety, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Drunk Driver Fund Program is payable out of the Drunk Driving Enforcement Fund established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1984, c.4 (C.39:4-50.8) designated for this purpose and any amount remaining therein.  If receipts to the fund are less than anticipated, the appropriation shall be reduced proportionately. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 3 of P.L.1985, c.69 (C.53:1-20.7), the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year, in the Noncriminal Record Checks account, together with any receipts in excess of the amount anticipated are appropriated for use of the Division of State Police, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for State Police Operations, such amounts as may be required for the purpose of offsetting costs of the provision of State Police services are appropriated from indirect cost recoveries received from the New Jersey Highway Authorities and other agencies, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, receipts pursuant to the New Jersey Emergency Medical Service Helicopter Response Act, under subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.1992, c.87 (C.39:3-8.2) are appropriated to the Division of State Police and the Department of Health to defray the operating costs of the New Jersey Emergency Medical Service Helicopter Response Program as authorized under P.L.1986, c.106 (C.26:2K-35 et seq.) and the general aviation program.  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year is appropriated to the special capital maintenance reserve account for capital replacement and major maintenance of medevac and general aviation helicopter equipment and any expenditures therefrom shall be subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts pursuant to the New Jersey Emergency Medical Service Helicopter Response Act under subsection c. of section 1 of P.L.1992, c.87 (C.39:3-8.2) are appropriated to the Division of State Police to fund the costs of new State Police recruit training classes.  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year is appropriated for this purpose subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  No funds shall be expended to expand services in a manner that duplicates service currently provided.  The Department of Health and the Division of State Police shall establish performance metrics to ensure the appropriate delivery of State-wide emergency medical helicopter service and that no inefficient duplication of State funded service exists. Receipts in the "Commercial Vehicle Enforcement Fund" established pursuant to section 17 of P.L.1995, c.157 (C.39:8-75) are appropriated to offset all reasonable and necessary expenses of the Division of State Police and the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission in the performance of commercial truck safety and emission inspections, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, receipts and available balances collected pursuant to the New Jersey Emergency Medical Service Helicopter Response Act, subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.1992, c.87 (C.39:3-8.2), not to exceed $5,000,000, are appropriated for State Police salaries, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, receipts and available balances pursuant to the New Jersey Emergency Medical Service Helicopter Response Act under subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.1992, c.87 (C.39:3-8.2), not to exceed $5,000,000 are appropriated for State Police vehicles, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. All fees, penalties and receipts collected, pursuant to the "Security Officer Registration Act," P.L.2004, c.134 (C.45:19A-1 et seq.) and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year, are appropriated to offset the costs of administering this process, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts and available balances from the agency surcharge on vehicle rentals pursuant to section 54 of P.L.2002, c.34 (C.App.A:9-78), not to exceed $13,305,000 for State Police salaries related to Statewide security services, are appropriated for those purposes and shall be deposited into a dedicated account, the expenditure of which shall be subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated to the Divisions of State Police and Criminal Justice, there are appropriated to the respective State departments and agencies such amounts as may be received or receivable from any instrumentality, municipality, or public authority for direct and indirect costs of all services furnished thereto, except as to such costs for which funds have been included in appropriations otherwise made to the respective State departments and agencies as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. There is appropriated, an amount up to $25,000, from the General Fund, to pay for each award or each tip for information that prevents, frustrates, or favorably resolves acts of international or domestic terrorism against New Jersey persons or property, as well as tips related to the identification of illegal guns, drugs and gangs.  Rewards may also be paid for information leading to the arrest or conviction of terrorists and/or gang members attempting, committing, conspiring to commit or aiding and abetting in the commission of such acts or to the identification or location of an individual who holds a key leadership position in a terrorist and/or gang organization, subject to the approval of the Attorney General and the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Gaming Enforcement, there are appropriated from the Casino Control Fund such additional amounts as may be required for gaming enforcement, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Meadowlands Study account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 06-1200 State Police Operations $386,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Law Enforcement $386,000 Grants-in-Aid: 06 Nuclear Emergency Response Program ($386,000) The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the NJ Statewide Body Worn Camera Program account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Nuclear Emergency Response Program account is payable from receipts pursuant to the assessment of electrical utility companies under P.L.1981, c.302 (C.26:2D-37 et seq.). The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Nuclear Emergency Response Program account is appropriated for the same purpose. STATE AID 06-1200 State Police Operations $26,765,000 (From General Fund:$19,765,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$7,000,000) 09-1020 Criminal Justice $2,000,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$2,000,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, Law Enforcement $28,765,000 (From General Fund:$19,765,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$9,000,000) State Aid: 06 ARRIVE Together Pilot Program (P.L.2022, c.36) ($19,765,000) 06 Essex Crime Prevention (PTRF) ($7,000,000) 09 Safe and Secure Neighborhoods Program (PTRF) ($2,000,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the ARRIVE Together Pilot Program (P.L.2022, c.36) shall not be expended to pay salary or overtime expenses for law enforcement officers in participating law enforcement agencies, and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the ARRIVE Together Pilot Program (P.L.2022, c.36), an amount not to exceed $500,000 shall be available for administrative expenses of the Office of Alternative and Community Responses, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 13 Special Law Enforcement Activities DIRECT STATE SERVICES 03-1160 Division of Highway Traffic Safety $1,265,000 17-1420 Election Law Enforcement $6,662,000 20-1450 Review and Enforcement of Ethical Standards $1,428,000 22-1410 Regulation of Racing Activities $20,000,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Special Law Enforcement Activities $29,355,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($6,437,000) Materials and Supplies ($80,000) Services Other Than Personal ($1,550,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($23,000) Special Purpose: 03 Federal Highway Safety ($1,265,000) 22 Horse Racing Purse Subsidies ($20,000,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 14 of P.L.1992, c.188 (C.33:1-4.1) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, an amount not to exceed $4,199,000 from receipts from fees and penalties collected by the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall be deposited in the General Fund as State revenue. From the receipts from uncashed pari-mutuel winning tickets and the regulation, supervision, licensing, and enforcement of all New Jersey Racing Commission activities and functions, such amounts as may be required are appropriated for the purpose of offsetting the costs of the administration and operation of the New Jersey Racing Commission, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from breakage monies and uncashed pari-mutuel winning tickets resulting from off-track and account wagering and any reimbursement assessment against permit holders or successors in interest to permit holders shall be distributed to the New Jersey Racing Commission in accordance with the provisions of the "Off-Track and Account Wagering Act," P.L.2001, c.199 (C.5:5-127 et seq.), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. All fees, fines, and penalties collected pursuant to P.L.1973, c.83 (C.19:44A-1 et al.) and section 11 of P.L.1991, c.244 (C.52:13C-23.1) are appropriated for the purpose of offsetting additional operational costs of the New Jersey Election Law Enforcement Commission, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, amounts received pursuant to P.L.1971, c.183 (C.52:13C-18 et seq.) are appropriated for the purpose of offsetting additional operational costs of the New Jersey Election Law Enforcement Commission, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the receipts from the regulation, supervision, and licensing of all State Athletic Control Board activities and functions, an amount is appropriated for the purpose of offsetting the costs of the administration and operation of the State Athletic Control Board, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 17-1420 Election Law Enforcement $28,902,000 (From Gubernatorial Elections Fund:$28,902,000) Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Special Law Enforcement Activities $28,902,000 (From Gubernatorial Elections Fund:$28,902,000) Grants-in-Aid: 17 Election Law Enforcement (GEF) ($28,902,000) There are appropriated from the Gubernatorial Elections Fund such sums as may be required for payments to persons qualifying for additional public funds pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1974, c.26 (C.19:44A-30); provided, however, that should the amount available in the Gubernatorial Elections Fund be insufficient to support such an appropriation, there are appropriated from the General Fund to the Gubernatorial Elections Fund such sums as may be required, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Election Law Enforcement Gubernatorial Elections Fund, an amount not to exceed $480,000 may be used to offset the administrative costs of the program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 18 Juvenile Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 34-1500 Juvenile Community Programs $32,911,000 35-1505 Institutional Control and Supervision $43,970,000 36-1505 Institutional Care and Treatment $14,508,000 40-1500 Juvenile Parole and Transitional Services $5,090,000 99-1500 Administration and Support Services $21,625,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Juvenile Services $118,104,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($93,696,000) Materials and Supplies ($5,059,000) Services Other Than Personal ($13,777,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($2,672,000) Special Purpose: 34 Juvenile Aftercare Programs ($73,000) 34 Juvenile Justice Initiatives ($612,000) 99 Johnstone Facility Maintenance ($457,000) 99 Juvenile Justice - State Matching Funds ($132,000) 99 Custody and Civilian Staff Equipment and Supplies ($186,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($1,440,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Juvenile Community Programs, an amount not to exceed $750,000 is appropriated from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund for the cost of administering and operating the Heating/Ventilation/Air Conditioning/Refrigeration (HVACR) Career Education Program for individuals under the supervision of the Juvenile Justice Commission, upon the recommendation of the Executive Director of the Juvenile Justice Commission and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from the eyeglass program at the New Jersey Training School for Boys and any unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year are appropriated for the operation of the program. GRANTS-IN-AID 34-1500 Juvenile Community Programs $20,799,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Juvenile Services $20,799,000 Grants-in-Aid: 34 Juvenile Detention Alternative Initiative ($1,900,000) 34 Alternatives to Juvenile Incarceration Programs ($1,624,000) 34 Crisis Intervention Program ($4,292,000) 34 State/Community Partnership Grants ($12,670,000) 34 Purchase of Services for Juvenile Offenders ($313,000) Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Juvenile Detention Alternative Initiative, such amounts as may be required shall be transferred to various Direct State Service operating accounts, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated in the various Grants-In-Aid accounts, the Juvenile Justice Commission shall assure that Grants-In-Aid recipients demonstrate cultural competency to serve clients within their respective communities and offer training opportunities in cultural competence to staff of community-based organizations the recipients may serve. 19 Central Planning, Direction and Management DIRECT STATE SERVICES 13-1005 Homeland Security and Preparedness $17,679,000 99-1000 Administration and Support Services $40,325,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Central Planning, Direction and Management $58,004,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($17,768,000) Materials and Supplies ($74,000) Services Other Than Personal ($454,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($22,000) Special Purpose: 13 Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness ($7,134,000) 13 Cybersecurity and Data Protection ($10,545,000) 99 Prescription Drug Monitoring Program Enhancement ($200,000) 99 Continuing Education for Health Care Professionals ($1,000,000) 99 Operation Helping Hand ($2,200,000) 99 Office of the Attorney General - Honors Program ($1,700,000) 99 Statewide Affirmative Firearms Enforcement Office ($450,000) 99 Paterson Police Department - State Costs ($10,000,000) 99 Mental Health Diverson Program ($5,000,000) 99 Office of Law Enforcement Professional Standards ($1,436,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($21,000) The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Office of the Attorney General - Honors Program is appropriated from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Paterson Police Department - State Costs, there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be necessary for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Paterson Police Department - State Costs account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount appropriated for the Mental Health Diversion Program shall be deposited into the "Mental Health Diversion Program Support Fund" to implement P.L.2023, c.188, and an amount not less than $1,000,000 shall be allocated for program operations in the County of Essex, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The Attorney General shall provide the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, the Senate Budget and Appropriations Committee and the Assembly Appropriations Committee, or the successor committees thereto, with written reports on August 1 and February 1, of the use and disposition by State law enforcement agencies, including the offices of the county prosecutors, of any interest in property or money seized, or proceeds resulting from seized or forfeited property, and any interest or income earned thereon, arising from any State law enforcement agency involvement in a surveillance, investigation, arrest or prosecution involving offenses under N.J.S.2C:35-1 et seq. and N.J.S.2C:36-1 et seq. leading to such seizure or forfeiture. The reports shall specify for the preceding period of the fiscal year the type, approximate value, and disposition of the property seized and the amount of any proceeds received or expended, whether obtained directly or as contributive share, including but not limited to the use thereof for asset maintenance, forfeiture prosecution costs, costs of extinguishing any perfected security interest in seized property and the contributive share of property and proceeds of other participating local law enforcement agencies.  The reports shall provide an itemized accounting of all proceeds expended and shall specify with particularity the nature and purpose of each such expenditure. Penalties, fines, and other fees collected pursuant to N.J.S.2C:35-20 and deposited into the State Forensic Laboratory Fund, together with the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year, are appropriated and may be transferred to the Division of State Police to defray additional laboratory related administration and operational expenses of the "Comprehensive Drug Reform Act of 1987," N.J.S.2C:35-1 et al., subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness is appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness, such additional amounts as may be required are appropriated for the purposes of providing State matching funds for federal grants related to homeland security and such amounts may be transferred to other departments and State agencies for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from the agency surcharge on vehicle rentals pursuant to section 54 of P.L.2002, c.34 (C.App.A:9-78), not to exceed $10,400,000, are appropriated for the Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness and shall be deposited into a dedicated account, the expenditure of which shall be subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 13-1005 Homeland Security and Preparedness $18,500,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Central Planning, Direction and Management $18,500,000 Grants-in-Aid: 13 New Jersey Nonprofit Security Grant Program (P.L.2021, c.439) ($10,000,000) 13 Reproductive Health Security Grant Program ($5,000,000) 13 Beth Medrash Govoha, Lakewood - Security Needs and Anti-terrorism ($2,000,000) 13 Jewish Federation of New Jersey - Community Security Initiatives ($1,500,000) The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Seabrooks-Washington Community-Led Crisis Response Act (P.L.2023, c.259) account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Community--Based Violence Intervention account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the "New Jersey Nonprofit Security Grant Program," P.L.2021, c.439 (C.App.A:9-87 et seq.) is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Reproductive Health Security Grant Program shall be used to provide grants to eligible reproductive health care facilities that provide reproductive health care services, pursuant to a process administered by the Director of the Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness to determine facilities that are at a high risk of being the target of unlawful activity, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Reproductive Health Security Grant Program, an amount not to exceed five percent of the funds may be used to offset the administrative costs of the program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Reproductive Health Security Grant Program account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. STATE AID Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, regulation or Executive Order to the contrary, any purchase by the State or by a State agency or local government unit of equipment, goods or services related to homeland security and domestic preparedness, that is paid for or reimbursed by State funds appropriated in this fiscal year, to the Department of Law and Public Safety, for Homeland Security and Preparedness under program classification, may be made through the receipt of public bids or as an alternative to public bidding and subject to the provisions of this paragraph, through direct  purchase without advertising for bids or rejecting bids already received but not awarded.  Purchases made without public bidding shall be from vendors that shall: (1) be holders of a current State contract for the equipment, goods or services sought, or (2) be participating in a federal procurement program established by a federal department or agency, or (3) have been approved by the State Treasurer in consultation with the Director of the Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness. The equipment, goods or services purchased by a local government unit receiving such State funds by subgrant, shall be referred to in the grant agreement issued by the Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness and shall be authorized by resolution of the governing body of the local government unit entering into the grant agreement. Such resolution may, without subsequent action of the local governing body, simultaneously accept the grant from the State administrative agency, authorize the insertion of the revenue and offsetting appropriation in the budget of the local government unit, and authorize the contracting agent of the local government unit to procure the equipment, goods or services. A copy of such resolution shall be filed with the chief financial officer of the local government unit and the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs. 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 74 General Government Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 12-1010 Legal Services $123,008,000 Subtotal Direct State Services Appropriation, General Government Services $123,008,000 Less: Legal Services($105,037,000) Total Deductions ($105,037,000) Total Direct State Services Appropriation, General Government Services $17,971,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($15,844,000) Materials and Supplies ($89,000) Services Other Than Personal ($462,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($134,000) Special Purpose: 12 Legal Services ($105,037,000) 12 Child Welfare Unit ($1,442,000) Less: Total Deductions: $105,037,000 In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Legal Services and the additional amount associated with employee fringe benefit costs, there are appropriated such amounts as may be received or receivable from any State agency, instrumentality or public authority for direct or indirect costs of legal services furnished thereto and attributable to a change in or the addition of a client agency agreement, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is empowered to credit or transfer to the General Fund from any other department, branch, or non-State fund source, out of funds appropriated thereto, such funds as may be required to cover the costs of legal services attributable to that other department, branch, or non-State fund source as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. Receipts in any non-State fund are appropriated for the purpose of such transfer. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, revenues derived from penalties, cost recoveries, restitution or other recoveries to the State are appropriated to offset unbudgeted, extraordinary costs of legal, investigative, administrative, expert witnesses and other services, incurred by the Division of Law related to litigation and acting on behalf of the State and State agencies and the costs of settlements and judgments as determined by the Division of Law.  Such amounts first shall be charged to any revenues derived from recoveries collected by the State and are also appropriated from the General Fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 80 Special Government Services 82 Protection of Citizens Rights DIRECT STATE SERVICES 14-1310 Consumer Affairs $12,857,000 15-1314 Operation of State Professional Boards $17,633,000 (From General Fund:$17,541,000) (From Casino Revenue Fund:$92,000) 16-1350 Protection of Civil Rights $10,229,000 19-1440 Services to Victims of Crime $15,857,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Protection of Citizens Rights $56,576,000 (From General Fund:$56,484,000) (From Casino Revenue Fund:$92,000) Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($8,767,000) Salaries and Wages (CRF) ($52,000) Employee Benefits (CRF) ($40,000) Materials and Supplies ($101,000) Services Other Than Personal ($20,190,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($208,000) Special Purpose: 14 Prescription Drug Monitoring Program ($500,000) 14 OB/GYN Clinical Training Program ($5,000,000) 14 Consumer Affairs Legalized Games of Chance ($1,200,000) 14 Securities Enforcement Fund ($893,000) 14 Consumer Affairs Weights and Measures Program ($2,612,000) 14 Consumer Affairs Charitable Registration Program ($556,000) 15 Personal Care Attendants - Background Checks ($500,000) 16 Anti-Discrimination Training ($100,000) 19 Victims of Crime Compensation Office ($13,372,000) 19 Violence Intervention and Victim Assistance ($1,485,000) 19 Mass Violence Care Fund ($1,000,000) In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Consumer Affairs, receipts in excess of the amount anticipated, attributable to changes in fee structure or fee increases, are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. All fees, penalties, and costs collected pursuant to P.L.1988, c.123 (C.56:12-29 et seq.) are appropriated for the purpose of offsetting costs associated with the handling and resolution of consumer automotive complaints. Fees and cost recoveries collected pursuant to P.L.1989, c.331 (C.34:8-43 et al.) are appropriated in an amount not to exceed additional expenses associated with mandated duties of the Division of Consumer Affairs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Drug Affordability Council (P.L.2023, c.106) account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, receipts in excess of the amount anticipated and the unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year are appropriated to the Controlled Dangerous Substance Registration Program for the purpose of offsetting the costs of the administration and operation of the program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from penalties and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Consumer Fraud Education Fund program account pursuant to P.L.1999, c.129 (C.56:8-14.2 et seq.) are appropriated for the purpose of offsetting the cost of operating the program and for use by the Department of Law and Public Safety to support departmental efforts related to critical training, equipment, facility needs, background checks, investigations required by law, opioid related expenses, and unanticipated costs related to enforcement needs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts in excess of the amount anticipated from the assessment and recovery of costs, fines, and penalties as well as other receipts received pursuant to the Consumer Fraud Act, P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.), are appropriated and may be transferred for additional operational costs of the Division of Consumer Affairs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts in excess of the amount anticipated pursuant to P.L.1954, c.7 (C.5:8-1 et seq.) from the operations of the Division of Consumer Affairs Legalized Games of Chance program and the unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year, are appropriated for the purpose of offsetting the operational costs of the program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Securities Enforcement Fund account is payable from receipts from fees and penalties deposited in the Securities Enforcement Fund pursuant to section 15 of P.L.1985, c.405 (C.49:3-66.1). Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, an amount not less than that anticipated as General Fund revenue from receipts from fees and penalties collected by the Securities Enforcement Fund shall be transferred to the General Fund as State revenue by April 1. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year is appropriated to the Securities Enforcement Fund program account to offset the cost of operating this program and for use by the Department of Law and Public Safety to support departmental efforts related to suicide and violence prevention, fire safety, anti-gang activities, background checks and investigations required by law, critical equipment or facility needs, and unanticipated public safety or citizen protection needs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts in excess of the amount anticipated derived pursuant to R.S.51:1-1 et seq. from the operations of the Division of Consumer Affairs, Office of Weights and Measures program and the unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year, are appropriated for the purposes of offsetting the operational costs of the program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts in excess of the amount anticipated pursuant to P.L.1994, c.16 (C.45:17A-18 et seq.) from the operations of the Division of Consumer Affairs Charitable Registration and Investigation program and the unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year, are appropriated for the purpose of offsetting the operational costs of the program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for each of the several State professional boards, advisory boards, and committees shall be payable from receipts of those entities, and any receipts in excess of the amounts specifically provided to each of the entities, and the unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 2 of P.L.1983, c.412 (C.10:5-14.1a), or any law or regulation to the contrary, any receipts from the assessment of fines, fees, and penalties pursuant to P.L.1945, c.169 (C.10:5-1 et seq.) are appropriated to the Division on Civil Rights for operational costs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from the provision of copies of transcripts and other materials related to officially docketed cases are appropriated. Receipts from assessments under section 2 of P.L.1979, c.396 (C.2C:43-3.1) in excess of the amount anticipated and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year are appropriated for payment of claims of victims of crime pursuant to P.L.1971, c.317 (C.52:4B-1 et seq.) and for additional Victims of Crime Compensation Office operational costs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Victims of Crime Compensation Office pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1979, c.396 (C.2C:43-3.1) are appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Victims of Crime Compensation Office is available for payment of awards applicable to claims filed in prior fiscal years. Receipts from assessments pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1979, c.396 (C.2C:43-3.1) and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Criminal Disposition and Revenue Collection Fund program account are appropriated for the purpose of offsetting the costs of the design, development, implementation and operation of the Criminal Disposition and Revenue Collection Fund program, payment of claims of victims of crime and for Victims of Crime Compensation Office operational costs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary and consistent with P.L.2015, c.55, restitution payments collected by the Department of Corrections owed to victims of crimes who have not been located by the Department and who have not come forward to claim such payments for a period of two years from when the Department attempts to locate them shall be transferred to the Victims of Crime Compensation Office and are appropriated to satisfy claims pursuant to the provisions of the "Criminal Injuries Compensation Act of 1971," P.L.1971, c.317 (C.52:4B-1 et seq.). The amount hereinabove is appropriated from the Casino Revenue Fund for the costs associated with the operation of the New Jersey Board of Nursing. The amount appropriated for Mass Violence Care Fund is appropriated for the purposes set forth in P.L. , c. (C. ) (pending before the Legislature as Assembly Bill No. 4409 and Senate Bill No. 3124). Department of Law and Public Safety, Total State Appropriation $977,295,000 Receipts from the provision of copies, the processing of credit cards and other materials related to compliance with section 6 of P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-5), are appropriated for the purpose of offsetting costs related to the public access of government records. All registration fees, tuition fees, training fees, and all other fees received for reimbursement for attendance at courses conducted by any division in the Department of Law and Public Safety are appropriated for the purposes of offsetting the operating expenses of the courses, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, receipts in excess of the amount anticipated through seizure, forfeiture, or abandonment pursuant to any federal or State statutory or common law and proceeds of the sale of any such confiscated property or goods, except for such funds as are dedicated pursuant to N.J.S.2C:64-6, are appropriated for law enforcement purposes designated by the Attorney General. Summary of Department of Law and Public Safety Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services ......................................... $879,943,000 Grants-in-Aid .................................................... $68,587,000 State Aid ........................................................... $28,765,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund .................................................... $870,616,000 Property Tax Relief Fund ................................ $9,000,000 Casino Control Fund ......................................... $68,685,000 Casino Revenue Fund ........................................ $92,000 Gubernatorial Elections Fund............................. $28,902,000 67  DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS 10 Public Safety and Criminal Justice 14  Military Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 40-3620 New Jersey National Guard Support Services $5,652,000 60-3600 Joint Training Center Management and Operations $324,000 99-3600 Administration and Support Services $10,088,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Military Services $16,064,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($10,967,000) Materials and Supplies ($357,000) Services Other Than Personal ($1,303,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($934,000) Special Purpose: 40 National Guard - State Active Duty ($50,000) 40 New Jersey National Guard ChalleNGe Youth Program ($265,000) 40 Joint Federal - State Operations and Maintenance Contracts (State Share) ($2,140,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($48,000) Receipts from the rental and use of armories and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the receipt account are appropriated for the operation and maintenance thereof, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the National Guard-State Active Duty account is appropriated for the same purpose. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the National Guard--State Active Duty account, there are appropriated such amounts as are determined to be necessary by The Adjutant General to pay for the cost of unanticipated or extraordinary National Guard deployments, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Joint Federal-State Operations and Maintenance Contracts (State Share) account is appropriated for the same purpose. Receipts from the sale of solar energy credits and the receipt of energy rebates and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the receipt account are appropriated for the operation and maintenance of other energy program projects. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for New Jersey National Guard Support Services, funds received for Distance Learning Program use are appropriated for the same purposes, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the USS New Jersey Commissioning Committee account is appropriated. 80 Special Government Services 83  Services to Veterans 3610  Veterans Program Support DIRECT STATE SERVICES 50-3610 Veterans Outreach and Assistance $6,097,000 51-3610 Veterans Haven $5,540,000 70-3610 Burial Services $2,203,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Veterans Program Support $13,840,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($11,746,000) Materials and Supplies ($501,000) Services Other Than Personal ($417,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($286,000) Special Purpose: 50 Payment of Military Leave Benefits ($67,000) 50 Veterans State Benefits Bureau ($110,000) 50 Maintenance for Memorials ($371,000) 70 Indigent Veteran Burial Assistance ($25,000) 70 Honor Guard Support Services ($317,000) Funds received for Veterans' Transitional Housing from the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs and the individual residents, and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year, in the receipt account are appropriated for the same purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 4 of P.L.2001, c.351 (C.52:13H-2.1) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Payment of Military Leave Benefits is subject to the following conditions: it shall be the responsibility of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs to accept, review, and approve applications by a county, municipal governing body, or board of education for reimbursement of eligible costs incurred as a result of the provisions of P.L.2001, c.351, and to reimburse such costs from the Payment of Military Leave Benefits account. Funds collected by and on behalf of the Korean Veterans' Memorial Fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes of the fund. Funds received for plot interment allowances from the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, burial fees collected, and the unexpended program balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year are appropriated for perpetual care and maintenance of burial plots and grounds at the Brigadier General William C. Doyle Veterans' Memorial Cemetery in North Hanover Township, Burlington County, New Jersey. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no State funds are appropriated to the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs for the purpose of reforestation or "in lieu of" payments under the P.L.1993, c.106 (C.13:1L-14.1 et seq.) in conjunction with the current or future operation, maintenance and construction of the Brigadier General William C. Doyle Veterans' Memorial Cemetery in North Hanover Township, Burlington County, New Jersey. GRANTS-IN-AID 50-3610 Veterans Outreach and Assistance $6,543,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Veterans Program Support $6,543,000 Grants-in-Aid: Special Purpose: 50 Support Services for Returning Veterans ($399,000) 50 Vietnam Veterans Memorial Foundation ($125,000) 50 Veterans Tuition Grants ($4,000) 50 Veterans Transportation ($335,000) 50 Blind Veterans Allowances ($57,000) 50 Paraplegic and Hemiplegic Veterans Allowance ($298,000) 50 Post-Traumatic Stress Disorder ($1,300,000) 50 Education and Health Centers of America - NJ Veterans Resource Centers ($500,000) 50 Goodwill NYNJ - Essex County Veterans Clubhouse ($25,000) 50 New Jersey Vietnam Veterans Memorial Foundation - Capital Improvements ($3,000,000) 50 SOS Veterans Stakeholder Group ($500,000) From the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Support Services for Returning Veterans, such amounts as may be required may be transferred to Veterans Outreach and Assistance-Direct State Services, Veterans' Haven North and South - Direct State Services and Veterans Transportation Grants-In-Aid, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 3630  Menlo Park Veterans Memorial Home DIRECT STATE SERVICES 20-3630 Domiciliary and Treatment Services $22,363,000 99-3630 Administration and Support Services $5,570,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Menlo Park Veterans Memorial Home $27,933,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($23,695,000) Materials and Supplies ($2,050,000) Services Other Than Personal ($1,839,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($235,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($114,000) GRANTS-IN-AID 20-3630 Domiciliary and Treatment Services $250,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Menlo Park Veterans Memorial Home $250,000 Grants-in-Aid: Special Purpose: 20 Prescription Drug Program ($250,000) 3640 Paramus Veterans Memorial Home DIRECT STATE SERVICES 20-3640 Domiciliary and Treatment Services $24,184,000 99-3640 Administration and Support Services $4,396,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Paramus Veterans Memorial Home $28,580,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($25,394,000) Materials and Supplies ($1,439,000) Services Other Than Personal ($1,546,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($162,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($39,000) GRANTS-IN-AID 20-3640 Domiciliary and Treatment Services $251,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Paramus Veterans Memorial Home $251,000 Grants-in-Aid: Special Purpose: 20 Prescription Drug Program ($251,000) 3650 Vineland Veterans Memorial Home DIRECT STATE SERVICES 20-3650 Domiciliary and Treatment Services $26,346,000 99-3650 Administration and Support Services $5,289,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Vineland Veterans Memorial Home $31,635,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($27,076,000) Materials and Supplies ($1,565,000) Services Other Than Personal ($2,596,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($274,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($124,000) Balances on hand at the end of the preceding fiscal year for the benefit of residents in the several veterans' homes and such funds as may be received, are appropriated for the use of such residents. Revenues representing receipts to the General Fund from charges to residents' trust accounts for maintenance costs are appropriated for use as personal needs allowances for patients/residents who have no other source of funds for such purposes; provided, however, that the allowance shall not exceed $50 per month for any eligible resident of an institution and provided further, that the total amount herein for such allowances shall not exceed $100,000, and that any increase in the maximum monthly allowance shall be approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts in excess of anticipated revenues derived from resident contributions and the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs are appropriated for veterans' program initiatives, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting of an itemized plan for the expenditure of these amounts, as shall be submitted by the Adjutant General. GRANTS-IN-AID 20-3650 Domiciliary and Treatment Services $251,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Vineland Veterans Memorial Home $251,000 Grants-in-Aid: Special Purpose: 20 Prescription Drug Program ($251,000) Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs, Total State Appropriation $125,347,000 Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, lease or licensing payments received by the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs in connection with the property known as the Colgate Clock located on Block 14502, Lot 10 on the Official Tax Map of Jersey City, New Jersey, shall be deposited in the General Fund. Summary of Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services .......................................... $118,052,000 Grants-in-Aid ..................................................... $7,295,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund ...................................................... $125,347,000 74  DEPARTMENT OF STATE 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 36 Higher Educational Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 80-2400 Statewide Planning and Coordination for Higher Education $10,967,000 81-2400 Educational Opportunity Fund Programs $440,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Higher Educational Services $11,407,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($3,980,000) Materials and Supplies ($9,000) Services Other Than Personal ($1,256,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($12,000) Special Purpose: 80 State Policy Lab ($1,000,000) 80 Student Success Incentive Funding ($5,000,000) 80 Higher Education Chief Financial Officers Training (P.L.2023, c.115) ($100,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($50,000) In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Statewide Planning and Coordination for Higher Education, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $500,000 subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, for the purpose of supporting the maintenance of the Statewide longitudinal data system. GRANTS-IN-AID 80-2400 Statewide Planning and Coordination for Higher Education $95,750,000 81-2400 Educational Opportunity Fund Programs $54,838,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Higher Educational Services $150,588,000 Grants-in-Aid: 80 College Bound ($2,500,000) 80 College Readiness Now ($800,000) 80 Center on Gun Violence Research ($2,000,000) 80 New Jersey Civic Information Consortium ($2,000,000) 80 Governor's School ($100,000) 80 Hunger-Free Campus Program ($1,200,000) 80 Fringe Support for Public Research Institutions of Higher Education ($75,000,000) 80 Some College, No Degree ($6,400,000) 80 County College-Based Adult Centers ($3,600,000) 80 Direct Support Professional Career Development Program (P.L.2021, c.421) ($1,000,000) 80 Innovation Dual Enrollment Program ($500,000) 80 Global Entrepreneurs in Residence ($400,000) 81 Opportunity Program Grants ($37,329,000) 81 Supplementary Education Program Grants ($17,509,000) 80 Rutgers Center for Real Estate ($250,000) An amount not to exceed five percent of the total hereinabove appropriated for College Bound is available for transfer to Direct State Services for the administrative expenses of this program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Refunds from prior years to the College Bound Program are appropriated to that account. Refunds from prior years to the Educational Opportunity Fund Programs accounts are appropriated to those accounts. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Center on Gun Violence Research, an amount not to exceed $1,000,000, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, is appropriated to support interdisciplinary research on the causes and consequences of, and solutions to, gun-related violence. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the New Jersey Civic Information Consortium account is appropriated. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Fringe Support for Public Research Institutions of Higher Education is subject to the following conditions: (1) amounts shall be allocated among and distributed to senior research institutions of higher education based on a funding rationale determined by the Secretary of Higher Education and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting; (2) allocations to individual senior research institutions shall be used only to offset fringe benefit costs charged to research programs using the composite fringe benefit rate for the year ending June 30, 2025 established by the Division of Budget and Accounting; and (3) the senior research institutions must demonstrate to the Secretary of Higher Education that they continue to negotiate with the federal government to develop a lower, federally approved rate for the purpose of enabling such institution to direct more grant funding towards eligible research activities. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Innovation Dual Enrollment Program is subject to the following conditions: the Secretary of Higher Education shall develop a dual enrollment competitive grant program, establish written eligibility criteria for the selection of participating institutions of higher education and public schools, and set program goals and requirements for the 2024-2025 school year. Such eligibility criteria and other relevant information shall be publicly available and published on the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education's public website, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Global Entrepreneurs in Residence shall be used to offer competitive grants to research colleges and universities for the purpose of paying the costs of retaining undergraduate and graduate student entrepreneurs, as determined by the Secretary of Higher Education, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 2405 Higher Education Student Assistance Authority DIRECT STATE SERVICES At any time prior to the issuance and sale of bonds or other obligations by the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority, the State Treasurer is authorized to transfer from any available monies in any fund of the Treasury of the State to the credit of any fund of the authority such amounts as the State Treasurer deems necessary.  Any amounts so transferred shall be returned to the same fund of the Treasury of the State by the State Treasurer from the proceeds of the sale of the first issue of authority bonds or other authority obligations. In furtherance of the "Higher Education Student Assistance Authority Law," N.J.S.18A:71A-1 et seq., in the event of a draw upon a debt service reserve surety bond or any other debt service reserve cash equivalent instrument or any insufficiency of such instruments to pay debt service on the bonds issued by the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority, there are appropriated to the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority such amounts as are necessary to repay the issuer of such surety bond or such other cash equivalent instrument for such draw or to satisfy such insufficiency, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 45-2405 Student Assistance Programs $666,093,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Higher Education Student Assistance Authority $666,093,000 Grants-in-Aid: 45 Tuition Aid Grants ($480,887,000) 45 Part-Time Tuition Aid Grants for County Colleges ($8,737,000) 45 Part-Time Tuition Aid Grant - EOF Students ($842,000) 45 Governor's Urban Scholarship Program ($595,000) 45 Community College Opportunity Grant ($39,820,000) 45 Pay It Forward Fund ($4,287,000) 45 Garden State Guarantee ($94,352,000) 45 Student Teacher Stipends ($10,000,000) 45 New Jersey STEM Loan Redemption Program ($100,000) 45 New Jersey World Trade Center Scholarship Program ($202,000) 45 New Jersey Student Tuition Assistance Reward Scholarship (NJSTARS I & II) ($7,771,000) 45 Primary Care Practitioners Loan Redemption Program ($3,875,000) 45 Teachers Loan Redemption Program ($5,000,000) 45 Tuition Assistance, Thomas Edison State University Students ($1,000,000) 45 Behavioral Healthcare Provider Loan Redemption Program ($7,000,000) 45 Nursing Faculty Loan Redemption Program ($1,625,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts provided hereinabove for Tuition Aid Grants shall provide awards to all qualified applicants at levels set by the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority.  Such amounts as may be necessary are appropriated from Tuition Aid Grants to fund awards for undocumented students as set forth in P.L.2018, c.12 (C.18A:71B-2.1) or incarcerated individuals, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  The unexpended balances reappropriated to the Tuition Aid Grant account shall be available to fund increases in the number of applicants qualifying for full-time Tuition Aid Grant awards, to fund increases in award amounts, and to fund shifts in the distribution of awards that result in an increase in program costs. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Tuition Aid Grants, there are appropriated such amounts as are required to cover the costs of increases in the number of applicants qualifying for full-time Tuition Aid Grant awards or to fund shifts in the distribution of awards that result in an increase in total program costs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, participation in the Tuition Aid Grant program hereinabove appropriated shall be limited to those institutions that had previously participated in the Tuition Aid Grant program, or had applied in writing to the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority to participate in the Tuition Aid Grant program prior to September 1, 2009 and met all eligibility requirements prior to September 1, 2009. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Part-Time Tuition Aid Grants for County Colleges shall be used to provide funds for tuition aid grants for eligible, qualified part-time students enrolled at the county colleges established pursuant to N.J.S.18A:64A-1 et seq.  The tuition aid grants shall be used to pay the tuition at a county college established pursuant to N.J.S.18A:64A-1 et seq. Within the limits of available appropriations as determined by the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority, part-time grant awards shall be pro-rated against the full-time grant award for the applicable institutional sector established pursuant to N.J.S.18A:71B-21 as follows:  an eligible student enrolled with six to eight credits shall receive one-half of the value of a full-time award and an eligible student enrolled with nine to eleven credits shall receive three-quarters of a full-time award. Students shall apply first for all other forms of federal student assistance grants and scholarships; student eligibility for the Tuition Aid Grant program for part-time enrollment at a county college shall in other respects be determined by the authority in accordance with the criteria established pursuant to N.J.S.18A:71B-20, other than the criterion for full-time enrollment. The unexpended balances reappropriated to the Part-Time Tuition Aid Grants for County Colleges account shall be available to fund increases in the number of applicants qualifying for Part-Time Tuition Aid Grants for County Colleges awards, to fund increases in award amounts, and to fund shifts in the distribution of awards that result in an increase in program costs. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Community College Opportunity Grants, the maximum individual grant amount awarded, as established by the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority pursuant to subsection c. of section 4 of P.L.2021, c.26 (C.18A:71B-114), to qualified students with an annual adjusted gross income, as such term is defined in section 1 of P.L.2021, c.26 (C.18A:71B-111), between $65,001 and $80,000, shall not exceed fifty percent of the maximum individual grant amount for students with an annual adjusted gross income between $0 and $65,000; and the maximum individual grant amount awarded, as established by the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority pursuant to subsection c. of section 4 of P.L.2021, c.26 (C.18A:71B-114), to qualified students with an annual adjusted gross income, as such term is defined in section 1 of P.L.2021, c.26 (C.18A:71B-111), between $80,001 and $100,000, shall not exceed thirty-three and one-third percent of the maximum individual grant amount for students with an annual adjusted gross income between $0 and $65,000. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Community College Opportunity Grant for County Vocational Schools Pilot shall be available to provide grants to cover tuition of students enrolled in post-secondary career and technical education courses offered by county vocational schools in partnership with a county college provided that such post-secondary career and technical education courses are awarded credits by a county college as part of a curriculum leading to a degree, and further provided that all available grants and employer support have been exhausted. The per-student amount shall be reduced proportionally if the amount appropriated is insufficient to provide full funding for all eligible enrolled students. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Community College Opportunity Grants (CCOG), there are appropriated such amounts as are required to cover the costs of increases in the number of applicants qualifying for CCOG awards or to fund shifts in the distribution of awards that result in an increase in total program costs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Garden State Guarantee awards is subject to the following conditions: $94,352,000 is appropriated to the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority to provide grants during the fall 2024 and spring 2025 semesters to eligible New Jersey resident undergraduate students in each students third or fourth year of full-time enrollment at a New Jersey senior public college or university, as full-time enrollment is defined pursuant to N.J.A.C.9A:9-3.4 and as years three and four are defined by the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority and published on the Authoritys Internet website; provided that (1) the amount of the Garden State Guarantee awards for qualified students with an annual adjusted gross income, as such term is defined in section 1 of P.L.2021, c.26 (C.18A:71B-111), between $0 and $65,000 shall ensure that each such student receives sufficient financial aid from a combination of State, federal, institutional, and other grants or scholarships to eliminate the students net cost of tuition and mandatory fees in both the fall 2024 and spring 2025 semesters; and that (2) the amount of the Garden State Guarantee awards for qualified students with an annual adjusted gross income between $65,001 and $80,000, as such term is defined in section 1 of P.L.2021, c.26 (C.18A:71B-111), shall ensure that each such student receives sufficient financial aid from a combination of State, federal, institutional, and other grants or scholarships to pay a remaining net price of no more than $3,750 in tuition and mandatory fees in either the fall 2024 or spring 2025 semester; and that (3) the amount of the Garden State Guarantee awards for qualified students with an annual adjusted gross income between $80,001 and $100,000, as such term is defined in section 1 of P.L.2021, c.26 (C.18A:71B-111), shall ensure that each such student receives sufficient financial aid from a combination of State, federal, institutional, and other grants or scholarships to pay a remaining net price of no more than $5,000 in tuition and mandatory fees in either the fall 2024 or spring 2025 semester; and provided further that the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority shall establish criteria governing student eligibility and other necessary program elements for Fiscal Year 2025, which shall be published on the Authoritys Internet website; and provided further that eligibility for each senior public institutions students to receive Garden State Guarantee awards shall be contingent on the institutions maintenance of efforts, whereby in academic years 2024-2025 the senior public institutions awards per-student for students enrolled in years three and four, with annual adjusted gross incomes ranging from $0-$20,000, $20,001-$40,000, $40,001-$65,000, $65,001-$80,000, and $80,001-$100,000, are each within at least five percent of the per-student average amounts of institutional financial aid the institution awarded during academic year 2020-2021 to students in corresponding years of enrollment and annual adjusted gross income ranges. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Garden State Guarantee (GSG) there are appropriated such amounts as are required to cover the costs of increases in the number of applicants qualifying for GSG awards or to fund shifts in the distribution of awards that result in an increase in total program costs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Student Teacher Stipends is subject to the following conditions and subject to available funding: (1) a student teacher attending a New Jersey institution that offers an educator preparation program approved by the New Jersey Department of Education and who agrees to complete a semester of full-time clinical field practice in compliance with the terms of the approved educator preparation program shall be eligible for a  one-time award not to exceed $4,500 for the student to use to pay for living expenses while participating in full-time student teaching; (2) the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority shall provide funding to the New Jersey institution at which the eligible student is enrolled to be applied to the students account, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting; provided, however, that such award shall not displace any other federal, State-, or institution-funded student financial assistance, grants, or scholarships; and (3) no more than five percent of the amount appropriated may be allocated for the administrative costs of the program. Receipts from voluntary contributions by taxpayers on New Jersey gross income tax returns for the New Jersey World Trade Center Scholarship Fund are appropriated for the purpose of providing scholarships for eligible recipients as defined in P.L.2001, c.442 (C.18A:71B-23.1 et seq.), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the New Jersey Student Tuition Assistance Reward Scholarship program is subject to the following condition: all NJ STARS II awards must be used at institutions of higher education that offer degrees through the baccalaureate level and which participate in the Tuition Aid Grant program pursuant to N.J.A.C.9A:9-2.1. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the maximum tuition to be used in determining the amount of a NJ STARS award to a student at a county college shall be limited to the in-county tuition charged for students pursuing a full-time course of study at that county college. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection b. of section 5 of P.L.2004, c.59 (C.18A:71B-85), none of the funds hereinabove appropriated for the New Jersey Student Tuition Assistance Reward Scholarship program shall be used to fund summer semester NJ STARS scholarship awards. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.2012, c.8 (C.18A:71B-85.6 et al.) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the New Jersey Student Tuition Assistance Reward Scholarship program are subject to the following condition: the maximum New Jersey Student Tuition Assistance Reward Scholarship awards for students first enrolling in the program for academic year 2015-2016 and thereafter who attend a county college that has eliminated general education fees and increased its tuition correspondingly will be reduced by an amount to be calculated and approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  The amount of the reduction shall be the three-year average percentage that fees comprised of total tuition and fees as reported to the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority (HESAA) on the institutional budget survey in the three immediate years prior to the elimination of the general education fees. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections a. and c. of N.J.S.18A:71C-37, or any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Primary Care Practitioner Loan Redemption Program is subject to the following condition: the maximum total redemption of eligible qualifying loan expenses for four full years of service shall not exceed $200,000, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 9 of P.L.2009, c.236 (C.18A:71C-58) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Primary Care Practitioners Loan Redemption Program shall not be utilized for the Nursing Faculty Loan Redemption Program. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Teachers Loan Redemption Program, an amount determined by the Executive Director of the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority, not to exceed $1,000,000 shall be allocated for the redemption of a portion of qualifying student loans of eligible participants hired on or after January 1, 2024, and any remaining amount shall be allocated for the redemption of a portion of qualifying student loans of eligible participants hired on or after January 1, 2009 through and including December 31, 2023. Qualifying student loans shall include government or commercial loans used for the actual costs paid for tuition and reasonable education and living expenses related to obtaining a degree. The Higher Education Student Assistance Authority shall select program participants from among those applicants who submit their applications within the deadlines established by the Authority and meet the eligibility criteria established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2021, c.384 (C.18A:71C-84), subject to available funds. If appropriated funds are insufficient to provide loan redemptions to all of the applicants who meet the eligibility criteria, the Authority shall accord priority to applicants based on a districts number of unfilled teacher vacancies, an applicants student loan burden, and an applicants hiring date. If appropriated funds are insufficient to provide loan redemptions to all of the top-ranked qualified applicants based on the above-listed priorities, the Authority shall select program participants by means of a lottery or other form of random selection from among the highest priority applicants. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts provided hereinabove in Student Assistance Programs shall be available for payment of liabilities applicable to prior fiscal years. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in Student Assistance Programs are appropriated to such programs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In order to permit and ensure the timely award of student financial aid grants, amounts may be transferred among accounts in Student Assistance Programs, including Survivor Tuition Benefits, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notice of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accountings approval shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, $5,000,000 of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Tuition Aid Grants shall be used to ensure that the maximum Tuition Aid Grant award amount for applicants at Kean University, as that term is defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2021, c.282 (C.18A:64O-3), qualifying for full-time Tuition Aid Grant awards in the 2024-2025 academic year is no less than the maximum Tuition Aid Grant award amount for applicants at all other public research universities, as that term is defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1994, c.48 (C.18A:3B-3), qualifying for full-time Tuition Aid Grant awards in the 2024-2025 academic year. 2410 Rutgers, The State University - New Brunswick GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2410 Institutional Support $372,816,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Rutgers, The State University - New Brunswick $372,816,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82 Outcomes-Based Allocation ($49,833,000) 82 The Rutgers Special Needs Dental Treatment Center ($250,000) 82 New Jersey Center for Civic Education - Middle School and High School Civics Instruction ($150,000) 82 Rutgers, The State University - New Brunswick ($172,530,000) 82 Cancer Institute of New Jersey ($5,000,000) 82 Child Health Institute ($1,700,000) 82 School of Biomedical and Health Sciences ($141,533,000) 82 State Government Science and Engineering Fellowship Program, Eagleton Institute ($320,000) 82 New Jersey Climate Change Resource Center at Rutgers (P.L.2019, c.442) ($1,000,000) 82 Center for American Women and Politics - Women Elected and Appointed Officials Database ($500,000) For the purpose of implementing the appropriations act for the current fiscal year, the number of State-funded positions at Rutgers - New Brunswick shall be 8,013. For the purpose of implementing the appropriations act for the current fiscal year, the fringe benefits for not more than 1,383 positions, funded by medical services contracts between Rutgers and various State departments, are funded by the State. 2415 Agricultural Experiment Station GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2415 Institutional Support $26,729,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Agricultural Experiment Station $26,729,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82 Rutgers Equine Science Center Operating Support ($48,000) 82 New Jersey Agricultural Experiment Station ($4,500,000) 82 New Jersey Agricultural Experiment Station - Rutgers University ($20,931,000) 82 Cooperative Extension Outreach ($1,250,000) For the purpose of implementing the appropriations act for the current fiscal year, the number of State-funded positions at the Agricultural Experiment Station shall be 404. For the purpose of implementing the appropriations act for the current fiscal year, the fringe benefits for 120 positions, funded by the federal Hatch and Smith/Lever programs, are funded by the State. Rutgers, The State University of New Jersey is authorized to reallocate appropriations from the General University to the Agricultural Experiment Station, as needed, to assure that there are sufficient funds in the Agricultural Experiment Station to meet federal requirements for the Hatch and Smith/Lever programs. 2416 Rutgers, The State University - Camden GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2416 Institutional Support $33,244,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Rutgers, The State University - Camden $33,244,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82 Clinical Legal Programs for the Poor - Rutgers Law School ($200,000) 82 Outcomes-Based Allocation ($9,482,000) 82 Rowan University - Rutgers Camden Board of Governors, Rutgers-Camden School of Business ($2,250,000) 82 Rowan University - Rutgers Camden Board of Governors, Health Initiatives ($1,500,000) 82 Rutgers Camden Law School - Legal Assistance for Tenants ($742,000) 82 Focus and Student Mental Health and Wellbeing ($210,000) 82 Rutgers, The State University - Camden ($15,860,000) 82 Civic Engagement Initiative at Rutgers University-Camden ($2,500,000) 82 Student Success Initiatives at Rutgers University - Camden ($500,000) For the purpose of implementing the appropriations act for the current fiscal year, the number of State-funded positions at Rutgers - Camden shall be 559. 2417 Rutgers, The State University - Newark GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2417 Institutional Support $57,682,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Rutgers, The State University - Newark $57,682,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82 Clinical Legal Programs for the Poor - Rutgers Law School ($200,000) 82 Outcomes-Based Allocation ($18,081,000) 82 Rutgers Newark Law School - Legal Assistance for Tenants ($742,000) 82 Scholarship and Transformative Education in Prison Program ($2,583,000) 82 Center for Politics and Race in America ($1,250,000) 82 Rutgers, The State University - Newark ($31,626,000) 82 Center on Law, Inequality, and Metropolitan Equity ($1,000,000) 82 Center for Local Supply Chain Resiliency ($1,000,000) 82 New Jersey Nursing Emotional Well-Being Institute ($1,200,000) For the purpose of implementing the appropriations act for the current fiscal year, the number of State-funded positions at Rutgers - Newark shall be 1,086. 2430 New Jersey Institute of Technology GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2430 Institutional Support $59,640,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, New Jersey Institute of Technology $59,640,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82 Outcomes-Based Allocation ($15,655,000) 82 Public Polytechnic Adjustment Aid (NJIT) ($9,400,000) 82 New Jersey Institute of Technology ($34,585,000) For the purpose of implementing the appropriations act for the current fiscal year, the number of State-funded positions at the New Jersey Institute of Technology shall be 1,313. 2440 Thomas Edison State University GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2440 Institutional Support $13,220,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Thomas Edison State University $13,220,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82 Outcomes-Based Allocation ($8,159,000) 82 Thomas Edison State University ($4,561,000) 82 National Guard Tuition Waiver Reimbursement ($500,000) For the purpose of implementing the appropriations act for the current fiscal year, the number of State-funded positions at Thomas Edison State University shall be 323. 2445 Rowan University GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2445 Institutional Support $162,768,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Rowan University $162,768,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82 Outcomes-Based Allocation ($21,389,000) 82 Rowan University ($32,753,000) 82 Cooper University Hospital - Population Health and Joint Board ($500,000) 82 School of Veterinary Medicine ($12,000,000) 82 Child Abuse Research Education and Service Institute ($1,850,000) 82 Camden Opioid Research Initiative ($500,000) 82 Cooper Medical School of Rowan University ($11,550,000) 82 Cooper Medical School - Cooper University Hospital Support ($34,297,000) 82 School of Osteopathic Medicine ($37,929,000) 82 Center for Research and Education in Advanced Transportation Engineering Systems ($2,000,000) 82 Virtua Health College of Medicine and Life Sciences ($8,000,000) For the purpose of implementing the appropriations act for the current fiscal year, the number of State-funded positions at Rowan University shall be 1,898. Of the $37,929,000 appropriated for the Rowan School of Osteopathic Medicine, $2,700,000 is to be allocated to the Cooper Medical School of Rowan University. For the purpose of implementing the appropriations act for the current fiscal year, the fringe benefits for 105 positions at Cooper Medical School of Rowan University are funded by the State. For the purpose of implementing the appropriations act for the current fiscal year, the fringe benefits for 47 positions at the School of Veterinary Medicine of Rowan University are funded by the State. 2450 New Jersey City University GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2450 Institutional Support $41,911,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, New Jersey City University $41,911,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82 Outcomes-Based Allocation ($11,025,000) 82 New Jersey City University ($23,586,000) 82 New Jersey City University - Institutional Stabilization Aid ($7,000,000) 82 Deferred Maintenance Needs ($300,000) For the purpose of implementing the appropriations act for the current fiscal year, the number of State-funded positions at New Jersey City University shall be 1,129. 2455 Kean University GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2455 Institutional Support $60,769,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Kean University $60,769,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82 Urban Policy Institute ($675,000) 82 Outcomes-Based Allocation ($19,845,000) 82 Kean University ($37,499,000) 82 Faith-Based Institute of Public Policy ($250,000) 82 James Townley House - Capital Improvements ($2,500,000) For the purpose of implementing the appropriations act for the current fiscal year, the number of State-funded positions at Kean University shall be 1,074. 2460 William Paterson University of New Jersey GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2460 Institutional Support $52,261,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, William Paterson University of New Jersey $52,261,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82 Outcomes-Based Allocation ($14,112,000) 82 William Paterson University of New Jersey ($29,649,000) 82 Improvement and Enhancement of Nursing Workforce ($1,000,000) 82 Institutional and Workforce Sustainability Plan ($7,500,000) For the purpose of implementing the appropriations act for the current fiscal year, the number of State-funded positions at William Paterson University of New Jersey shall be 1,111. 2465 Montclair State University GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2465 Institutional Support $87,028,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Montclair State University $87,028,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82 Outcomes-Based Allocation ($27,122,000) 82 Montclair State University ($55,480,000) 82 Bloomfield College of Montclair State University Outcomes-Based Allocation ($2,426,000) 82 Bloomfield College of Montclair State University ($2,000,000) For the purpose of implementing the appropriations act for the current fiscal year, the number of State-funded positions at Montclair State University shall be 1,316. 2470 The College of New Jersey GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2470 Institutional Support $34,476,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, The College of New Jersey $34,476,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82 Outcomes-Based Allocation ($5,954,000) 82 The College of New Jersey ($28,522,000) For the purpose of implementing the appropriations act for the current fiscal year, the number of State-funded positions at The College of New Jersey shall be 909. 2475 Ramapo College of New Jersey GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2475 Institutional Support $26,794,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Ramapo College of New Jersey $26,794,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82 Outcomes-Based Allocation ($5,513,000) 82 Ramapo College of New Jersey ($18,781,000) 82 Nursing Program Expansion ($2,500,000) For the purpose of implementing the appropriations act for the current fiscal year, the number of State-funded positions at Ramapo College of New Jersey shall be 623. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Property Disposition Support account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 2480 Stockton University GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2480 Institutional Support $45,109,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Stockton University $45,109,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82 Outcomes-Based Allocation ($11,907,000) 82 Stockton University ($28,340,000) 82 Stockton University Atlantic City Campus ($4,612,000) 82 Stockton University - Atlantic City Campus Economic Development Center ($250,000) For the purpose of implementing the appropriations act for the current fiscal year, the number of State-funded positions at Stockton University shall be 1,069. 2485 University Hospital GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2485 Institutional Support $129,745,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, University Hospital $129,745,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82 University Hospital ($42,745,000) 82 University Hospital Capital Improvements ($40,000,000) 82 City of Newark Emergency Medical Services ($2,000,000) 82 Master Facility Plan Capital Investment ($45,000,000) For the purpose of implementing the appropriations act for the current fiscal year, the number of State-funded positions at University Hospital shall be 2,200. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for University Hospital, an amount not to exceed $27,255,000 is appropriated to support expenditures related to the Clinical Service Agreement between University Hospital and Rutgers, The State University, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. HIGHER EDUCATIONAL SERVICES Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, from the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Higher Educational Services-Institutional Support in each of the senior public institutions of higher education, there are allocated such amounts as are required to provide the reimbursement to cover tuition costs of the National Guard members pursuant to subsection b. of section 21 of P.L.1999, c.46 (C.18A:62-24). Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, from the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Higher Educational Services-Institutional Support in each of the senior public institutions of higher education, there are allocated such amounts as may be required to fund lease or rental costs which may be charged by such senior public institutions for any State department, agency, authority or commission facilities located on the campus of any senior public institution of higher education. Public colleges and universities are authorized to provide a voluntary employee furlough program. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, any funds appropriated as Grants-In-Aid and payable to any senior public college or university which requests approval from the Educational Facilities Authority and the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting may be pledged as a guarantee for payment of principal and interest on any bonds issued by the Educational Facilities Authority or by the college or university. Such funds, if so pledged, shall be made available by the State Treasurer upon receipt of written notification by the Educational Facilities Authority or the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting that the college or university does not have sufficient funds available for prompt payment of principal and interest on such bonds, and shall be paid by the State Treasurer directly to the holders of such bonds at such time and in such amounts as specified by the bond indenture, notwithstanding that payment of such funds does not coincide with any date for payment otherwise fixed by law. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no amount hereinabove appropriated for any senior public institution of higher education shall be paid until the institution remits its quarterly fringe benefit reimbursement for positions in excess of the number of State-funded positions provided in this act, by the deadline and in the manner required by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the senior public institutions of higher education shall be paid to each institution in equal monthly installments on the last business day of each month. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Institutional Support of the various State institutions of higher education are conditioned upon the following:  no sum shall be expended for payment as a settlement, buyout, separation payment, severance pay or any other form of monetary payment of any kind whatsoever in connection with the termination of, or separation from, the employment prior to the end of the term of an existing contract of any officer or employee of such institution who receives annual compensation in excess of $250,000. Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for University Hospital and Cooper Medical School - Cooper University Hospital Support, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting may transfer such amounts as are determined to be necessary to the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services to maximize federal Medicaid funds. Funds appropriated to Rutgers University for purposes of medical education are authorized to be used as necessary by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting and the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services, consistent with CMS guidelines, solely to maximize federal Medicaid payments to faculty physicians and non-physician professionals who are affiliated with the aforementioned respective medical schools. Funds appropriated to Rowan University for purposes of medical education at Cooper Medical School of Rowan University and the Rowan School of Osteopathic Medicine are authorized to be used as necessary by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting and the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services, consistent with CMS guidelines, solely to maximize federal Medicaid payments to faculty physicians and non-physician professionals who are affiliated with the aforementioned respective medical schools. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Outcomes-Based Allocation program in each of the senior public institutions of higher education shall be allocated and distributed to eligible senior public institutions based on a funding rationale determined by the Secretary of Higher Education, in consultation with the presidents of senior public institutions. The funding shall be based upon the following criteria along with any other requirements the Secretary determines to be appropriate in order to advance equity and improve student outcomes, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting: (1) the total number of degrees awarded by the institution, (2) the number of degrees awarded by the institution to individuals from underrepresented ethnic and racial minority groups, (3) the number of students at the institution with adjusted gross income, as such term is defined in section 1 of P.L.2021, c.26 (C.18A:71B-111), between $0 and $65,000, (4) degrees awarded to students with adjusted gross income between $0 and $65,000, (5) degrees awarded to students who transferred to the institution, (6) degrees awarded in the STEM and healthcare fields, and (7) doctoral degrees awarded; provided further, however, that institutions receiving awards shall be required to:  (a) share program-level spending information to assist in the distribution of future funding; and (b) participate in good faith discussions led by the Secretary to improve future distribution of funding to institutions consistent with State priorities, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Each four-year institution shall report to the Secretary of Higher Education and the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority, at an individual student unit record level, the amount of federal, State, and institutional financial aid granted to each undergraduate student in academic year 2021-2022 and each subsequent academic semester according to the schedule determined by the Secretary and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Higher Educational Services - Institutional Support, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,000,000 for institutions participating in the New Jersey Civic Information Consortium to advance research and innovation in the field of media and technology to benefit the State, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Amounts appropriated for Institutional Stabilization Aid to a New Jersey senior public college or university while under the oversight of an appointed State Monitor shall be conditioned upon the following provision: the governing body of the senior public college or university shall adopt a resolution whereby the governing body acknowledges the duties and responsibilities of the State Monitor and aligns and revises the senior public college or universitys governance, leadership, and administration in accordance with the duties and responsibilities of the State Monitor as prescribed in P.L.2023, c.115. 37 Cultural and Intellectual Development Services 2541 Division of State Library DIRECT STATE SERVICES 51-2541 Library Services $5,859,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Division of State Library $5,859,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($4,504,000) Materials and Supplies ($410,000) Services Other Than Personal ($193,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($27,000) Special Purpose: 51 Supplies and Extended Services ($725,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Direct State Services for the New Jersey State Library, excluding amounts appropriated to Special Purpose accounts, shall be paid in equal monthly installments, on the last business day of each month. STATE AID 51-2541 Library Services $9,425,000 (From General Fund:$4,499,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$4,926,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, Division of State Library $9,425,000 (From General Fund:$4,499,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$4,926,000) State Aid: 51 Per Capita Library Aid (PTRF) ($4,676,000) 51 Library Network ($4,499,000) 51 Hoboken Public Library (PTRF) ($250,000) 37 Cultural and Intellectual Development Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 05-2530 Support of the Arts $455,000 06-2535 Museum Services $2,618,000 07-2540 Development of Historical Resources $1,568,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Cultural and Intellectual Development Services $4,641,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($3,137,000) Materials and Supplies ($80,000) Services Other Than Personal ($353,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($71,000) Special Purpose: 07 New Jersey Historical Commission - Celebration of America ($500,000) 07 COVID-19 Frontline Healthcare Worker Memorial Commission ($500,000) The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the New Jersey Black Heritage Trail (P.L.2022, c.102) account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Pandemic Revenue Loss (State Museum) account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the COVID-19 Frontline Healthcare Worker Memorial Commission account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 05-2530 Support of the Arts $35,600,000 07-2540 Development of Historical Resources $7,117,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Cultural and Intellectual Development Services $42,717,000 Grants-in-Aid: 05 Paper Mill Playhouse - Capital Improvements ($875,000) 05 Count Basie Center for the Arts ($525,000) 05 Mayo Performing Arts Center ($125,000) 05 Two River Theater, Red Bank ($250,000) 05 Cultural Projects ($26,900,000) 05 Newark Symphony Hall Infrastructure Project ($2,250,000) 05 Capital Philharmonic of New Jersey ($175,000) 07 Battleship New Jersey Museum ($875,000) 07 New Jersey Women Vote - Alice Paul Institute ($57,000) 07 New Jersey Historical Commission - Agency Grants ($5,500,000) 07 New Jersey Council for the Humanities ($100,000) 05 Montclair Film - Operations & Education and Workforce Development Programs ($500,000) 05 WBGO 88.3 FM/Newark Public Radio - Capital Construction ($100,000) 05 New Jersey Symphony ($2,000,000) 07 Thomas Edison Center at Menlo Park ($200,000) 07 Monmouth Museum ($50,000) 05 Axelrod Performing Arts Center - Operating Costs ($100,000) 05 Jersey Shore Arts Center ($100,000) 07 Simon Wiesenthal Center - Mobile Museum of Tolerance ($100,000) 05 State Theatre New Jersey - Capital Improvements ($700,000) 05 Count Basie Center for the Arts - Capital Improvements ($1,000,000) 07 New Jersey Fire Museum and Fallen Firefighters Memorial (P.L.2021, c.463) ($200,000) 07 Cradle of Liberty Antique Fire Apparatus Association - Repaupo Fire Museum Facility Upgrades ($35,000) Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Cultural Projects, an amount not to exceed five percent may be used for administrative purposes, including but not limited to the assessment and oversight of cultural projects, including administrative costs attendant to this function, in compliance with all pertinent State and federal laws and regulations including the "Single Audit Act of 1984," Pub.L.98-502 (31 U.S.C. s.7501 et seq.), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Cultural Projects, the value of project grants awarded within each county shall total not less than $50,000. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Cultural Projects, funds may be used for the purpose of matching federal grants. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Cultural Projects, 25 percent shall be awarded to cultural groups or artists based in the eight southernmost counties (Cape May, Salem, Cumberland, Gloucester, Camden, Ocean, Atlantic, and Burlington); provided, however, that the calculation of such 25 percent allocation shall not include the first $1,000,000 of any grants that may be awarded to the New Jersey Performing Arts Center or the Rutgers-Camden Center for the Arts. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 4 of P.L.1999, c.131 (C.18A:73-22.4), of the amount hereinabove appropriated for New Jersey Historical Commission - Agency Grants, an amount not to exceed $300,000 is appropriated for administrative costs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 74 General Government Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 01-2505 Office of the Secretary of State $7,765,000 02-2510 Business Action Center $26,532,000 08-2545 State Archives $1,250,000 25-2525 Election Management and Coordination $15,877,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, General Government Services $51,424,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($8,305,000) Materials and Supplies ($163,000) Services Other Than Personal ($1,233,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($222,000) Special Purpose: 01 Office of Volunteerism ($79,000) 01 Office of Programs ($890,000) 01 Martin Luther King, Jr. Commemorative Commission ($240,000) 01 Cultural Trust ($165,000) 01 New Jersey Puerto Rico Commission ($400,000) 01 Business Marketing Initiative ($2,000,000) 02 Office of Economic Growth ($800,000) 02 New Jersey Small Business Development Centers ($1,200,000) 02 Travel and Tourism Advertising and Promotion ($17,600,000) 02 New Jersey Israel Commission ($350,000) 02 Agritourism Fund (P.L.2023, c.87) ($2,500,000) 25 Help America Vote Act ($4,327,000) 25 Early Voting Implementation ($10,000,000) 02 Women's Business Centers of New Jersey ($300,000) 02 New Jersey Pride Chamber of Commerce ($150,000) 02 New Jersey-India Commission ($250,000) 02 New Jersey Ireland Trade Commission ($250,000) The Secretary of State shall report semi-annually on the expenditure during the preceding six months of State funds hereinabove appropriated for Travel and Tourism Advertising and Promotion and private contributions to this program. The first semi-annual report shall be completed not later than 30 days following the end of the second quarter of the fiscal year, the second semi-annual report shall be completed not later than 30 days following the end of the fiscal year, and both reports shall be submitted to the State Treasurer, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, and the Joint Budget Oversight Committee. Receipts from the examination of voting machines by Election Management and Coordination and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year of those receipts are appropriated for the costs of making such examinations. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Help America Vote Act - State Match account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Business Marketing Initiative shall be used to pay for the costs of developing and implementing a marketing program to highlight the benefits of doing business in the State of New Jersey and to encourage national and international business entities to relocate and expand in New Jersey, pursuant to a competitively awarded contract between the Department of State and a non-profit entity with expertise in economic development, subject to the approval of the Director and the Division of Budget and Accounting. An amount equal to 50 percent of the receipts from the per gallon tax imposed on all sales of beer, cider, mead, and liquors during the preceding taxable year pursuant to R.S.54:43-1, sold by limited brewery, restricted brewery, cidery and meadery, and craft distillery licensees licensed pursuant to R.S.33:1-10, and certified by the Director of the Division of Taxation, is appropriated to the Brewery, Cidery, Meadery, and Distillery Industry Promotion Account in the Department of State to support industry-related research, development, and promotion activities positively impacting the operation and growth of New Jerseys limited brewery, restricted brewery, cidery and meadery, and craft distillery industries. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Early Voting Implementation, there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be required to fulfill the requirements of P.L.2021, c.40 (C.19:15A-1 et al.), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Further, the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 01-2505 Office of the Secretary of State $5,545,000 02-2510 Business Action Center $2,000,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, General Government Services $7,545,000 Grants-in-Aid: 01 Office of Programs ($1,350,000) 01 Center for Hispanic Policy, Research and Development ($3,225,000) 01 Cultural Trust ($720,000) 02 New Jersey Manufacturing Extension Program, Inc. ($2,000,000) 01 New Jersey Muslim Voice for Progress - Community Engagement ($250,000) Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Office of Programs, an amount not to exceed 10 percent may be used for administrative purposes, including the oversight of cultural projects, to ensure their compliance with all applicable State and federal laws and regulations including the "Single Audit Act of 1984," Pub.L.98-502 (31 U.S.C. s.7501 et seq.), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Electronic Registration Information Center account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Center for Hispanic Policy, Research and Development, an amount not to exceed five percent may be used for administrative purposes, including the oversight of cultural projects, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. STATE AID 25-2525 Election Management and Coordination $13,515,000 Total State Aid Appropriation, General Government Services $13,515,000 State Aid: 25 Extended Polling Place Hours ($12,600,000) 25 County Election Boards Mail-in Ballots ($915,000) In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Extended Polling Place Hours, there are appropriated such amounts as are required to provide required reimbursements to county Boards of Election, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Election Results Reporting (P.L.2023, c.131) account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Election Management and Coordination, there are appropriated such additional amounts, not to exceed $20,000,000, as the Director of the Division of Elections shall determine to be necessary to reimburse local government units for the additional direct expenditures necessary to report election results at the district level, pursuant to P.L.2022, c.67 and P.L.2022, c.70 subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Department of State, Total State Appropriation $2,167,406,000 Pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2003, c.114 (C.54:32D-1 et al.), the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the purpose of promoting cultural and tourism activities in this State first shall be charged to revenues derived from the hotel and motel occupancy fee. Summary of Department of State Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services .......................................... $73,331,000 Grants-in-Aid ..................................................... $2,071,135,000 State Aid ............................................................. $22,940,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund ...................................................... $2,162,480,000 Property Tax Relief Fund ................................... $4,926,000 78  DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 10 Public Safety and Criminal Justice 11 Vehicular Safety DIRECT STATE SERVICES 01-6400 Motor Vehicle Services $85,509,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Vehicular Safety $85,509,000 Direct State Services: Special Purpose: 01 MVC Surcharge Bonds - Debt Service ($34,009,000) 01 MVC - Operations ($50,000,000) 01 MVC Mobile Driver's Licenses and Identification Cards ($1,500,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for MVC Surcharge Bonds  Debt Service, there are appropriated such additional amounts, as determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, as are required to pay debt service on the bonds issued pursuant to P.L.2004, c.70 (C.34:1B-21.23 et al.), as amended. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, monies received in the "Commercial Vehicle Enforcement Fund" established pursuant to section 17 of P.L.1995, c.157 (C.39:8-75) are appropriated to offset all reasonable and necessary expenses of the Division of State Police, the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, the Department of Transportation, and the Department of Environmental Protection in the performance of commercial vehicle safety and emission inspections and other clean air purposes, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount appropriated to the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission is based on proportional revenue collections for that fiscal year pursuant to the statutes listed in subsection a. of section 105 of P.L.2003, c.13 (C.39:2A-36). Of that amount, $2,500,000 is appropriated for transfer to the Interdepartmental Property Rentals and Household and Security accounts, $5,150,000 is appropriated for transfer to the Department of Transportation, $5,800,000 is appropriated for transfer to the Division of Revenue and Enterprise Services within the Department of the Treasury, $612,000 is appropriated for transfer to the Division of State Police, $800,000 is appropriated for transfer to the Department of Environmental Protection, and $519,000 is appropriated for transfer to the Department of the Treasury for Property Management and Construction - Property Management Services. In addition, the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall pay the non-State hourly rate charged by the Office of Administrative Law for hearing services, or an amount no less than $500,000, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 105 of P.L.2003, c.13 (C.39:2A-36) or any law to the contrary, $10,940,000 is appropriated from the revenues appropriated to the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission for transfer to the Interdepartmental Property Rentals account to reflect savings from implementation of management and procurement efficiencies, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts derived pursuant to the New Jersey Emergency Medical Service Helicopter Response Act under subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.1992, c.87 (C.39:3-8.2), are appropriated to the Division of State Police and the Department of Health to defray the operating costs of the program as authorized under P.L.1986, c.106 (C.26:2K-35 et seq.).  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year is appropriated to the special capital maintenance reserve account for capital replacement and major maintenance of helicopter equipment, and any expenditures therefrom shall be subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Motor Vehicle Inspection Fund" established pursuant to subsection j. of R.S.39:8-2, balances in the fund are available for other clean air purposes, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There are appropriated from the "Unsafe Driving Surcharges Fund" established pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2004, c.70 (C.34:1B-21.27), all amounts on deposit in such fund as required under the contract between the State Treasurer and the New Jersey Economic Development Authority entered into pursuant to section 7 of P.L.2004, c.70 (C.34:1B-21.29). There are appropriated from the "Division of Motor Vehicles Surcharge Fund" established pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1994, c.57 (C.34:1B-21.12), all amounts on deposit in such fund as required under the contract between the State Treasurer and the New Jersey Economic Development Authority entered into pursuant to section 7 of P.L.2004, c.70 (C.34:1B-21.29). Notwithstanding the provisions of section 105 of P.L.2003, c.13 (C.39:2A-36) or any law to the contrary, pursuant to P.L.2006, c.39 (C.39:3-8.3 et seq.), receipts that are derived from the surcharge on luxury and fuel-inefficient vehicles shall be deposited into the General Fund as State revenue. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 105 of P.L.2003, c.13 (C.39:2A-36) or any law to the contrary, an amount not to exceed $10,000,000 from receipts from the increase in motor vehicle fees imposed in 2009 shall be deposited into the General Fund as State revenue, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 105 of P.L.2003, c.13 (C.39:2A-36) or any law to the contrary, an amount not to exceed $33,500,000 is appropriated from the revenues appropriated to the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission for deposit in the General Fund to reflect continuing savings initiatives, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 60 Transportation Programs 61  State and Local Highway Facilities DIRECT STATE SERVICES 06-6100 Maintenance and Operations $36,635,000 08-6120 Physical Plant and Support Services $4,641,000 71-6200 Capital Program Management $30,000,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, State and Local Highway Facilities $71,276,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($21,522,000) Materials and Supplies ($10,957,000) Services Other Than Personal ($1,792,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($7,005,000) Special Purpose: 71 Staff Augmentation ($25,000,000) 71 Simple Fix Safety Program ($5,000,000) The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the accounts hereinabove are appropriated for Maintenance and Operations, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Maintenance and Operations, such additional amounts as may be required are appropriated for winter operations, including snow removal costs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Department of Transportation from the General Fund, $12,500,000 thereof shall be paid from funds received from the various transportation-oriented authorities pursuant to contracts between the authorities and the State as are determined to be eligible for such funding pursuant to such contracts, as shall be determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts in excess of the amount anticipated from the Logo Sign Program fees and the Tourist Oriented Directional Signs Program fees are appropriated for the purpose of administering the programs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts in excess of the amount anticipated from highway application and permit fees pursuant to subsection (h) of section 5 of P.L.1966, c.301 (C.27:1A-5) are appropriated for the purpose of administering the Access Permit Review program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts in excess of the amount anticipated from Casualty Losses are appropriated for transportation purposes, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year is appropriated for the same purpose. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Maintenance and Operations, $10,000,000 for winter operations, including snow removal costs, is appropriated from the receipts of the New Tire Surcharge pursuant to P.L.2004, c.46 (C.54:32F-1 et al.). In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Maintenance and Operations, there is appropriated $5,150,000 from the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission for Maintenance and Fixed Charges, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 12 of P.L.1962, c.73 (C.12:7-34.47) or any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Maintenance and Operations, $1,900,000 is payable from the revenue from the fee increase pursuant to the amendatory provisions of section 12 of P.L.2002, c.34 (C.12:7-34.47) deposited into the "Maritime Industry Fund." Revenue from fees or other payments made for the placement of sponsorship acknowledgment and advertising on signs, equipment, materials, and vehicles used for a safety service patrol or emergency service patrol program pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1966, c.301 (C.27:1A-5), are appropriated to the Department of Transportation for transportation purposes, including contract incentives for heavy duty towing contracts that support the clearance of traffic incidents.  Use of the funds is subject to any federal requirements.  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year is appropriated for the same purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, amounts collected from fees for sponsorship programs pursuant to P.L.2013, c.130 (C.27:7-44.18 et al.) are appropriated to the Department of Transportation for highway purposes, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting; provided, however, that sponsorship acknowledgement and the use of such funds shall be subject to applicable requirements promulgated by the Federal Highway Administration.  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year is appropriated for the same purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 3 of P.L.2013, c.86 (C.39:4-88.2) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, amounts collected from the surcharge imposed on each person found guilty of a violation of R.S.39:4-82 or R.S.39:4-88 in excess of the amount determined by the Commissioner of Transportation to be necessary to acquire, install, and maintain highway signs that notify motorists entering New Jersey to comply with the provisions of R.S.39:4-82 and R.S.39:4-88 are appropriated for graffiti and litter removal activities, including public service campaigns for graffiti and litter removal, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year is appropriated for the same purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Simple Fix Safety Program shall be used to support State and local projects to facilitate traffic and pedestrian safety projects pursuant to a process administered by the Department of Transportation, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 71-6200 Capital Program Management $16,500,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, State and Local Highway Facilities $16,500,000 Grants-in-Aid: 71 Local Aid and Economic Development Grants ($16,000,000) 71 Mobility and Transportation Innovation Pilot Program (P.L.2023, c.184) ($500,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Local Aid and Economic Development Grants shall be used to provide funds for the Safe Streets to Transit Program, Bicycle & Pedestrian Facilities/Accommodations, and Transit Village Program, as determined by the Commissioner of Transportation, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year is appropriated for the same purpose. STATE AID 71-6200 Capital Program Management $75,755,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$75,755,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, State and Local Highway Facilities $75,755,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$75,755,000) State Aid: 71 Pedestrian Safety Grants (PTRF) ($1,440,000) 71 Local Transportation Projects Fund (PTRF) ($58,015,000) 71 County of Camden - Roadway and Street Improvements, City of Camden (PTRF) ($3,000,000) 71 County of Camden - Newton Avenue Flood Mitigation Project (PTRF) ($500,000) 71 County of Camden - Kaighns Avenue Infrastructure Program (PTRF) ($500,000) 71 County of Camden - Emergency Roadway Improvements (PTRF) ($5,500,000) 71 City of Bayonne - South Cove Pedestrian Bridge (PTRF) ($500,000) 71 Weehawken Township - Pedestrian Safety Improvements (PTRF) ($1,200,000) 71 Borough of Ridgefield - Road Safety and Congestion Improvement Project (PTRF) ($250,000) 71 Borough of Eatontown - Transportation and Safety Improvements (PTRF) ($100,000) 71 Township of South Brunswick - Richard Road Improvements (PTRF) ($750,000) 71 Township of Lawrence (Mercer) - Long Acres Wall Barrier (PTRF) ($2,000,000) 71 Borough of Ridgefield - Traffic Safety Improvements (PTRF) ($2,000,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Pedestrian Safety Grants shall be used to provide grants to local units for new, improved, or expanded pedestrian safety programs pursuant to a competitive process administered by the Department of Transportation, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year is appropriated for the same purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Local Transportation Projects Fund shall be used to provide grants to local units for transportation projects and pedestrian safety programs pursuant to a process administered by the Department of Transportation, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year is appropriated for the same purpose. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Township of Lawrence (Mercer) - Long Acres Wall Barrier (PTRF) account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION 60-6200 Transportation Trust Fund Authority $1,658,219,000 (From General Fund:$1,458,219,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$200,000,000) Total Capital Construction Appropriation, State and Local Highway Facilities $1,658,219,000 (From General Fund:$1,458,219,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$200,000,000) Capital Projects: 60 Transportation Trust Fund - Subaccount for Debt Service for Prior Bonds ($897,903,000) 60 Transportation Trust Fund - Subaccount for Debt Service for Prior Bonds (PTRF) ($200,000,000) 60 Transportation Trust Fund - Subaccount for Debt Service for Transportation Program Bonds ($560,316,000) The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Transportation Trust Fund Subaccount for Debt Service for Prior Bonds and the Transportation Trust Fund Subaccount for Debt Service for Transportation Program Bonds shall be provided from the following revenues: (i) $464,178,000 from motor fuels taxes, which are hereby appropriated for such purposes pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 4 of the State Constitution; (ii) $982,041,000 from the petroleum products gross receipts tax, which is hereby appropriated for such purposes pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 4 of the State Constitution; and (iii) $200,000,000 from the sales and use tax which is hereby appropriated for such purposes pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 4 of the State Constitution. In addition, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Transportation Trust Fund Subaccount for Debt Service for Prior Bonds may also be provided from (i) $12,000,000 of funds from the various transportation-oriented authorities pursuant to contracts between such transportation-oriented authorities and the State;  and (ii) such additional amounts pursuant to P.L.1984, c.73 (C.27:1B-1 et al.) as may be necessary and are hereby appropriated to satisfy all current fiscal year debt service, bond reserve requirements, and other fiscal obligations of the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority relating to the Prior Bonds. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in the event that some of the amounts hereinabove appropriated are not required to pay amounts due under the State contract between the State Treasurer and the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority for the Prior Bonds as the result of the receipt of federal subsidies for debt service on the Prior Bonds, or other obligations issued by the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority in connection with the Prior Bonds the amount hereinabove appropriated shall be reduced by such corresponding amount. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in the event that some of the amounts hereinabove appropriated are not required to pay amounts due under the State contract between the State Treasurer and the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority for the Prior Bonds or the State contract between the State Treasurer and the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority for the Transportation Program Bonds as the result of refundings, restructurings, lowered interest rates, or any other action which reduces the amounts required to make the payments under such State contracts, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Transportation Program Bonds or the Prior Bonds shall be reduced by such corresponding amounts. Revenues dedicated for transportation purposes pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 4 of the State Constitution in excess of the amounts of such dedicated revenue appropriated to the Transportation Trust Fund Subaccount for Debt Service for Prior Bonds, Transportation Trust Fund Subaccount for Debt Service for Transportation Program Bonds, for bond reserve requirements or for other fiscal obligations of the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority are hereby appropriated to the Transportation Trust Fund Subaccount for Capital Reserves. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Department of Transportation is authorized to use monies in the Transportation Trust Fund Subaccount for Capital Reserves for contracted federal projects until such time as federal funds become available for those projects, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Subject to the receipt of federal funds, the Transportation Trust Fund Subaccount for Capital Reserves may be reimbursed for all monies that were transferred to advance federally funded projects, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Department of Transportation and the New Jersey Transit Corporation, upon approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, may use Special Transportation Fund monies to support contracted Transportation Trust Fund projects until such time as revenues and other funds of the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority become available for those projects. Subject to the receipt of those revenues and other funds of the Authority, the Special Transportation Fund shall be reimbursed for all the monies that were used to advance Transportation Trust Fund projects. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, monies deposited into the Transportation Trust Fund Subaccount for Capital Reserves may be transferred to the Transportation Trust Fund Subaccount for Debt Service for Prior Bonds and Transportation Trust Fund Subaccount for Debt Service for Transportation Program Bonds to satisfy current year debt service, bond reserve requirements, and other fiscal obligations of the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, from amounts hereinabove appropriated the Department of Transportation may expend necessary amounts for improvements to streets and roads providing access to State facilities within the capital city without local participation. Receipts representing the State share from the rental or lease of property, and the unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year of such receipts are appropriated for maintenance or improvement of transportation property, equipment, and facilities. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Department of Transportation may transfer Transportation Trust Fund monies to contracted federal projects until such time as federal funds become available for those projects, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting and the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer. Subject to the receipt of federal funds, the Transportation Trust Fund may be reimbursed for all the monies that were transferred to advance federally funded projects. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated to the Department of Transportation (DOT) for its capital projects from the revenues and other funds of the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority are hereby subject to the following condition: if the Department of Environmental Protection (DEP) determines that the issuance of any permit to the DOT regarding any capital project is conditioned upon the providing of new or enhanced public access with respect to coastal zone management (public access project), the DOT may fund the cost of such public access project from the monies hereinabove appropriated. In the alternative, if the DEP and DOT determine that it is in the best interest of the public access project for it to be undertaken by the DEP or another governmental entity, the DOT may provide funding for such public access project from the monies hereinabove appropriated to the DEP or such other governmental entity pursuant to an agreement between the DOT and the DEP or other governmental entity, as applicable. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated from the revenues and other monies of the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority for the Department of Transportation and the New Jersey Transit Corporation, respectively, for salary and overhead costs of employees of the Department of Transportation and the New Jersey Transit Corporation, respectively, associated with the construction of capital projects by the Department of Transportation and the New Jersey Transit Corporation, respectively, shall not be subject to any limitation. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year of appropriations from the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority are appropriated. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection d. of section 21 of P.L.1984, c.73 (C.27:1B-21) or any law or regulation to the contrary, approval by the Joint Budget Oversight Committee of transfers among appropriations by project shall not be required.  Notice of a transfer approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting pursuant to that section shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there is appropriated to the Department of Transportation, such amounts as shall be approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, from the revenues and other funds of the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority received in connection with the issuance of the Authority's Grant Anticipation Revenue Vehicles (GARVEE) Bonds for the capital projects listed.  Federal funds received in conjunction with the capital projects funded through the issuance of these GARVEE Bonds are appropriated to the authority to pay debt service and other costs related to the GARVEE Bonds. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, receipts from the sale or conveyance of any lands held by the Department of Transportation are appropriated for the acquisition of land for highway projects or to refund the Federal Highway Administration where required by federal law.  Receipts from the sale of all fill material held by the Department of Transportation are appropriated for demolition, acquisition of land, rehabilitation or improvement of existing facilities, and construction of new facilities, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, receipts from the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey pursuant to a contract with the State for transportation system improvements are appropriated to the Department of Transportation for such improvements. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Commissioner of Transportation, upon approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, may transfer New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority monies to the Pulaski Skyway, Route 7/Wittpenn Bridge, and New Road projects which are to be funded by the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey pursuant to an agreement between the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey and the Commissioner of Transportation dated July 29, 2011, until such time as funding from the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey is paid to the State pursuant to such agreement.  Subject to the receipt of those funds, the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority shall be reimbursed for all monies transferred to advance these projects.  In the event that all of such transfers are not reimbursed by the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey pursuant to the agreement, an amount equivalent to such unreimbursed monies is hereby appropriated from the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority to such projects and such amounts shall constitute line item appropriations approved by the Legislature. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 6 of P.L.2006, c.3 (C.27:1B-22.2) or any law or regulation to the contrary, in recognition of the extensive destruction and damage to the State's roads, highways, bridges, and other critical transportation infrastructure during recent years inflicted by a series of federally declared disaster events, including but not limited to Hurricane Irene and Super Storm Sandy, of the amount hereinabove appropriated from the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority, an amount not to exceed $135,000,000 may be used for permitted maintenance, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount appropriated from the revenues and other funds of the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority for the New Jersey Rail Freight Assistance Program in fiscal year 2025 shall fund eligible project applications where the sponsor received funding for a related phase or portion of rail construction in any prior fiscal year before funding new projects that have not received prior funding under the program. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there are appropriated to the Department of Transportation for transportation capital projects such amounts as shall be approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting from the revenues and other funds of the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority received in connection with the issuance of the Authority's Indirect Grant Anticipation Revenue Vehicles (Indirect GARVEE) Bonds. Federal funds received in conjunction with transportation capital projects are appropriated to the Authority to pay debt service and other costs related to the Indirect GARVEE Bonds. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated from the revenues and other funds of the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority for the Local Aid, State Transportation Infrastructure Bank, an amount not to exceed $2,600,000 is appropriated for the payment of operating expenses of the New Jersey Infrastructure Bank for the purpose of administering the New Jersey Transportation Infrastructure Financing Program which provides loan assistance programs for local road projects, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1984, c.73 (C.27:1B-1 et seq.) or any law or regulation to the contrary, there is appropriated the sum of $1,233,000,000 from the revenues and other funds of the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority, and from the amounts on deposit in the Transportation Trust Fund Subaccount for Capital Reserves, for capital purposes as follows: Department of Transportation Description County Amount Acquisition of Right of Way Various $600,000 ADA Curb Ramp Implementation Various 30,000 Aeronautics and UAS Program Various 500,000 Airport Improvement Program Various 4,000,000 Betterments, Dams Various 300,000 Betterments, Roadway Preservation Various 18,000,000 Betterments, Safety Various 16,000,000 Bicycle & Pedestrian Facilities/Accommodations Various 1,000,000 Bridge and Structure Inspection, Miscellaneous Various 150,000 Bridge Emergency Repair Various 85,000,000 Bridge Inspection Program, Minor Bridges Various 8,800,000 Bridge Maintenance and Repair, Movable Bridges Various 25,000,000 Bridge Preventive Maintenance Various 35,000,000 Bridge Replacement, Future Projects Various 1,000,000 Bridge Scour Countermeasures Various 200,000 Congestion Relief, Intelligent Transportation System Improvements (Smart Move Program) Various 4,000,000 Construction Inspection Various 12,000,000 Construction Program IT System (TRNS.PORT) Various 5,400,000 Culvert Replacement Program Various 4,000,000 Design, Emerging Projects Various 17,000,000 Design, Geotechnical Engineering Tasks Various 500,000 Drainage Rehabilitation and Maintenance, State Various 20,000,000 Duck Island Landfill, Site Remediation Mercer 100,000 Electrical Facilities Various 6,000,000 Electrical Load Center Replacement, Statewide Various 6,000,000 Emergency Management and Transportation Security Support Various 1,500,000 Environmental Investigations Various 7,500,000 Environmental Project Support Various 1,200,000 Equipment (Vehicles, Construction, Safety) Various 19,000,000 Equipment, Snow and Ice Removal Various 4,000,000 Guiderail Upgrade Various 1,000,000 Interstate Service Facilities Various 750,000 Job Order Contracting Infrastructure Repairs, Statewide Various 25,000,000 Legal Costs for Right of Way Condemnation Various 1,900,000 Lincoln Tunnel Access Project (LTAP) Hudson, Essex 95,000,000 Local Aid, Infrastructure Fund Various 7,500,000 Local Aid, State Transportation Infrastructure Bank Various 20,500,000 Local Bridges, Future Needs Various 44,000,000 Local County Aid, DVRPC Various 30,145,891 Local County Aid, NJTPA Various 98,651,454 Local County Aid, SJTPO Various 21,202,655 Local Freight Impact Fund Various 28,000,000 Local Municipal Aid, DVRPC Various 26,868,698 Local Municipal Aid, NJTPA Various 100,796,486 Local Municipal Aid, SJTPO Various 12,334,816 Local Municipal Aid, Urban Aid Various 10,000,000 Maritime Transportation System Various 20,000,000 Minority and Women Workforce Training Set Aside Various 1,500,000 Mobility and Systems Engineering Program Various 3,000,000 New Jersey Rail Freight Assistance Program Various 25,000,000 Orphan Bridge Reconstruction Various 3,000,000 Park and Ride/Transportation Demand Management Program Various 700,000 Physical Plant Various 20,000,000 Planning and Research, State Various 2,000,000 Program Implementation Costs, NJDOT Various 110,000,000 Project Development: Concept Development and Preliminary Engineering Various 4,000,000 Rail-Highway Grade Crossing Program, State Various 5,000,000 Regional Action Program Various 2,000,000 Resurfacing Program Various 90,780,000 Right of Way Full-Service Consultant Term Agreements Various 50,000 Route 1, Alexander Road to Mapleton Road Mercer, Middlesex 4,000,000 Route 1&9, Interchange at Route I-278 Union 3,300,000 Route 9, Garden State Parkway to CR 559 (Mays Landing Road) Atlantic 2,300,000 Route 23, Pequannock Avenue to Village Road Morris 500,000 Route 40/322, Median Closures, Oakcrest Avenue to Spencer Avenue Atlantic 2,500,000 Route 41 and Deptford Center Road Gloucester 2,000,000 Route 46, Riverdale Drive to Route 23 Passaic 500,000 Route 47, Bridge over Dennis Creek Cape May 2,600,000 Route 57, CR 519 Intersection Improvement Warren 3,500,000 Safe Streets to Transit Program Various 1,000,000 Safety Programs Various 250,000 Salt Storage Facilities - Statewide Various 3,000,000 Sign Structure Inspection Program Various 2,100,000 Signs Program, Statewide Various 4,000,000 Smart and Connect Corridors Program Various 7,000,000 Solid and Hazardous Waste Cleanup, Reduction and Disposal Various 2,000,000 South Inlet Transportation Improvement Project Atlantic 1,500,000 Staff Augmentation Various 1,000,000 State Police Enforcement and Safety Services Various 15,000,000 Title VI and Nondiscrimination Supporting Activities Various 100,000 Traffic Monitoring Systems Various 1,490,000 Traffic Signal Replacement Various 10,000,000 Transit Village Program Various 1,000,000 Transportation Research Technology Various 1,700,000 Unanticipated Design, Right of Way and Construction Expenses, State Various 43,700,000 Utility Reconnaissance and Relocation Various 2,500,000 Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1984, c.73 (C.27:1B-1 et seq.) or any law or regulation to the contrary, there is appropriated the sum of $767,000,000 from the revenues and other funds of the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority, and from the amounts on deposit in the Transportation Trust Fund Subaccount for Capital Reserves, for the specific projects identified as follows: New Jersey Transit Corporation Description County Amount ADA-Platforms/Stations Various $500,000 Bridge and Tunnel Rehabilitation Various 16,630,000 Bus Acquisition Program Various 73,062,000 Bus Passenger Facilities/Park and Ride Various 800,000 Bus Support Facilities and Equipment Various 72,438,000 Bus Vehicle and Facility Maintenance/Capital Maintenance Various 100,000 Capital Program Implementation Various 40,000,000 Claims Support Various 100,000 Environmental Compliance Various 3,000,000 Ferry Program Various 6,490,244 High Speed Track Program Various 2,600,000 Immediate Action Program Various 38,029,309 Light Rail Infrastructure Improvements Various 18,275,000 Light Rail Vehicle Rolling Stock Various 5,000,000 Miscellaneous Various 500,000 NEC Improvements Various 68,363,000 New Brunswick Station Platform Extension and Elevator Improvements (Liberty Corridor) Middlesex 2,687,000 Other Rail Station/Terminal Improvements Various 11,310,000 Physical Plant Various 9,279,860 Portal North Bridge Hudson 111,600,880 Private Carrier Equipment Program Various 3,000,000 Rail Fleet Overhaul Various 12,200,000 Rail Rolling Stock Procurement Various 159,012,876 Rail Support Facilities and Equipment Various 4,725,000 Safety Improvement Program Various 725,000 Section 5310 Program Various 1,750,000 Section 5311 Program Various 100,000 Security Improvements Various 2,470,000 Signals and Communications/Electric Traction Systems Various 21,717,082 Small/Special Services Program Various 1,473,000 Study and Development Various 9,409,000 Technology Improvements Various 10,406,000 Track Program Various 28,500,000 Transit Rail Initiatives Various 30,746,749 62  Public Transportation GRANTS-IN-AID 04-6050 Railroad and Bus Operations $3,003,503,000 Subtotal Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Public Transportation $3,003,503,000 Less: Farebox Revenue($947,000,000) Other Commercial Revenue($131,700,000) Other Reimbursements($1,779,803,000) Total Deductions ($2,858,503,000) Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Public Transportation $145,000,000 Grants-in-Aid: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($1,781,452,000) Materials and Supplies ($415,311,000) Services Other Than Personal ($246,930,000) Special Purpose: 04 Purchased Transportation ($288,733,000) 04 Insurance and Claims ($80,862,000) 04 Tolls, Taxes and Other Operating Expenses ($190,215,000) Less: Total Deductions: $2,858,503,000 Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the New Jersey Transit Corporation, there are appropriated such amounts as are received from the New Jersey Turnpike Authority, pursuant to a contract between the New Jersey Turnpike Authority and the State for such transportation purposes. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the New Jersey Transit Corporation, there is appropriated $70,089,000 from the Clean Energy Fund for utility costs, bus electrification and other clean energy projects associated with New Jersey Transit Corporation operations. STATE AID 04-6050 Railroad and Bus Operations $46,171,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$46,171,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, Public Transportation $46,171,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$46,171,000) State Aid: 04 Transportation Assistance for Senior Citizens and Disabled Residents (PTRF) ($42,521,000) 04 County of Burlington - BurLink Buses (PTRF) ($400,000) 04 City of Rahway - Train Station Infrastructure Improvements (PTRF) ($2,500,000) 04 County of Passaic - Microtransit Pilot Program (PTRF) ($750,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection b. of section 4 of P.L.1983, c.578 (C.27:25-28) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Transportation Assistance for Senior Citizens and Disabled Residents is appropriated from the Property Tax Relief Fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Counties which provide paratransit services for sheltered workshop clients may seek reimbursement for such services pursuant to P.L.1987, c.455 (C.34:16-51 et seq.). CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Commissioner of Transportation, upon approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, may transfer funds made available from the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority for public transportation projects under the program headings "New Jersey Transit Corporation" to the line-item under that same program heading entitled "Federal Transit Administration Projects" for any federally funded public transportation project shown in this act or any previous appropriation acts until such time as federal funds become available for the projects.  Subject to the receipt of federal funds, the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority shall be reimbursed for all the monies that were transferred to advance Federal Transit Administration projects.  Any transfer of funds which returns funds from the line-item "Federal Transit Administration Projects" to the account of origin shall be deemed approved. From the amounts appropriated from the revenues and other funds of the New Jersey Transportation Trust Fund Authority for the current fiscal year transportation capital program, the Commissioner of Transportation may allocate $4,000,000 of the amount listed for the Private Carrier Equipment Program to the New Jersey Transit Corporation's Private Carrier Capital Improvement Program (PCCIP).  The amount provided herein shall be allocated to the private motorbus carriers consistent with the formula used to administer the PCCIP and shall be restricted to those carriers that currently qualify for participation in the PCCIP.  These funds may be used for the procurement of any goods or services currently approved under New Jersey Transit Corporation's PCCIP, as well as:  facility improvements, vehicle procurement, and capital maintenance that comports with section 3 of P.L.1984, c.73 (C.27:1B-3).  Such maintenance and equipment procurements shall apply to vehicles owned by the private motorbus carriers and used in public transportation service, as well as to New Jersey Transit Corporation-owned vehicles. Private motorbus carriers receiving an allocation of such funds shall be required to submit to the New Jersey Transit Corporation a full accounting for all expenditures, demonstrating that the funds were used to increase or maintain the current level of public transportation service provided by the carrier or to improve revenue vehicle maintenance.  Under no circumstances shall these funds be used to provide compensation of any officer or owner of a private motorbus carrier. 64  Regulation and General Management DIRECT STATE SERVICES 05-6070 Multimodal Services $801,000 99-6000 Administration and Support Services $735,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Regulation and General Management $1,536,000 Direct State Services: Materials and Supplies ($105,000) Services Other Than Personal ($713,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($5,000) Special Purpose: 05 Office of Maritime Resources ($248,000) 05 Airport Safety Administration ($465,000) Receipts in excess of the amount anticipated from outdoor advertising application and permit fees are appropriated for the purpose of administering the Outdoor Advertising Permit and Regulation Program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from fees on placarded rail freight cars transporting hazardous materials in this state are appropriated to defray the expenses of the Placarded Rail Freight Car Transporting Hazardous Materials Program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Airport Safety Fund account together with any receipts in excess of the amount anticipated are appropriated for the same purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Airport Safety Administration is payable out of the Airport Safety Fund established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1983, c.264 (C.6:1-92).  If receipts to that fund are less than anticipated, the appropriation shall be reduced proportionately. GRANTS-IN-AID The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Airport Safety Fund account together with any receipts in excess of the amount anticipated are appropriated for the same purpose. Department of Transportation, Total State Appropriation $2,099,966,000 Notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary, the Department of Transportation and the New Jersey Transit Corporation are directed and authorized to provide for the restoration and reclamation into open spaces and recreation parkland from functionally obsolescent transportation support facilities and properties, after any and all contamination abatement, environmental remediation, and structural demolition has been completed. Summary of Department of Transportation Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services .......................................... $158,321,000 Grants-in-Aid ..................................................... $161,500,000 State Aid ............................................................. $121,926,000 Capital Construction .......................................... $1,658,219,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund ...................................................... $1,778,040,000 Property Tax Relief Fund ................................... $321,926,000 82  DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 36  Higher Educational Services GRANTS-IN-AID 47-2155 Support to Independent Institutions $28,511,000 49-2155 Miscellaneous Higher Education Programs $88,750,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Higher Educational Services $117,261,000 Grants-in-Aid: 47 Aid to Independent Colleges and Universities ($13,200,000) 47 Clinical Legal Programs for the Poor - Seton Hall University ($195,000) 47 Fairleigh Dickinson University - Newark Campus Political Science Program ($125,000) 47 Caldwell University Art Therapy ($125,000) 47 Research Under Contract with the Institute of Medical Research, Camden ($1,000,000) 47 NJ Coastal Consortium for Resilient Communities ($250,000) 47 Seton Hall - Legal Assistance for Tenants ($1,016,000) 47 Seton Hall Student Facility ($750,000) 47 Stevens Institute of Technology ($5,750,000) 47 Saint Elizabeth University - Facility Improvements ($500,000) 49 Higher Education Capital Improvement Program - Debt Service ($41,776,000) 49 Equipment Leasing Fund - Debt Service ($11,681,000) 49 Higher Education Facilities Trust Fund - Debt Service ($27,761,000) 49 Higher Education Technology Bond - Debt Service ($7,532,000) 47 Coriell Institute of Medical Research - New Headquarters ($500,000) 47 Monmouth University - Student Wellness Center ($100,000) 47 Stevens Institute of Technology - Institute for Artificial Intelligence, Capital Construction ($1,500,000) 47 Monmouth University - Capital Projects ($3,000,000) 47 Seton Hall University - Library Improvements ($500,000) The amount hereinabove appropriated for Aid to Independent Colleges and Universities shall be allocated to eligible institutions in accordance with the "Independent College and University Assistance Act," P.L.1979, c.132 (C.18A:72B-15 et seq.), provided that the number of full-time equivalent students at the five State Colleges shall be 29,982 for fiscal year 2025. Notwithstanding the provision of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Aid to Independent Colleges and Universities, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,000,000 subject to requirements determined to be appropriate by the Secretary in accordance with the "Independent College and University Assistance Act," P.L.1979, c.132 (C.18A:72B-15 et seq.), and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for Research Under Contract with the Institute of Medical Research, Camden (Coriell Institute) shall be expended on support for research activities, and the Institute shall submit an annual audited financial statement to the Department of the Treasury which shall include a schedule showing the use of these funds. The amount appropriated for NJ Coastal Consortium for Resilient Communities is conditioned on the following: the consortium shall include Monmouth University as a member school. STATE AID 48-2155 Aid to County Colleges $290,395,000 (From General Fund:$23,800,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$266,595,000) Subtotal State Aid Appropriation, Higher Educational Services $290,395,000 (From General Fund:$23,800,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$266,595,000) Less: Supplemental Workforce Fund  Basic Skills($23,800,000) Total Deductions ($23,800,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, Higher Educational Services $266,595,000 (From General Fund:$0) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$266,595,000) State Aid: 48 Operational Costs ($23,800,000) 48 Operational Costs (PTRF) ($145,323,000) 48 Debt Service for Chapter 12, P.L.1971, c.12 (N.J.S.18A:64A-22.1) (PTRF) ($39,651,000) 48 Alternate Benefit Program - Employer Contributions (PTRF) ($20,300,000) 48 Alternate Benefit Program - Non-contributory Insurance (PTRF) ($2,664,000) 48 Middlesex County College Capital (PTRF) ($8,500,000) 48 Middlesex County College - Educational Programming (PTRF) ($5,000,000) 48 Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund - Non-contributory Insurance (PTRF) ($6,000) 48 Employer Contributions - Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund (PTRF) ($57,000) 48 Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund - Post Retirement Medical (PTRF) ($1,744,000) 48 Post Retirement Medical Other Than TPAF (PTRF) ($36,995,000) 48 Employer Contributions - FICA for County College Members of TPAF (PTRF) ($37,000) 48 Debt Service on Pension Obligation Bonds (PTRF) ($263,000) 48 Brookdale Community College (PTRF) ($125,000) 48 Hudson County Community College - Capital (PTRF) ($5,000,000) 48 Essex County College (PTRF) ($400,000) 48 Camden County College - Student Success Program (PTRF) ($530,000) Less: Total Deductions: $23,800,000 In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Operational Costs, there is appropriated $23,800,000 from the Supplemental Workforce Fund for Basic Skills for remedial courses provided at county colleges and all other monies in the Supplemental Workforce Fund for Basic Skills are appropriated in the proportions set forth in section 1 of P.L.2001, c.152 (C.34:15D-21). Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, from the amounts hereinabove appropriated for county college Operational Costs, there are allocated such amounts as are required to provide the reimbursement to cover tuition costs of the National Guard members pursuant to subsection b. of section 21 of P.L.1999, c.46 (C.18A:62-24). Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.18A:64A-22 et seq. or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Operational Costs shall be allocated and distributed to the 18 county colleges predicated on the funding distribution model for state Operational Costs based on factors including enrollment and completion of students, in consideration of the principles of the State Plan for Higher Education, with a priority given for low-income populations, underrepresented populations, and adults. The funding distribution model shall be recommended by the New Jersey Council of County Colleges, in consultation with the Secretary of Higher Education, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Such amounts as may be necessary for the payment of interest or principal or both, due from the issuance of any bonds authorized under the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1971, c.12 (C.18A:64A-22.1) are appropriated. Such additional amounts as may be required for Alternate Benefit Program - Employer Contributions, Alternate Benefit Program - Non-contributory Insurance, Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund - Non-contributory Insurance, Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund - Post Retirement Medical, Post Retirement Medical Other Than TPAF, Affordable Care Act Fees, and Employer Contributions - FICA for County College Members of TPAF are appropriated, as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Debt Service on Pension Obligation Bonds to make payments under the State Treasurer's contracts authorized pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1997, c.114 (C.34:1B-7.50), there are appropriated such other amounts as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine are required to pay all amounts due from the State pursuant to such contracts. 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 51 Economic Planning and Development GRANTS-IN-AID 38-2043 Economic Development $203,882,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Economic Planning and Development $203,882,000 Grants-in-Aid: 38 Main Street Recovery Fund (P.L.2020, c.156) ($26,500,000) 38 New Jersey Commission on Science, Innovation & Technology ($4,500,000) 38 Small Business Bonding Readiness Assistance Fund, EDA ($500,000) 38 Economic Redevelopment and Growth Grants, EDA ($87,048,000) 38 Fort Monmouth Infrastructure ($10,000,000) 38 Economic Recovery Fund - Strategic Innovation Centers and Maternal and Infant Health Innovation Center ($30,000,000) 38 Manufacturing Initiative ($10,000,000) 38 Arts and Innovation, EDA ($3,000,000) 38 Wealth Disparities Initiatives, EDA ($2,000,000) 38 New Jersey Motion Picture Commission ($1,000,000) 38 AI Innovation Challenge, EDA ($4,000,000) 38 Innovation Fellows, EDA ($2,000,000) 38 CSIT Maternal & Infant Health R&D Grant Program ($250,000) 38 Events Attraction and Marketing, EDA ($19,000,000) 38 Brownfield Site Reimbursement Fund ($3,534,000) 38 TechUnited: NJ - Women and Minority Business Owner Mentorship Cohort ($500,000) 38 Community-Based Single Entity Hospital Loan Fund ($50,000) In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Economic Redevelopment and Growth Grants, EDA, there are appropriated such amounts as may be necessary to fund the Economic Redevelopment and Growth Grant program, pursuant to the "New Jersey Economic Stimulus Act of 2009," P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-489a et seq.), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  Due to the uncertain timing of grant requests, the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Economic Redevelopment and Growth Grants, EDA account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Arts and Innovation, $3,000,000 shall be allocated to the New Jersey Performing Arts Center for the North to Shore Festival. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for AI Innovation Challenge shall be used by the New Jersey Economic Development Authority to provide grants through one or more competitive programs to individuals or entities that submit applications or proposals for the use of artificial intelligence technologies for social and public good, including, but not limited to, the improvement of government services, which grants the New Jersey Economic Development Authority may provide directly or may provide through grants to entities that operate or manage innovation-oriented centers for such entities to administer their own grant programs. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Innovation Fellows shall be used by the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, in consultation with Princeton University and in connection with the Princeton University artificial intelligence hub, for one or more New Jersey Innovation Fellows Program solicitations for the purpose of artificial intelligence innovation. Funds made available for the remediation of the discharges of hazardous substances pursuant to the amendments effective July 1, 2015, to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution, shall be appropriated to the Brownfield Site Reimbursement Fund, established pursuant to section 38 of P.L.1997, c.278 (C.58:10B-30), in an amount to be determined by the Director of the Division of Taxation, and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  If such amounts for the remediation of discharges of hazardous substances are insufficient, there are appropriated such amounts as necessary to the Brownfield Site Reimbursement Fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Brownfield Site Reimbursement Fund account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 52 Economic Regulation DIRECT STATE SERVICES 54-2008 Utility Regulation $33,239,000 55-2004 Regulation of Cable Television $1,899,000 88-2058 Energy Assistance Programs $1,865,000 97-2016 Regulatory Support Services $4,387,000 99-2003 Administration and Support Services $13,409,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Economic Regulation $54,799,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($23,552,000) Materials and Supplies ($268,000) Services Other Than Personal ($2,521,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($652,000) Special Purpose: 54 Grid Modernization ($7,500,000) 54 Charge Up New Jersey Electric Vehicle Incentive Program ($20,000,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($306,000) Receipts from fees are appropriated for the administrative costs of the Board of Public Utilities. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the programs administered by the Board of Public Utilities are appropriated for use by those respective programs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. All revenue received in the CATV Universal Access Fund is appropriated for transfer to the General Fund as State revenue. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (3) of subsection a. of section 12 of the Electric Discount and Energy Competition Act, P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-60) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, receipts from the Clean Energy Fund are appropriated for the actual administrative salary and operating costs for the Office of Clean Energy as requested by the President of the Board of Public Utilities and approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the investment earnings derived from the funds deposited into the Clean Energy Fund and Universal Service Fund shall accrue to the funds and are appropriated to pay the costs of the various programs of the Board of Public Utilities Clean Energy Program and Universal Service Fund. There are appropriated from interest earned by the Petroleum Overcharge Reimbursement Fund such amounts as may be required for costs attributable to the administration of the fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the balances from the Petroleum Overcharge Reimbursement Fund and the Secondary Stage Refunds and the monies required to be deposited into that fund from projects which have been completed or are no longer viable are reappropriated for new projects consistent with the court rulings which served as the basis for the original awards, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting and the Director of the Office of Energy Savings. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Energy Assistance Programs classification may be transferred to the Lifeline Programs accounts in the Department of Human Services to fund the costs associated with administering the Lifeline Credits Program and Tenants' Assistance Rebate Program and shall be applied in accordance with a Memorandum of Understanding between the President of the Board of Public Utilities and the Commissioner of Human Services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Grid Modernization, there is appropriated  $32,500,000 from the Clean Energy Fund to the Board of Public Utilities for the purpose of providing grants, through a competitive process, to support the development of comprehensive and regional resilience strategies to address threats to the States power system  infrastructure, prevent outages, enhance the resiliency of the electric grid, and deploy technologies to enhance grid flexibility, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 88-2058 Energy Assistance Programs $63,085,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Economic Regulation $63,085,000 Grants-in-Aid: 88 Payments for Lifeline Credits ($26,901,000) 88 Tenants' Assistance Rebate Program ($36,184,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Payments for Lifeline Credits and the Tenants' Assistance Rebate Program are available for the payment of obligations applicable to prior fiscal years. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1979, c.197 (C.48:2-29.15 et seq.), P.L.1981, c.210 (C.48:2-29.30 et seq.), or any law or regulation to the contrary, the benefits of the Lifeline Credits Program and the Tenants' Assistance Rebate Program may be distributed throughout the entire year from July through June, and are not limited to an October to March heating season; therefore, applications for Lifeline benefits and benefits from the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled program may be combined. In order to permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations and ensure the timely payment of Lifeline claims, amounts may be transferred from the various items of appropriation within the Energy Assistance Programs classification, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Payments for Lifeline Credits and the Tenants' Assistance Rebate Program, such amounts as may be required for the payment of claims, credits, and rebates are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Any supplemental appropriation for the Payments for Lifeline Credits and the Tenants' Assistance Rebate Program may be recovered from the Universal Service Fund through transfer to the General Fund as State revenue, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for Payments for Lifeline Credits and the Tenants' Assistance Rebate Program are available to the Department of Human Services to fund the payments associated with the Lifeline Credits and Tenants' Assistance programs and shall be applied in accordance with a Memorandum of Understanding between the President of the Board of Public Utilities and the Commissioner of Human Services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 72 Governmental Review and Oversight DIRECT STATE SERVICES 03-2015 Employee Relations and Collective Negotiations $928,000 07-2040 Office of Management and Budget $14,747,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Governmental Review and Oversight $15,675,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($13,536,000) Materials and Supplies ($125,000) Services Other Than Personal ($1,333,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($6,000) Special Purpose: 07 Independent Audits ($675,000) There are appropriated, from receipts from the investment of State funds, such amounts as may be necessary for interest costs, bank service charges, custodial costs, mortgage servicing fees, and advertising bank balances under section 1 of P.L.1956, c.174 (C.52:18-16.1). Such amounts as may be necessary for administrative expenses incurred in processing federal benefit payments are appropriated from such amounts as may be received or are receivable for this purpose. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Office of Management and Budget, there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be necessary for an independent audit of the State's general fixed asset account group, management, performance, and operational audits, and the single audit. 2066 Office of the State Comptroller DIRECT STATE SERVICES 08-2066 Office of the State Comptroller $9,629,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Office of the State Comptroller $9,629,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($8,167,000) Materials and Supplies ($39,000) Services Other Than Personal ($1,323,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($49,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($51,000) In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Office of the State Comptroller, there are appropriated such additional amounts as determined by the State Comptroller, not to exceed $500,000, for the purpose of providing oversight and retaining qualified experts to implement the relevant provisions of the Gateway Development Commission Act, P.L.2019, c.195 (C.32:36-1 et seq.), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, all financial recoveries obtained through the efforts of any entity authorized to undertake the prevention and detection of Medicaid fraud, waste and abuse, are appropriated to General Medical Services in the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services in the Department of Human Services. 73 Financial Administration DIRECT STATE SERVICES 15-2080 Taxation Services and Administration $141,595,000 17-2105 Administration of State Revenues and Enterprise Services $41,391,000 19-2120 Management of State Investments $8,000,000 25-2095 Administration of Casino Gambling $8,745,000 (From Casino Control Fund:$8,745,000) Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Financial Administration $199,731,000 (From General Fund:$190,986,000) (From Casino Control Fund:$8,745,000) Direct State Services: Personal Services: Chairperson and Commissioners (CCF) ($391,000) Salaries and Wages ($141,482,000) Salaries and Wages (CCF) ($3,406,000) Employee Benefits (CCF) ($2,871,000) Materials and Supplies ($3,333,000) Materials and Supplies (CCF) ($84,000) Services Other Than Personal ($38,970,000) Services Other Than Personal (CCF) ($600,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($793,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges (CCF) ($1,153,000) Special Purpose: 17 Wage Reporting/Temporary Disability Insurance ($800,000) 19 Secure Choice Savings Program (P.L.2019, c.56) ($3,500,000) 25 Administration of Casino Gambling (CCF) ($20,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($2,108,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment (CCF) ($220,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 4 of the "Lead Hazard Control Assistance Act," P.L.2003, c.311 (C.52:27D-437.4), such amounts as are necessary are appropriated from the Lead Hazard Control Assistance Fund for the Department of the Treasury's administrative costs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Taxation Services and Administration, there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be required, not to exceed $30,000,000, as determined by the Director of the Division of Taxation and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, for the cost of purchasing unused tax credits pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection d. of section 77 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-345) and section 89 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.52:18A-263), and for the administrative costs of purchasing such unused tax credits. Upon certification of the Director of the Division of Taxation, the State Treasurer shall pay, upon warrants of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, such claims for refund as may be necessary under the provisions of Title 54 of the Revised Statutes, as amended and supplemented. Receipts from the sale of confiscated equipment, materials, and supplies under the "Cigarette Tax Act," P.L.1948, c.65 (C.54:40A-1 et seq.) are appropriated as may be necessary for confiscation, storage, disposal, and other related expenses thereof. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there are appropriated from fees from the cost of collection imposed pursuant to section 8 of P.L.1987, c.76 (C.54:49-12.1) such amounts as may be required for compliance and enforcement activities associated with the collection process in accordance with the Taxpayers' Bill of Rights under P.L.1992, c.175. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Taxation Services and Administration, such additional amounts as may be necessary are appropriated to fund costs of the collecting and processing of debts, taxes, and other fees and charges owed to the State, including but not limited to the services of auditors and attorneys and enhanced compliance programs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall provide the Joint Budget Oversight Committee with written reports on the detailed appropriation and expenditure of amounts appropriated pursuant to this provision. Such amounts as are required for the acquisition of equipment, software and necessary services essential to the modernization of processing tax returns, tax payments, fees, and associated documents and transactions are appropriated from tax collections, subject to the approval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee and the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount necessary to provide administrative costs incurred by the Division of Taxation and the Division of Revenue and Enterprise Services to meet the statutory requirements of the "New Jersey Urban Enterprise Zones Act," P.L.1983, c.303 (C.52:27H-60 et seq.) is appropriated from the Enterprise Zone Assistance Fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Pursuant to the provisions of section 12 of P.L.1992, c.165 (C.40:54D-12) there are appropriated such amounts as may be required to compensate the Department of the Treasury for costs incurred in administering the "Tourism Improvement and Development District Act," P.L.1992, c.165 (C.40:54D-1 et seq.). Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, receipts from agreements entered into by the Director of the Division of Taxation pursuant to P.L.1992, c.172 (C.54:49-12.2 et seq.) are appropriated as may be necessary for contingency fees stipulated in such agreements and any other related expenses thereof. Pursuant to the provisions of section 54 of P.L.2002, c.34 (C.App.A:9-78) deposits made to the New Jersey Domestic Security Account are appropriated for transfer to the Department of Health to support medical emergency disaster preparedness for bioterrorism, to the Department of Law and Public Safety for State Police salaries related to Statewide security services and counter-terrorism programs, and to the Department of Agriculture for the Agro-Terrorism program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There are appropriated, from revenues from escheated property under the various escheat acts, such amounts as may be necessary to administer such acts and such amounts as may be required for refunds. There are appropriated out of the State Lottery Fund such amounts as may be necessary for costs required to implement the "State Lottery Law," P.L.1970, c.13 (C.5:9-1 et seq.) and for payment for commissions, prizes, and expenses of developing and implementing games pursuant to section 7 of P.L.1970, c.13 (C.5:9-7) incurred prior to the enactment and implementation of the "Lottery Enterprise Contribution Act," P.L.2017, c.98 (C.5:9-22.5 et al.). There are appropriated such amounts as are necessary to fund the hospitals' share of monies collected pursuant to the hospital care payment act, P.L.2003, c.112 (C.17B:30-41 et seq.), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Division of Revenue and Enterprise Services, there is appropriated to the Division of Revenue and Enterprise Services $5,800,000 from the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission for document processing charges. Receipts in excess of those anticipated from expedited service surcharges are appropriated to meet the costs of the Division of Revenue and Enterprise Services' commercial recording function, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is hereby authorized to transfer or credit such amounts as are necessary between the Department of Labor and Workforce Development and the Department of the Treasury for the administration of revenue collection and processing functions related to Unemployment Insurance, Temporary Disability Insurance, Workers' Compensation, Special Compensation Programs, the Health Care Subsidy Fund, Family Leave Insurance, the Workforce Development Partnership program, and aligned programs. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Wage Reporting/Temporary Disability Insurance program is payable out of the State Disability Benefits Fund, and in addition to the amounts hereinabove, there are appropriated from the State Disability Benefits Fund such additional amounts as may be required to administer revenue collection and processing functions associated with the Temporary Disability Insurance program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no monies from the receipts deposited into the New Jersey Public Records Preservation account in the Department of the Treasury are appropriated for grants to counties and municipalities. Funds necessary to defray the cost of collection to implement the provisions of P.L.1994, c.64, as well as the cost of billing and collection of surcharges levied on drivers in accordance with the New Jersey Automobile Insurance Reform Act of 1982 - Merit Rating System Surcharge Program, P.L.1983, c.65 (C.17:29A-33 et al.) as amended, are appropriated from fees in lieu of actual cost of collection receipts and from surcharges derived, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from New Jersey Public Records Preservation fees, not to exceed $2,000,000, are appropriated for the operations of the microfilm or other storage systems in the Division of Revenue and Enterprise Services within the Department of the Treasury, including the administration of the States records management and records center operations, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There are appropriated from revenue to be received from investment earnings of State funds such amounts as may be necessary to administer the Management of State Investments program, as determined by the Director of the Division of Investment, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Secure Choice Savings Program (P.L.2019, c.56), there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be necessary to support the costs of implementing the Program as determined by the Executive Director of the Secure Choice Program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Secure Choice Savings Program (P.L.2019, c.56) account is appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There are appropriated, from receipts from service fees billed to authorities for the handling of investment transactions, such amounts as may be necessary to administer the Management of State Investments program. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the expenses of administration for the various retirement systems and employee benefit programs administered by the Division of Pensions and Benefits and the Division of Investments shall be charged to the pension and health benefits funds established by law to receive employer contributions or payments or to make benefit payments under the programs, as the case may be. In addition to the amounts hereinabove, there are appropriated such amounts as may be necessary for administrative costs, which shall include bank service charges, investment services, and other such costs as are related to the management of the pension and health benefit programs, as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. 74 General Government Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 02-2069 Garden State Preservation Trust $340,000 09-2050 Purchasing and Inventory Management $10,356,000 10-2062 Public Broadcasting Services $3,397,000 22-2145 Capital City Redevelopment Corporation $1,500,000 26-2067 Property Management and Construction - Property Management Services $22,487,000 37-2051 Risk Management $5,474,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, General Government Services $43,554,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($23,202,000) Materials and Supplies ($789,000) Services Other Than Personal ($6,909,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($7,882,000) Special Purpose: 02 Garden State Preservation Trust ($340,000) 09 Chief Diversity Officer ($1,237,000) 09 Contractor Study Implementation ($600,000) 10 Support of Public Broadcasting - NJTV ($1,000,000) 22 Capital City Redevelopment Loan and Grant Fund ($1,500,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($95,000) Fees collected pursuant to P.L.1975, c.127 (C.10:5-31 et seq.), are appropriated to the Division of Purchase and Property for program costs, subject to allotment by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated to the Division of Purchase and Property, there is appropriated to the Division of Purchase and Property, an amount equal to 50percent of the amount of the total rebates on procurement card purchases for costs of the Division, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition, of the remaining 50 percent of the total rebates on procurement card purchases, the top three participating State using agencies with the highest spending will receive 50 percent of the rebates earned for their respective eligible procurement card spending and the balance is appropriated to the Division of Purchase and Property for costs of the Division, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there are appropriated, from the receipts from third party subrogation and service fees billed to authorities for the handling of insurance procurement and risk management services, such amounts as may be necessary for the administrative expenses of the Risk Management program. The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is empowered to transfer or credit to the Print Shop Revolving Fund any appropriation made to any department for printing costs appropriated or allocated to such departments for their share of costs to the Print Shop and the Office of Printing Control. The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is empowered to transfer or credit to the Property Management and Construction program classification, from appropriations for construction and improvements an amount sufficient to pay for the cost of architectural work, superintendence and other expert services in connection with such work. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Property Management and Construction, there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be required for the costs incurred in order to preserve and maintain the value and condition of State real property that has been declared surplus and for costs incurred in the selling of the real property, including appraisal, survey, advertising, maintenance, security and other costs related to the preservation and disposal, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there are appropriated from receipts from the pre-qualification service fees billed to contractors, architects, engineers, and professionals sufficient amounts for expenses related to the administration of pre-qualification activities undertaken by the Division of Property Management and Construction. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Property Management and Construction - Property Management Services, there is appropriated to the Property Management and Construction - Property Management Services account, $519,000 from the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission for preventative maintenance costs. Receipts from the leasing of State real property are appropriated for the maintenance of State-owned property, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from the leasing of Department of Environmental Protection real properties are appropriated for the costs incurred for maintenance, repairs, and utilities on the properties. There are appropriated such additional amounts as may be necessary for the purchase of expert witness services related to the State's defense against inverse condemnation claims related to the Department of Environmental Protection's Land Use Regulation program. Receipts from employee maintenance charges in excess of $300,000 are appropriated for maintenance of employee housing and associated relocation costs; provided, however, that an amount not to exceed $25,000 shall be available for management of the program, the expenditure of which shall be subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There are appropriated from receipts from lease proceeds billed to the occupants of the James J. Howard Marine Sciences Laboratory, such amounts as may be required to operate and maintain the facility. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Garden State Preservation Trust account is transferred from the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund established pursuant to section 19 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-19) and the Preserve New Jersey Funds established pursuant to P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.), to the General Fund and is appropriated to the Department of the Treasury for the Garden State Preservation Trusts administrative costs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, administrative expenses for the various retirement systems and employee benefit programs administered by the Division of Pensions and Benefits or the Board of Trustees of the Police and Firemens Retirement System of New Jersey are appropriated from the pension and health benefits funds established by law to receive employer contributions or payments or to make benefit payments under the programs, as the case may be, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Administrative costs shall include bank service charges, investment services, and any other such costs as are related to the management of the pension and health benefit programs, as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. 2026 Office of Administrative Law DIRECT STATE SERVICES 45-2026 Adjudication of Administrative Appeals $8,546,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Office of Administrative Law $8,546,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($8,534,000) Materials and Supplies ($3,000) Services Other Than Personal ($1,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($8,000) The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is empowered to transfer or credit to the Office of Administrative Law any appropriation made to any department for administrative hearing costs which had been appropriated or allocated to such department for its share of such costs. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Office of Administrative Law, such amounts as may be received or receivable from any department or non-State fund source for administrative hearing costs or rule-making costs by the Office of Administrative Law and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year of such amounts are appropriated for the Office's administrative costs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amounts appropriated to the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, such appropriation is conditioned upon paying the non-State hourly rate charged by the Office of Administrative Law for hearing services, or an amount not less than $500,000. Receipts from annual license fees, payable to the Office of Administrative Law, and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year of such receipts, are appropriated for the Office's administrative costs. 2034 Office of Information Technology DIRECT STATE SERVICES 40-2034 Office of Information Technology $162,519,000 65-2034 Emergency Telecommunication Services $32,742,000 Subtotal Direct State Services Appropriation, Office of Information Technology $195,261,000 Less: OIT - Other Resources($63,000,000) Total Deductions ($63,000,000) Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Office of Information Technology $132,261,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($35,775,000) Materials and Supplies ($207,000) Services Other Than Personal ($39,895,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($31,000) Special Purpose: 40 Office of Information Technology ($63,000,000) 40 NJCFS Modernization ($10,200,000) 40 Office of Management and Budget Technology Modernization ($1,000,000) 65 Statewide 9-1-1 Emergency Telecommunication System ($21,822,000) 65 Office of Emergency Telecommunication Services ($920,000) 65 Public Safety Answering Point Upgrades and Consolidation ($10,000,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($12,411,000) Less: Total Deductions: $63,000,000 In addition to the amount hereinabove attributable to OIT - Other Resources, there are appropriated such amounts as may be received or receivable from any State agency, instrumentality or public authority for increases or changes in Office of Information Technology services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. As a condition to the appropriations made in this act, specifically with regard to the allocation of employees performing information technology infrastructure functions and the establishment of deputy chief technology officers and related staff as authorized in P.L.2007, c.56 (C.52:18A-219 et al.), the Office of Information Technology shall identify the specific Direct State Services appropriations and positions that should be transferred between various departments and the Office of Information Technology, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the NJCFS Modernization account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Statewide 9-1-1 Emergency Telecommunication System, there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be necessary for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Public Safety Answering Point Upgrades and Consolidation shall be used to provide grants to units of local governments for equipment upgrades and consolidation of Public Safety Answering Points, pursuant to a competitive process, by the Chief Technology Officer, and in accordance with grant criteria to be jointly developed by the Office of Emergency Telecommunication Services within the Office of Information Technology and the Department of the Treasury, subject to the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There are appropriated such amounts for Geographic Information System (GIS) Integration as may be received from federal, county, or municipal governments or agencies, and nonprofit organizations for orthoimagery and parcel data mapping. 75 State Subsidies and Financial Aid DIRECT STATE SERVICES 33-2077 Homestead Exemptions $2,000,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, State Subsidies and Financial Aid $2,000,000 Direct State Services: Special Purpose: 33 Stay NJ Task Force (P.L.2023, c.75) ($2,000,000) GRANTS-IN-AID 33-2077 Homestead Exemptions $2,687,972,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$2,687,972,000) Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, State Subsidies and Financial Aid $2,687,972,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$2,687,972,000) Grants-in-Aid: 33 ANCHOR Property Tax Relief Program (PTRF) ($2,279,872,000) 33 Senior and Disabled Citizens' Property Tax Freeze (PTRF) ($188,100,000) 33 Stay NJ Property Tax Credit Program (P.L.2023, c.75) (PTRF) ($220,000,000) In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for State Subsidies and Financial Aid, there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be required for payments of Middle Class Tax Rebate Program rebates that have been approved but not paid pursuant to the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year the qualified taxpayer, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2020, c.94, (C.54A:9-30), applied for such rebate, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the ANCHOR Property Tax Relief Program shall be available to provide property tax benefits to eligible homestead owners and tenants on their principal residences, whether owned or rented, pursuant to the provisions of section 3 of P.L.1990, c.61 (C.54:4-8.59) as amended by P.L.2004, c.40 and by P.L.2007, c.62, as may be amended from time to time except that, notwithstanding the provisions of such laws to the contrary: (i) homestead owner residents with (a) gross income in excess of $150,000 but not in excess of $250,000 for tax year 2021 are eligible for a benefit in the amount of property taxes paid, but not to exceed the amount of $1,000; (b) gross income not in excess of $150,000 for tax year 2021 are eligible for a benefit in the amount of property taxes paid, but not to exceed $1,500; homestead owner residents with gross income in excess of $250,000 for tax year 2021 are excluded from the program; (ii) residents whose homestead is a unit of residential rental property with (a) gross income in excess of $150,000 for tax year 2021 are excluded from the program; and (b) gross income not in excess of $150,000 for tax year 2021 are eligible for a benefit of $450; (iii) and provided further that residents who are eligible for a benefit pursuant to (i) and (ii) above and are 65 years of age or older at the close of tax year 2021 are eligible for an additional benefit of $250. These benefits listed pursuant to this paragraph will be based on the 2020 property tax amounts assessed or as would have been assessed on the October 1, 2021 principal residence of eligible applicants. The 2021 property tax benefit shall be paid as soon as possible, but not later than May as a rebate to all eligible homestead owners and residents whose homestead is a unit of residential rental property, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. If the amount hereinabove appropriated for the ANCHOR Property Tax Relief Program is not sufficient, there are appropriated from the Property Tax Relief Fund such additional amounts as may be required to provide such property tax benefits, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. From the amount hereinabove appropriated for the ANCHOR Property Tax Relief Program, there are appropriated such amounts as may be necessary for the administration of the program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. From the amount hereinabove appropriated for the ANCHOR Property Tax Relief Program, there are appropriated such amounts as may be required for payments of homestead benefits that have been approved but not paid pursuant to the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year the claimant applied for such homestead benefit, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. From the amount hereinabove appropriated for the ANCHOR Property Tax Relief Program, there are appropriated from the Property Tax Relief Fund such amounts as may be required for payments of property tax credits to homeowners and tenants pursuant to the "Property Tax Deduction Act," P.L.1996, c.60 (C.54A:3A-15 et seq.). Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1997, c.348 (C.54:4-8.67 et seq.), the amount hereinabove appropriated for Senior and Disabled Citizens' Property Tax Freeze, and any additional amounts which may be required for this purpose, is appropriated from the Property Tax Relief Fund. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Senior and Disabled Citizens' Property Tax Freeze, there are appropriated such amounts as may be necessary for the administration of the program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Stay NJ Property Tax Credit Program (P.L.2023, c.75) account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection e. of section 17 of P.L.2023, c.75 (C.54:4-8.75n), the amount hereinabove appropriated for Stay NJ Property Tax Credit Program (P.L.2023, c.75) is appropriated for the purpose of providing property tax benefits in accordance with subsection c. of section 16 of P.L.2023, c.75 (C. 54:4-8.75m). STATE AID 27-2085 Other Distributed Taxes $5,000,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$5,000,000) 28-2078 County Boards of Taxation $2,103,000 29-2078 Locally Provided Assistance $43,437,000 (From General Fund:$38,294,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$5,143,000) 34-2077 Senior and Disabled Citizens and Veterans Property Tax Deductions $38,600,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$38,600,000) 35-2078 Police and Firemens Retirement System $325,097,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$325,097,000) 42-2085 Energy Tax Receipts Property Tax Relief Aid $805,636,000 (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$805,636,000) Total State Aid Appropriation, State Subsidies and Financial Aid $1,219,873,000 (From General Fund:$40,397,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$1,179,476,000) State Aid: 27 Aid to Counties in Lieu of Insurance Premiums Tax Payments (PTRF) ($5,000,000) 28 County Boards of Taxation ($2,103,000) 29 South Jersey Port Corporation Senior Bonds Debt Service Reserve Fund ($16,258,000) 29 South Jersey Port Corporation Subordinated Bonds Debt Service Reserve Fund ($15,636,000) 29 Periodic Cancer Screening Examinations (P.L.2022, c.109) ($2,000,000) 29 South Jersey Port Corporation Property Tax Reserve Fund (PTRF) ($5,143,000) 29 Highlands Protection Fund - Planning Grants ($2,182,000) 29 Highlands Protection Fund - Watershed Moratorium Offset Aid ($2,218,000) 34 Senior and Disabled Citizens' Property Tax Deductions (PTRF) ($6,200,000) 34 Veterans' Property Tax Deductions (PTRF) ($32,400,000) 35 Debt Service on Pension Obligation Bonds (PTRF) ($26,512,000) 35 Police and Firemen's Retirement System - Post Retirement Medical (PTRF) ($57,275,000) 35 Police and Firemen's Retirement System (PTRF) ($141,116,000) 35 Police and Firemen's Retirement System (P.L.1979, c.109) (PTRF) ($100,194,000) 42 Energy Tax Receipts Property Tax Relief Aid (PTRF) ($805,636,000) There are appropriated such additional amounts as may be certified to the Governor by the South Jersey Port Corporation as necessary to meet the requirements of the South Jersey Port Corporation Debt Service Reserve Fund under section 14 of P.L.1968, c.60 (C.12:11A-14) and the South Jersey Port Corporation Property Tax Reserve Fund under section 20 of P.L.1968, c.60 (C.12:11A-20), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Periodic Cancer Screening Examinations (P.L.2022, c.109), there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be required to implement the provisions of the law, and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Highlands Protection Fund are payable from the receipts of the portion of the realty transfer fee directed to be credited to the Highlands Protection Fund and the unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Highlands Protection Fund accounts are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  Further, the Department of the Treasury may transfer funds as necessary between the Highlands Protection Fund - Planning Grants account within the Department of the Treasury and the Administration and Operations of the Highlands Council account within the Department of Environmental Protection, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Solid Waste Management - County Environmental Investment Aid is appropriated to subsidize county and county authority debt service payments for environmental investments incurred and other repayment obligations owed pursuant to the "Solid Waste Management Act," P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-1 et seq.) and the "Solid Waste Utility Control Act," P.L.1970, c.40 (C.48:13A-1 et seq.) as determined by the State Treasurer based upon the need for such financial assistance after taking into account all financial resources available or attainable to pay such debt service and such other repayment obligations. Such additional amounts as may be necessary shall be appropriated subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting and shall be provided upon such terms and conditions as the State Treasurer may determine.  The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year is appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Pursuant to section 85 of P.L.2015, c.19 (C.5:10A-85), receipts derived from the 3% Meadowlands regional hotel use assessment are appropriated for deposit into the intermunicipal account established pursuant to section 53 of P.L.2015, c.19 (C.5:10A-53), and shall be used to pay Meadowlands adjustment payments to municipalities in the Meadowlands district pursuant to the Hackensack Meadowlands Agency Consolidation Act, P.L.2015, c.19 (C.5:10A-1 et seq.), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Corporation Business Tax Act (1945)," P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.), the amount apportioned to the several counties of the State shall not be distributed and shall be anticipated as revenue for general State purposes. Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Corporation Business Tax Act (1945)," P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.), the amounts collected from banking corporations pursuant to the "Corporation Business Tax Act (1945)" shall not be distributed to the counties and municipalities and shall be anticipated as revenue for general State purposes. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-1 et seq.) or any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount payable to the several counties of the State shall not be distributed and shall be anticipated as revenue in the General Fund for general State purposes. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year from the taxes collected pursuant to P.L.1940, c.5 (C.54:30A-49 et seq.) shall lapse. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Senior and Disabled Citizens' Property Tax Deductions and Veterans' Property Tax Deductions, there are appropriated from the Property Tax Relief Fund such additional amounts as may be required for State reimbursement to municipalities for senior and disabled citizens' and veterans' property tax deductions, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Further, the Department of the Treasury, after notification to the Joint Budget Oversight Committee, may transfer funds as necessary between the Senior and Disabled Citizens' Property Tax Deductions account and the Veterans' Property Tax Deductions account, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Debt Service on Pension Obligation Bonds to make payments under the State Treasurer's contracts authorized pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1997, c.114 (C.34:1B-7.50), there are appropriated such additional amounts as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine are required to pay all amounts due from the State pursuant to such contracts. Such additional amounts as may be required for Police and Firemen's Retirement System - Post Retirement Medical are appropriated, as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Aid to Counties in Lieu of Insurance Premiums Tax Payments shall be paid to the same counties in the same amounts as would be provided in fiscal year 2025 pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-1 et seq.). If the amount hereinabove appropriated for Aid to Counties in Lieu of Insurance Premiums Tax Payments is not sufficient, there are appropriated from the Property Tax Relief Fund such additional amounts as may be required pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-1 et seq.), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1) of subsection c. of section 2 of P.L.1997, c.167 (C.52:27D-439) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Energy Tax Receipts Property Tax Relief Aid shall be distributed on the following schedule: on or before August 1, 45% of the total amount due; September 1, 30% of the total amount due; October 1, 15% of the total amount due; November 1, 5% of the total amount due; December 1 for municipalities operating under a calendar fiscal year, 5% of the total amount due; and June 1 for municipalities operating under the State fiscal year, 5% of the total amount due; provided, however, that notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Director of Local Government Services, in consultation with the Commissioner of Community Affairs and the State Treasurer, may direct the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting to provide such payments on an accelerated schedule if necessary to ensure fiscal stability for a municipality. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the release of the total annual amount due for the current fiscal year from Energy Tax Receipts Aid to municipalities is subject to the following condition: the municipality shall submit to the Director of the Division of Local Government Services a report describing the municipality's compliance with the "Best Practices Inventory" established by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services and shall receive at least a minimum score on such inventory as determined by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services; provided, however, that the director may take into account the particular circumstances of a municipality. In preparing the Best Practices Inventory, the director shall identify best municipal practices in the areas of general administration, fiscal management, and operational activities, as well as the particular circumstances of a municipality, in determining the minimum score acceptable for the release of the total annual amount due for the current fiscal year. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Energy Tax Receipts Property Tax Relief Aid and an amount not to exceed $649,285,000 from Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid is appropriated and shall be allocated to municipalities in accordance with the provisions of subsection b. of section 2 of P.L.1997, c.167 (C.52:27D-439), provided further, however, that from the amounts hereinabove appropriated, each municipality shall also receive such additional amounts as provided in the previous fiscal year from the Energy Tax Receipts Property Tax Relief Aid account.  Each municipality that receives an allocation from the amount so transferred from the Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid program shall have its allocation from the Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid program reduced by the same amount. The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall reduce amounts provided to any municipality from the amount hereinabove appropriated by the difference, if any, between pension contribution savings, and the amount of Consolidated Municipal Property Tax Relief Aid payable to such municipality. 76 Management and Administration DIRECT STATE SERVICES 99-2000 Administration and Support Services $51,144,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Management and Administration $51,144,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($14,286,000) Materials and Supplies ($80,000) Services Other Than Personal ($853,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($21,000) Special Purpose: 99 Federal Liaison Office, Washington, D.C. ($16,000) 99 Ombudsman for Individuals with Intellectual or Developmental Disabilities and their Families ($538,000) 99 Electric Vehicle Infrastructure ($25,000,000) 99 Grants Management Office ($1,015,000) 99 New Jersey Maternal and Infant Health Innovation Authority Fund (P.L.2023, c.109) ($3,220,000) 99 Governor's Council on Substance Use Disorder ($5,400,000) 99 Public Finance Activities ($700,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($15,000) There are appropriated such additional amounts as may be required to pay for the operating expenses of the Casino Revenue Fund Advisory Commission, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There are appropriated such additional amounts as may be required to pay for the reimbursement of funeral expenses pursuant to P.L.2013, c.177 (C.52:18A-218.1 et seq.), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Department of the Treasury, there are appropriated such additional amounts as are necessary to establish the Office of the Ombudsman for Individuals with Intellectual or Developmental Disabilities and their Families established pursuant to P.L.2017, c.269 (C.30:1AA-9.1 et seq.), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Electric Vehicle Infrastructure, there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be necessary for the purposes of providing State matching funds for federal grants related to the National Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Formula Program, and such amounts may be transferred to other departments and State agencies for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Electric Vehicle Infrastructure account is appropriated for expenditures related to the conversion of the fleet to electric vehicles, including charging infrastructure and electric vehicle related costs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the New Jersey Maternal and Infant Health Innovation Authority Fund (P.L.2023, c.109) is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There are appropriated from the investment earnings of general obligation bond proceeds such amounts as may be necessary for the payment of debt service administrative costs. There is appropriated from revenue estimated to be received as a fee in connection with the issuance of debt an amount not to exceed $700,000 to provide funds for public finance activities. There are appropriated from revenue to be received from investment earnings of State funds, from fees in connection with the cost of debt issuance and from service fees billed to State authorities, such amounts as may be required for public finance activities. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year from such investment earnings and service fees is appropriated to the Office of Public Finance. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1999, c.12 (C.54A:9-25.12 et seq.) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, monies received in the Drug Abuse Education Fund and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year of such deposits are appropriated for collection or administration costs of the Department of the Treasury, for transfer to various departments and agencies that provide substance use disorder treatment and prevention programs to offset the costs of such programs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There are appropriated from the Cannabis Regulatory, Enforcement Assistance, and Marketplace Modernization Fund such amounts to fund the Cannabis Regulatory Commission as determined by the Commission for costs required to implement the New Jersey Cannabis Regulatory, Enforcement Assistance, and Marketplace Modernization Act, P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.) subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, any funds received by the New Jersey Infrastructure Bank from any State agency to offset the trusts annual operating expenses are appropriated for the same purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:35-15 and section 5 of P.L.1993, c.216 (C.54:43-1.3), or any law or regulation to the contrary, all monies received in the Drug Enforcement and Demand Reduction Fund and any amounts credited to the Governors Council on Substance Use Disorder collected pursuant to the Alcoholic Beverage Tax Law, R.S.54:41-1 et seq., shall be deposited into the General Fund as State revenue, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 99-2000 Administration and Support Services $7,195,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Management and Administration $7,195,000 Grants-in-Aid: 99 National Center for Civic Innovation, Inc. ($5,945,000) 99 Old Barracks Museum ($1,250,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated to the National Center for Civic Innovation, Inc. ("NCCI") is subject to the following conditions: the appropriated moneys shall be used by NCCI to pay for administrative expenses, including, but not limited to, staff, office, supplies, travel, consultants and technology, and NCCI, in consultation with the State's Chief Innovation Office, shall provide advisory and implementation services to State departments and agencies in the area of modernizing, improving, facilitating, and streamlining government services to individuals and businesses. The State Treasurer shall enter into an agreement with NCCI to implement this provision. 80 Special Government Services 82 Protection of Citizens Rights DIRECT STATE SERVICES 06-2024 Appellate Services to Indigents $10,122,000 57-2021 Trial Services to Indigents $80,183,000 58-2022 Mental Health Advocacy $8,055,000 66-2021 Office of Law Guardian $27,395,000 67-2021 Office of Parental Representation $21,683,000 99-2025 Administration and Support Services $4,639,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Protection of Citizens Rights $152,077,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($114,875,000) Materials and Supplies ($1,220,000) Services Other Than Personal ($29,780,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($1,742,000) Special Purpose: 57 Parole Revocation Defense Unit ($1,225,000) 57 Holistic Defense Pilot ($750,000) 99 Expungement Unit Operations ($1,000,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($1,485,000) Amounts provided for legal and investigative services are available for payment of obligations applicable to prior fiscal years. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the operation of the Office of the Public Defender there are appropriated additional amounts as may be required for Trial and Appellate services to indigents, the expenditure of which shall be subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Lawsuit settlements and legal costs awarded by any court to the Office of the Public Defender are appropriated for the expenses associated with the representation of indigent clients. The amount hereinabove appropriated to the Office of the Public Defender is available for expenses associated with pool attorneys hired by the Office of the Public Defender for the representation of indigent clients. 2048 State Legal Services Office GRANTS-IN-AID 89-2048 Civil Legal Services for the Poor $38,014,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, State Legal Services Office $38,014,000 Grants-in-Aid: 89 Legal Services of New Jersey - Legal Assistance in Civil Matters ($38,014,000) 2096 Corrections Ombudsperson DIRECT STATE SERVICES 51-2096 Corrections Ombudsperson $2,806,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Corrections Ombudsperson $2,806,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($2,665,000) Materials and Supplies ($63,000) Services Other Than Personal ($63,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($15,000) 2097 Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman DIRECT STATE SERVICES 81-2097 State Long-Term Care Ombudsman $4,402,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman $4,402,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($3,799,000) Materials and Supplies ($32,000) Services Other Than Personal ($521,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($50,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, receipts collected from fines and penalties pursuant to subsection f. of section 2 of P.L.1983, c.43 (C.52:27G-7.1) and subsection b. of section 14 of P.L.1977, c.239 (C.52:27G-14) are appropriated to the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 2098 Division of Rate Counsel DIRECT STATE SERVICES 53-2098 Rate Counsel $7,020,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Division of Rate Counsel $7,020,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($3,043,000) Materials and Supplies ($48,000) Services Other Than Personal ($3,425,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($500,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($4,000) Receipts of the Division of Rate Counsel in excess of those anticipated are appropriated for the Division of Rate Counsel to defray the costs of the Division of Rate Counsel function. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Division of Rate Counsel accounts are appropriated for the same purpose. Department of the Treasury, Total State Appropriation $5,287,521,000 Summary of Department of the Treasury Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services .......................................... $683,644,000 Grants-in-Aid ..................................................... $3,117,409,000 State Aid ............................................................. $1,486,468,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund ...................................................... $1,144,733,000 Property Tax Relief Fund ................................... $4,134,043,000 Casino Control Fund ....................................... $8,745,000 90  MISCELLANEOUS COMMISSIONS 40 Community Development and Environmental Management 43 Science and Technical Programs 9130 Interstate Environmental Commission DIRECT STATE SERVICES 03-9130 Interstate Environmental Commission $15,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Interstate Environmental Commission $15,000 Direct State Services: Special Purpose: 03 Expenses of the Commission ($15,000) 9140 Delaware River Basin Commission DIRECT STATE SERVICES 02-9140 Delaware River Basin Commission $893,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Delaware River Basin Commission $893,000 Direct State Services: Special Purpose: 02 Expenses of the Commission ($893,000) 70  Government Direction, Management, and Control 72  Government Review and Oversight 9148  Council on Local Mandates DIRECT STATE SERVICES 92-9148 Council on Local Mandates $81,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Council on Local Mandates $81,000 Direct State Services: Special Purpose: 92 Council on Local Mandates ($81,000) The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in this account is appropriated. Miscellaneous Commissions, Total State Appropriation $989,000 Summary of Miscellaneous Commissions Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services .......................................... $989,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund .................................................... $989,000 94 INTERDEPARTMENTAL ACCOUNTS 70  Government Direction, Management, and Control 74  General Government Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 01-9400 Property Rentals $322,270,000 02-9400 Insurance and Other Services $236,655,000 06-9400 Utilities and Other Services $68,076,000 Subtotal Direct State Services Appropriation, General Government Services $627,001,000 Less: Direct Rent Charges and Charges for Operational Efficiencies($109,962,000) Total Deductions ($109,962,000) Total Direct State Services Appropriation, General Government Services $517,039,000 Direct State Services: Property Rentals: 01 Existing and Anticipated Leases ($235,277,000) 01 Economic Development Authority ($48,414,000) 01 Other Debt Service Leases and Tax Payments ($36,579,000) 01 State Leasing and Space Utilization Committee Lease Expirations ($2,000,000) Insurance and Other Services: 02 Tort Claims Liability Fund (C.59:12-1) ($56,000,000) 02 Workers' Compensation Self-Insurance Fund ($125,000,000) 02 Property Insurance Premium Payments ($6,405,000) 02 Casualty Insurance Premium Payments ($896,000) 02 Special Insurance Policy Premium Payment ($1,429,000) 02 Medical Malpractice Self-Insurance Fund for Rutgers, Rowan, and University Hospital ($38,800,000) 02 Vehicle Claims Liability Fund ($6,500,000) 02 Self-Insurance Deductible Fund ($1,500,000) 02 Self-Insurance Fund - Foster Parents ($125,000) Utilities and Other Services: 06 Utilities and Other Services ($51,500,000) 06 Public Health, Environmental and Agricultural Laboratory ($6,188,000) 06 Household and Security ($10,388,000) Less: Total Deductions: $109,962,000 The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is empowered to allocate to any State agency occupying space in any State-owned building equitable charges for the rental of such space to include, but not be limited to, the costs of operation and maintenance thereof, and the amounts so charged shall be credited to the General Fund; and, to the extent that such charges exceed the amounts appropriated for such purposes to any agency financed from any fund other than the General Fund, the required additional appropriation shall be made out of such other fund. Receipts from direct charges and charges to non-State fund sources are appropriated for the rental of property, including the costs of operation and maintenance of such properties. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, and except for leases negotiated by the Division of Property Management and Construction and subject to the approval or disapproval by the State Leasing and Space Utilization Committee pursuant to P.L.1992, c.130 (C.52:18A-191.1 et al.), and except as hereinafter provided, no lease for the rental of any office or building, except for legislative district offices, shall be executed without the prior written consent of the State Treasurer and the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  Legislative district office leases may be executed by personnel in the Office of Legislative Services so directed by the Executive Director, provided the lease complies with the Joint Rules Governing Legislative District Offices adopted by the presiding officers.  Leases which do not comply with the Joint Rules Governing Legislative District Offices may be executed by personnel in the Office of Legislative Services, District Office Services so directed by the Executive Director with the prior written consent of the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the General Assembly. To the extent that amounts appropriated for property rental payments are insufficient, there are appropriated such additional amounts, not to exceed $3,000,000 as may be required to pay property rental obligations, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. An amount not to exceed $2,500,000 shall be appropriated for the costs of security, maintenance, utilities and other operating expenses related to the closure of State-owned buildings, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from the leasing of State surplus real property are appropriated for the maintenance of State surplus real property, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Division of Property Management and Construction is empowered to renegotiate lease terms, provided that such renegotiations result in cost savings to the State for the current fiscal year and for the term of the lease.  Any lease amendments made as a result of these renegotiations are subject to the review and approval of the State Leasing and Space Utilization Committee. Receipts from such renegotiations are appropriated to the Property Rentals account to offset the cost of leases, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There are appropriated such additional amounts as may be required to pay for office renovations associated with the consolidation of office space, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There are appropriated such additional amounts as may be required to pay debt service costs for the Greystone Park Psychiatric Hospital Project, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 105 of P.L.2003, c.13 (C.39:2A-36) or any law or regulation to the contrary, $10,940,000 is appropriated from the revenues appropriated to the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission for transfer to the Interdepartmental property rentals account to reflect savings from implementation of management and procurement efficiencies, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated are available for payment of obligations applicable to prior fiscal years. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Master Lease Program Fund is appropriated for the same purpose. In order to permit flexibility, amounts may be transferred between various items of appropriation within the Insurance and Other Services program classification, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  Notice thereof shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. There are appropriated such additional amounts as may be required to pay tort claims under N.J.S.59:12-1, as recommended by the Attorney General and as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. The amount appropriated to the Tort Claims Liability Fund is available for the payment of claims of a tortious nature, for the indemnification of pool attorneys engaged by the Public Defender for the defense of indigents, for the indemnification of designated pathologists engaged by the State Medical Examiner, for direct costs of legal, administrative and medical services related to the investigation, mitigation and litigation of tort claims under N.J.S.59:12-1, for the refunding of fees, court costs and restitution paid by persons charged with, adjudicated delinquent, or convicted of various crimes or offenses whose charges or convictions are later dismissed for various reasons, including on the basis of evidence found to not have been appropriately collected, tested or analyzed and for the direct costs of administering such refunds, all as recommended by the Attorney General and as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, claims paid from the Tort Claims Liability Fund on behalf of entities funded, in whole or in part, from non-State funds, may be reimbursed from such non-State fund sources as determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. To the extent that amounts appropriated to pay Workers' Compensation claims under R.S.34:15-1 et seq., are insufficient, there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be required to pay Workers' Compensation claims, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Workers' Compensation Self-Insurance Fund under R.S.34:15-1 et seq. is available for the payment of direct costs of legal, investigative, administrative and medical services related to the investigation, mitigation, litigation and administration of claims against the fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, benefits provided to community work experience participants shall be borne by the Work First New Jersey program funded through the Department of Human Services and any costs related to administration, mitigation, litigation and investigation of claims will be reimbursed to the Division of Risk Management within the Department of the Treasury by the Work First New Jersey program funded through the Department of Human Services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Provided that expenditures during the current fiscal year on Workers' Compensation claims attributable to the Departments of Human Services, Transportation, Corrections, and Law and Public Safety are less than the respective amounts expended by those departments for claims attributable to the preceding fiscal year, all or a portion of that savings is appropriated to those departments or the Division of Risk Management within the Department of the Treasury for the purpose of improving worker safety and reducing workers' compensation costs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. To the extent that amounts appropriated to pay auto insurance claims are insufficient, there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be required to pay auto insurance claims, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Vehicle Claims Liability Fund is available for the payment of direct costs of legal, investigative and medical services related to the investigation, mitigation and litigation of claims against the fund. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Self-Insurance Deductible Fund is appropriated for the same purposes. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Self-Insurance Fund - Foster Parents is available for the payment of direct costs of legal, investigative and medical services related to the investigation, mitigation and litigation of claims against the fund. There are appropriated from revenues received from utility companies such amounts as may be required for implementation and administration of the Energy Conservation Initiatives Program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for fuel and utility costs, amounts may be transferred to or from State departments to meet fuel and utility needs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting; and, in addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for fuel and utility costs and for the Public Health, Environmental and Agricultural Laboratory fuel and utility costs, there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be required to pay fuel and utility costs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from fees charged for public parking at the Bangs Avenue Parking Garage in Asbury Park, and the unexpended balance from the preceding fiscal year, are appropriated for the costs incurred for maintenance and operation of the garage, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Household and Security account, there is appropriated to the Household and Security account $2,500,000 from the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission for utility, security and building maintenance costs. In accordance with the "Recycling Enhancement Act," P.L.2007, c.311 (C.13:1E-96.2 et al.), an amount not to exceed $358,000 is appropriated from the State Recycling Fund - Recycling Administration account to the Department of the Treasury for administrative costs attributable to the State recycling program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Utilities and Other Services, of the unexpended balances in the Petroleum Overcharge Reimbursement Fund, there is appropriated such amounts as are required to fund the energy tracking and invoice payment system, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 09-9460 Aid to Independent Authorities $166,994,000 (From General Fund:$152,717,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$14,277,000) Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, General Government Services $166,994,000 (From General Fund:$152,717,000) (From Property Tax Relief Fund:$14,277,000) Grants-in-Aid: 09 New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority - Debt Service ($32,727,000) 09 Liberty Science Center ($12,126,000) 09 Municipal Rehabilitation and Economic Recovery, EDA (PTRF) ($14,277,000) 09 Biomedical Research Bonds, EDA ($3,481,000) 09 New Jersey Performing Arts Center - Operating Aid ($2,000,000) 09 EDA State Lease Revenue Bonds (Wind Port Project) ($23,833,000) 09 New Jersey Building Authority - Operating Aid ($1,500,000) 09 New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority - Operations ($39,000,000) 09 New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority - International Events, Improvements and Attraction ($30,000,000) 09 New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority - Meadowlands Research and Restoration Institute ($50,000) 09 Meadowlands and Monmouth Park Pension Aid ($7,000,000) 09 New Jersey Performing Arts Center - Capital Improvements ($1,000,000) In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority, there are appropriated such additional amounts as are necessary to satisfy debt service obligations and to maintain the core operating functions of the Authority, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Liberty Science Center is allocated for debt service obligations and for the operations of the Liberty Science Center, the amount of such operational support to be determined by the State Treasurer on such terms and conditions as the State Treasurer requires pursuant to an agreement between the State Treasurer and the Liberty Science Center, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition, there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be necessary to satisfy debt service obligations subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Furthermore, there are also appropriated such additional amounts for support of the operations of the center, as determined by the State Treasurer on such terms and conditions as the State Treasurer requires pursuant to an agreement between the State Treasurer and the Liberty Science Center, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the New Jersey Economic Development Authority (EDA) State Lease Revenue Bonds (Wind Port Project), there are appropriated such additional amounts as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine are required to pay all basic rent, ground lease rent and additional rent payable by the State to the EDA pursuant to the lease between the EDA and the State relating to the Wind Port Project, as applicable. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the EDA State Lease Revenue Bonds (Wind Port Project) account is appropriated to pay all basic rent, ground lease rent and additional rent payable by the State to EDA relating to the lease between the EDA and the State relating to the Wind Port Project. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S.46:30B-74 and R.S.46:30B-75, or any other rule, regulation, or guideline to the contrary, and in addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority, there is appropriated from the Unclaimed Personal Property Trust Fund such amount as shall be determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting to be available and necessary for Sports Complex property demolition, clean-up, and roadway improvement costs associated with the Grandstand demolition project. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for debt service payments attributable to the Municipal Rehabilitation and Economic Recovery, EDA program may be paid by the New Jersey Economic Development Authority from resources available from unexpended balances, and in such instances the amounts appropriated for the Municipal Rehabilitation and Economic Recovery, EDA program shall be reduced by the same amount. There are appropriated such additional amounts as may be necessary to pay debt service and other costs for the Municipal Rehabilitation and Economic Recovery, EDA program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION 08-9450 Capital Projects - Statewide $143,029,000 Total Capital Construction Appropriation, General Government Services $143,029,000 Capital Projects: Statewide Capital Projects: 08 Capital Improvements, Contingency ($9,000,000) 08 Life Safety, Emergency and IT Projects - Statewide ($31,000,000) 08 Capital Security Projects ($5,000,000) Open Space Preservation Program: 08 Garden State Preservation Trust Fund Account ($98,029,000) In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2004, c.71, donations for the 9/11 Memorial Design Costs from public and private sources, including those collected from the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey, for the purposes of planning, designing, maintaining and constructing a memorial to the victims of the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, on the World Trade Center in New York City, the Pentagon in Washington, D.C., and United Airlines Flight 93 in Somerset County, Pennsylvania, shall be deposited by the State Treasurer into a dedicated account established for this purpose and are appropriated for the purposes set forth under P.L.2004, c.71 and there are appropriated or transferred such amounts as are necessary for the 9/11 Memorial project, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in order to provide flexibility in administering the amounts provided for Statewide Fire, Life Safety and Renovations Projects; Capital Improvements, Statewide; Life Safety, Emergency and IT Projects - Statewide; Capital Security Projects; Roof Repairs - Statewide; Americans with Disabilities Act Compliance Projects - Statewide; Fuel Distribution Systems/Underground Storage Tank Replacements - Statewide; Hazardous Materials Removal Projects-Statewide; Statewide Security Projects; and Energy Efficiency Projects; such amounts as may be necessary may be transferred to individual project line items within various departments, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, any monies received from the sale of real property that are deposited into the State-owned Real Property Fund pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2007, c.108 (C.52:31-1.3b) are appropriated for Capital Projects that increase energy efficiency, improve work place safety or for information technology systems or other capital investments that will generate an operating budget savings, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, an amount not to exceed $5,000,000, from monies received from the sale of real property that are deposited into the State-owned Real Property Fund pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2007, c.108 (C.52:31-1.3b) are appropriated for Statewide Roofing Repairs and Replacements. Of the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Hazardous Materials Removal Projects - Statewide and Statewide Security Projects, funds may be transferred to the Fuel Distribution Systems/Underground Storage Tank Replacements - Statewide account for the removal of underground storage tanks at State facilities, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Revenue generated from the sale of Solar Renewable Energy Certificates and Emission Reduction Credits is appropriated to fund energy-related savings initiatives as determined by the State Treasurer, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Garden State Preservation Trust Fund Account is subject to the provisions of  the "Garden State Preservation Trust Act," P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.) and the constitutional amendment on open space (Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 7). In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Garden State Preservation Trust Fund Account, interest earned and accumulated commencing with the start of this fiscal year is appropriated. 9410 Employee Benefits DIRECT STATE SERVICES 03-9410 Employee Benefits $4,697,712,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Employee Benefits $4,697,712,000 Direct State Services: Special Purpose: 03 Public Employees' Retirement System ($1,518,499,000) 03 Public Employees' Retirement System - Post Retirement Medical ($435,379,000) 03 Public Employees' Retirement System - Non-contributory Insurance ($36,333,000) 03 Police and Firemen's Retirement System ($362,795,000) 03 Police and Firemen's Retirement System - Non-contributory Insurance ($11,448,000) 03 Police and Firemen's Retirement System (P.L.1979, c.109) ($5,882,000) 03 Alternate Benefit Program - Employer Contributions ($1,402,000) 03 Alternate Benefit Program - Non-contributory Insurance ($230,000) 03 Defined Contribution Retirement Program ($1,672,000) 03 Defined Contribution Retirement Program - Non-contributory Insurance ($599,000) 03 State Police Retirement System ($228,266,000) 03 State Police Retirement System - Non-contributory Insurance ($2,854,000) 03 Judicial Retirement System ($70,342,000) 03 Judicial Retirement System - Non-contributory Insurance ($1,189,000) 03 Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund ($5,209,000) 03 Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund - Post Retirement Medical - State ($2,909,000) 03 Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund - Non-contributory Insurance ($43,000) 03 Veterans Act Pensions ($33,000) 03 Debt Service on Pension Obligation Bonds ($199,887,000) 03 Volunteer Emergency Survivor Benefit ($267,000) 03 State Employees' Health Benefits ($865,220,000) 03 Other Pension Systems - Post Retirement Medical ($206,682,000) 03 State Employees' Prescription Drug Program ($283,912,000) 03 State Employees' Dental Program - Shared Cost ($21,745,000) 03 State Employees' Vision Care Program ($302,000) 03 Social Security Tax - State ($418,150,000) 03 Temporary Disability Insurance Liability ($14,010,000) 03 Unemployment Insurance Liability ($2,453,000) Such additional amounts as may be required for Public Employees' Retirement System - Post Retirement Medical, Public Employees' Retirement System - Non-contributory Insurance, Police and Firemen's Retirement System - Non-contributory Insurance, Alternate Benefit Program - Employer Contributions, Alternate Benefit Program - Non-contributory Insurance, Defined Contribution Retirement Program, Defined Contribution Retirement Program - Non-contributory Insurance, Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund - Post Retirement Medical - State, Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund - Non-contributory Insurance, State Police Retirement System - Non-contributory Insurance, Judicial Retirement System - Non-contributory Insurance, Volunteer Emergency Survivor Benefit, State Employees' Health Benefits, Other Pension Systems - Post Retirement Medical, State Employees' Prescription Drug Program, State Employees' Dental Program - Shared Cost, State Employees' Vision Care Program, Affordable Care Act Fees, Social Security Tax - State, Temporary Disability Insurance Liability, and Unemployment Insurance Liability are appropriated, as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. No amounts hereinabove appropriated shall be used to provide additional health insurance coverage to a State or local elected official when that official receives health insurance coverage as a result of holding other public office or employment. Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Pension Adjustment Act," P.L.1958, c.143 (C.43:3B-1 et seq.), pension adjustment benefits for State members and beneficiaries of the Consolidated Police and Firemen's Pension Fund, Prison Officers' Pension Fund, and Central Pension Fund shall be paid by the respective pension funds. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Pension Adjustment Program for these benefits as required under the act shall be paid to the Pension Adjustment Fund. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Debt Service on Pension Obligation Bonds to make payments under the State Treasurer's contracts authorized pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1997, c.114 (C.34:1B-7.50), there are appropriated such additional amounts as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine are required to pay all amounts due from the State pursuant to such contracts. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Debt Service on Pension Obligation Bonds account is appropriated for the same purpose. Such additional amounts as may be required for State Employees' Health Benefits may be transferred from the various departmental operating appropriations to this account, as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. Such additional amounts as may be required for Social Security Tax - State may be transferred from the various departmental operating appropriations to this account, as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Social Security Tax - State there are appropriated such amounts as may be necessary for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, fees due to the third party administrator for the Section 125 Tax Savings Program established in 1996 pursuant to section 7 of P.L.1996, c.8 (C.52:14-15.1a) and the Section 132(f) Commuter Transportation Benefit Program established in 2003 pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2001, c.162 (C.52:14-15.1b) shall be paid from amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Social Security Tax - State account, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, fees due to the third party administrator for the Unemployment Compensation Management and Cost Control Program, which was established pursuant to N.J.A.C.17:1-9.6, shall be paid from amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Unemployment Insurance Liability account, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 03-9410 Employee Benefits $1,478,235,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Employee Benefits $1,478,235,000 Grants-in-Aid: 03 Public Employees' Retirement System ($193,457,000) 03 Public Employees' Retirement System - Post Retirement Medical ($68,383,000) 03 Public Employees' Retirement System - Non-contributory Insurance ($7,399,000) 03 Police and Firemen's Retirement System ($27,286,000) 03 Police and Firemen's Retirement System - Non-contributory Insurance ($534,000) 03 Alternate Benefit Program - Employer Contributions ($194,581,000) 03 Alternate Benefit Program - Non-contributory Insurance ($28,611,000) 03 Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund ($991,000) 03 Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund - Post Retirement Medical-State ($3,075,000) 03 Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund - Non-contributory Insurance ($6,000) 03 Debt Service on Pension Obligation Bonds ($11,532,000) 03 State Employees' Health Benefits ($500,730,000) 03 Other Pension Systems - Post Retirement Medical ($54,646,000) 03 State Employees' Prescription Drug Program ($142,908,000) 03 State Employees' Dental Program - Shared Cost ($15,482,000) 03 Social Security Tax - State ($216,637,000) 03 Temporary Disability Insurance Liability ($9,787,000) 03 Unemployment Insurance Liability ($2,190,000) Such additional amounts as may be required for Public Employees' Retirement System - Post Retirement Medical, Public Employees' Retirement System - Non-contributory Insurance, Police and Firemen's Retirement System - Non-contributory Insurance, Alternate Benefit Program - Employer Contributions,  Alternate Benefit Program - Non-contributory Insurance, Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund - Post Retirement Medical - State, Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund - Non-contributory Insurance, State Employees' Health Benefits, Other Pension Systems - Post Retirement Medical, State Employees' Prescription Drug Program, State Employees' Dental Program - Shared Cost, Affordable Care Act Fees, Social Security Tax - State, Temporary Disability Insurance Liability, and Unemployment Insurance Liability are appropriated, as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. No amounts hereinabove appropriated shall be used to provide additional health insurance coverage to a State or local elected official when that official receives health insurance coverage as a result of holding other public office or employment. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Debt Service on Pension Obligation Bonds account is appropriated for the same purpose. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Debt Service on Pension Obligation Bonds to make payments under the State Treasurer's contracts authorized pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1997, c.114 (C.34:1B-7.50), there are appropriated such additional amounts as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine are required to pay all amounts due from the State pursuant to such contracts. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, fees due to the third party administrator for the Section 125 Tax Savings Program established in 1996 pursuant to section 7 of P.L.1996, c.8 (C.52:14-15.1a) and the Section 132(f) Commuter Transportation Benefit Program established in 2003 pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2001, c.162 (C.52:14-15.1b) shall be paid from amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Social Security Tax - State account, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, fees due to the third party administrator for the Unemployment Compensation Management and Cost Control Program, which was established pursuant to N.J.A.C.17:1-9.6, shall be paid from amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Unemployment Insurance Liability account, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 9420  Other Interdepartmental Accounts DIRECT STATE SERVICES 04-9420 Other Interdepartmental Accounts $26,025,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Other Interdepartmental Accounts $26,025,000 Direct State Services: Special Purpose: 04 Governor's Contingency Fund ($375,000) 04 Permit Modernization ($4,000,000) 04 Contingency Funds ($625,000) 04 Banking Services ($3,100,000) 04 Debt Issuance - Special Purpose ($1,100,000) 04 Catastrophic Illness in Children Relief Fund - Employer Contributions ($225,000) 04 Interest on Interfund Borrowing ($100,000) 04 Employee Mileage Reimbursement ($1,500,000) 04 Replacement Vehicles ($15,000,000) Unless otherwise indicated, funds hereinabove appropriated may be allotted by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting to the various departments and agencies. Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.2A:153-1 et seq., there is allocated at the discretion of the Governor, an amount up to $50,000, from the Special Purpose amount hereinabove appropriated to meet any condition of emergency or necessity, as a reward for the capture and return of Joanne Chesimard. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Governor's Contingency Fund is appropriated for the same purpose. The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Governor's Contingency Fund is appropriated for allotment to the various departments or agencies, to meet any condition of emergency or necessity. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Permit Modernization shall be used for the purpose of improving the efficiency and effectiveness of State permitting processes, including, but not limited to, engaging expert consulting services to review and recommend improvements to processes across the various departments, including, but not limited, to the Department of Environmental Protection, the Department of Transportation, and the Department of Community Affairs. Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for Permit Modernization, such amounts as are necessary may be transferred to or from State departments, and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year is appropriated for the same purpose, provided further that such additional amounts as may be necessary for Permit Modernization efforts are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. There are appropriated to the Emergency Services Fund such amounts as are required to meet the costs of any emergency occasioned by aggression, civil disturbance, sabotage, or disaster as recommended by the Governor's Advisory Council for Emergency Services and approved by the Governor, and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In the event that the Governor's Advisory Council for Emergency Services is unable to convene due to any such emergency described above, there shall be appropriated to the Emergency Services Fund such amounts as are required to meet the costs of any such emergency described above, and payments from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer upon approval of the Governor and the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Such amounts as may be necessary for payment of expenses incurred by issuing officials appointed under the several bond acts of the State are appropriated for the purposes and from the sources defined in those acts. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Employee Mileage Reimbursement may be provided to the various State departments and agencies for the cost of reimbursing employees traveling by personal automobile on official business as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Language Access Funding for State Agencies account is appropriated for the same purpose. The amount hereinabove appropriated for Replacement Vehicles may be transferred to State departments for the purchase of replacement vehicles, including upfit costs, by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. GRANTS-IN-AID 04-9420 Other Interdepartmental Accounts $25,000,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Other Interdepartmental Accounts $25,000,000 Grants-in-Aid: 04 Health Care Affordability and Accessibility Fund ($25,000,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts received by the State pursuant to P.L.2020, c.145 (C.17:48E-46.1 et al.), are appropriated and are subject to the following conditions: funds shall be used solely for the purpose of enhancing the availability of affordable and accessible health insurance and the provision of health care to underserved individuals and communities statewide, as well as promoting the integration of the overall health care delivery system in the State to meet the needs of New Jersey residents. The determination of specific eligible programs, projects, and uses to be funded by this appropriation shall be made by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, in consultation with appropriate State departments and agencies, including, but not limited to, the Department of Health, the Department of Human Services, and the Department of Banking and Insurance. Funding recommendations shall be subject to the approval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee, provided, however, if the Joint Budget Oversight Committee has not met to consider funding recommendations within 45 days of the submission of the funding recommendations to the Committee, the funding recommendations shall be deemed approved. 9430 Salary Increases and Other Benefits DIRECT STATE SERVICES 05-9430 Salary Increases and Other Benefits $199,327,000 Subtotal Direct State Services Appropriation, Salary Increases and Other Benefits $199,327,000 Less: Salaries and Wages Reconciliation($2,500,000) Total Deductions ($2,500,000) Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Salary Increases and Other Benefits $196,827,000 Direct State Services: Special Purpose: 05 Executive Branch ($155,500,000) 05 Judicial Branch ($32,827,000) 05 Unused Accumulated Sick Leave Payments ($11,000,000) Less: Total Deductions: $2,500,000 The amounts hereinabove appropriated to the various State departments, agencies or commissions for the cost of salaries, wages, or other benefits shall be allotted as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S.34:15-49 and section 1 of P.L.1981, c.353 (C.34:15-49.1) or any law or regulation to the contrary, the State Treasurer, the Chairperson of the Civil Service Commission, and the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall establish directives governing salary ranges and rates of pay, including salary increases. The implementation of such directives shall be made effective at the first full pay period of the fiscal year as determined by such directives, with timely notification of such directives to the Joint Budget Oversight Committee or its successor. Such directives shall not be considered an "administrative rule" or "rule" within the meaning of section 2 of P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-2), but shall be considered exempt under paragraphs (1) and (2) of the definition of "administrative rule" or "rule" of section 2 of P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-2), and shall not be subject to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). Nothing herein shall be construed as applicable to the Presidents of the State Colleges, Rutgers, The State University and the New Jersey Institute of Technology. No salary range or rate of pay shall be increased or paid in any State department, agency, or commission without the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Nothing herein shall be construed as applicable to unclassified personnel of the Legislative Branch or unclassified personnel of the Judicial Branch. Any amounts appropriated for Salary Increases and Other Benefits shall be made available for any person holding State office, position or employment whose compensation is paid directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, from State funds, including any person holding office, position or employment under the Palisades Interstate Park Commission. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Salary Increases and Other Benefits accounts are appropriated for the same purposes. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Executive Branch there are appropriated such amounts as may be necessary for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for Unused Accumulated Sick Leave Payments, there are appropriated such amounts as may be necessary for payments of unused accumulated sick leave. Interdepartmental Accounts, Total State Appropriation $7,250,861,000 Summary of Interdepartmental Accounts Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services .......................................... $5,437,603,000 Grants-in-Aid ..................................................... $1,670,229,000 Capital Construction .......................................... $143,029,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund ...................................................... $7,236,584,000 Property Tax Relief Fund ................................... $14,277,000 98 THE JUDICIARY 10  Public Safety and Criminal Justice 15  Judicial Services DIRECT STATE SERVICES 01-9710 Supreme Court $7,212,000 02-9715 Superior Court-Appellate Division $23,012,000 03-9720 Civil Courts $114,458,000 04-9725 Criminal Courts $189,611,000 05-9730 Family Courts $123,950,000 06-9735 Municipal Courts $1,596,000 07-9740 Probation Services $138,287,000 08-9745 Court Reporting $8,888,000 09-9750 Public Affairs and Education $2,946,000 10-9755 Information Services $18,058,000 11-9760 Trial Court Services $256,147,000 12-9765 Management and Administration $11,322,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Judicial Services $895,487,000 Direct State Services: Personal Services: Chief Justice ($241,000) Associate Justices ($1,386,000) Judges ($97,010,000) Salaries and Wages ($588,655,000) Materials and Supplies ($7,755,000) Services Other Than Personal ($32,318,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($1,852,000) Special Purpose: 01 Rules Development ($200,000) 03 Landlord Tenant Caseload Management ($500,000) 04 Recovery Court Treatment/Aftercare ($33,858,000) 04 Recovery Court Operations ($27,360,000) 04 Recovery Court Judgeships ($2,662,000) 04 Statewide Pretrial Services Program ($24,228,000) 05 Family Crisis Intervention ($1,076,000) 05 Child Placement Review Advisory Council ($82,000) 05 Kinship Legal Guardianship ($3,925,000) 05 Child Support and Paternity Program Title IV-D (Family Court) ($15,112,000) 07 Intensive Supervision Program ($16,307,000) 07 Juvenile Intensive Supervision Program ($2,348,000) 07 Child Support and Paternity Program Title IV-D (Probation) ($29,393,000) 11 Child Support and Paternity Program Title IV-D (Trial) ($2,561,000) 12 Affirmative Action and Equal Employment Opportunity ($797,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($5,861,000) The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Civil Arbitration Program and Recovery Court program accounts are appropriated subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, receipts from fees under the Special Civil Part service of process via certified mailers are appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The amounts hereinabove appropriated in the Recovery Court Treatment/Aftercare account shall be transferred to the Department of Human Services to fund treatment, aftercare and administrative services associated with the Recovery Court program, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Statewide Pretrial Services Program account are appropriated to the Judiciary, subject to the approval of the Director of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from the increase in fees collected by the Judiciary pursuant to P.L.2002, c.34 and related increases provided by operation of N.J.S.22A:2-5 and section 2 of P.L.1993, c.74 (C.22A:5-1) are appropriated from the Court Technology Improvement Fund for the purpose of offsetting the costs of development, establishment, operation and maintenance of the Judiciary computerized court information systems, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Trial Court Services - Additions, Improvements and Equipment account are appropriated for Statewide courthouse construction and restoration projects, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from charges to the Superior Court Trust Fund, New Jersey Lawyers' Fund for Client Protection, Disciplinary Oversight Committee, Board on Attorney Certification, Bar Admissions Financial Committee, Parents' Education Fund, Automated Traffic System Fund, Municipal Court Administrator Certification Program, Comprehensive Enforcement Program, Court Computer Information System Fund, Statewide County Corrections Information System (CCIS), and Mandatory Continuing Legal Education Program are appropriated for services provided from these funds. Receipts derived from the increase in fees collected by the Judiciary pursuant to P.L.2014, c.31 and related increases provided by operation of N.J.S.22A:2-5 and section 2 of P.L.1993, c.74 (C.22A:5-1) are appropriated from the 21st Century Justice Improvement Fund for the purpose of (1) the development, maintenance and administration of a Statewide Pretrial Services Program; (2) the development, maintenance and administration of a Statewide digital e-court information system; and (3) the provision to the poor of legal assistance in civil matters by Legal Services of New Jersey and its affiliates. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated, revenues in excess of $42,100,000 in the 21st Century Justice Improvement Fund are appropriated to the Judiciary for the Statewide Pretrial Services Program or for court information technology, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Receipts from charges to certain Special Purpose accounts listed hereinabove are appropriated for services provided from these funds. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year not to exceed $10,000,000 in these respective accounts are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Affordable Housing Dispute Resolution Program (P.L.2024, c.2) account is appropriated for the same purpose, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. The Judiciary, Total State Appropriation $895,487,000 Summary of Judiciary Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services .......................................... $895,487,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund .................................................... $895,487,000 DEBT SERVICE 42  DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION 40  Community Development and Environmental Management 46  Environmental Planning and Administration 99-4800 Interest on Bonds $5,247,000 99-4800 Bond Redemption $22,215,000 Total Debt Service Appropriation, Environmental Planning and Administration $27,462,000 Debt-Services: Interest: Water Supply Bonds (P.L.1981, c.261) ($763,000) Pinelands Infrastructure Trust Bonds (P.L.1985, c.302) ($119,000) Hazardous Discharge Bonds (P.L.1986, c.113) ($515,000) New Jersey Open Space Preservation Bonds (P.L.1989, c.183) ($84,000) Stormwater Management and Combined Sewer Overflow Abatement Bonds (P.L.1989, c.181) ($237,000) Green Acres, Farmland and Historic Preservation and Blue Acres Bonds (P.L.1995, c.204) ($5,000) Port of New Jersey Revitalization, Dredging Bonds (P.L.1996, c.70) ($467,000) Dam, Lake, Stream, Water Resources, and Wastewater Treatment Project Bonds (P.L.2003, c.162) ($7,000) Green Acres, Farmland, Blue Acres, and Historic Preservation Bonds (P.L.2007, c.119) ($232,000) Green Acres, Water Supply and Floodplain Protection, and Farmland and Historic Preservation Bonds (P.L.2009, c.117) ($2,818,000) Redemption: Water Supply Bonds (P.L.1981, c.261) ($380,000) Pinelands Infrastructure Trust Bonds (P.L.1985, c.302) ($210,000) Hazardous Discharge Bonds (P.L.1986, c.113) ($700,000) New Jersey Open Space Preservation Bonds (P.L.1989, c.183) ($240,000) Stormwater Management and Combined Sewer Overflow Abatement Bonds (P.L.1989, c.181) ($270,000) Green Acres, Farmland and Historic Preservation and Blue Acres Bonds (P.L.1995, c.204) ($160,000) Port of New Jersey Revitalization, Dredging Bonds (P.L.1996, c.70) ($2,230,000) Dam, Lake, Stream, Water Resources, and Wastewater Treatment Project Bonds (P.L.2003, c.162) ($185,000) Green Acres, Farmland, Blue Acres, and Historic Preservation Bonds (P.L.2007, c.119) ($2,280,000) Green Acres, Water Supply and Floodplain Protection, and Farmland and Historic Preservation Bonds (P.L.2009, c.117) ($15,560,000) Total Debt Service Appropriation, Department of Environmental Protection $27,462,000 82  DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY 70  Government Direction, Management, and Control 76  Management and Administration 99-2000 Interest on Bonds $158,225,000 99-2000 Bond Redemption $388,540,000 Total Debt Service Appropriation, Management and Administration $546,765,000 Debt-Services: Interest: Building our Future Bonds (P.L.2012, c.41) ($3,808,000) New Jersey Library Construction Bonds (P.L.2017, c.149) ($3,926,000) Securing our Children's Future Bonds (P.L.2018, c.119) ($11,379,000) COVID-19 General Obligation Emergency Bonds (P.L.2020, c.60) ($139,112,000) Redemption: Building our Future Bonds (P.L.2012, c.41) ($35,320,000) New Jersey Library Construction Bonds (P.L.2017, c.149) ($2,120,000) Securing our Children's Future Bonds (P.L.2018, c.119) ($28,335,000) COVID-19 General Obligation Emergency Bonds (P.L.2020, c.60) ($322,765,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, such amounts as may be needed for the payment of interest and principal due from the issuance of any bonds authorized under the several bond acts of the State, or bonds issued to refund such bonds, are appropriated and first shall be charged to the earnings from the investments of such bond proceeds, or repayments of loans, or any other monies in the applicable bond funds, or all of these, established under such bond acts, and monies are appropriated from such bond funds for the purpose of paying interest and principal on the bonds issued pursuant to such bond acts.  Where required by law, such amounts shall be used to fund a reserve for the payment of interest and principal on the bonds authorized under the bond act.  Furthermore, where required by law, the amounts hereinabove appropriated are allocated to the projects heretofore approved by the Legislature pursuant to those bond acts.  The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is authorized to reallocate amounts hereinabove appropriated among the various debt service accounts to permit the proper debt service payments. There are appropriated such amounts as may be needed for the payment of debt service administrative costs. Subsequent to the refunding of bonds in the current fiscal year, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is authorized to allocate amounts hereinabove appropriated among the various debt service accounts to reflect the debt service savings of the refunding and to permit the proper debt service payments. Total Debt Service Appropriation, Department of the Treasury $546,765,000 Total Appropriation, Debt Service $574,227,000 Summary of Debt Service Appropriations (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Debt Service ....................................................... $574,227,000 Appropriations by Fund: General Fund ..................................................... $574,227,000 Summary of Appropriations  All Departments (For Display Purposes Only) Appropriations by Category: Direct State Services ....................................... $11,419,150,000 Grants-in-Aid .................................................. $18,538,022,000 State Aid ......................................................... $24,124,071,000 Capital Construction ....................................... $1,980,333,000 Debt Service ................................................... $574,227,000 Appropriation by Fund: General Fund .................................................. $35,251,783,000 Property Tax Relief Fund ............................... $20,659,085,000 Casino Revenue Fund ..................................... $618,603,000 Casino Control Fund ....................................... $77,430,000 Gubernatorial Elections Fund ......................... $28,902,000 Total Appropriation, All State Funds ........................... $56,635,803,000 FEDERAL FUNDS 10  DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE 40 Community Development and Environmental Management 49 Agricultural Resources, Planning, and Regulation 01-3310 Animal Disease Control $3,145,000 02-3320 Plant Pest and Disease Control $3,071,000 03-3330 Agricultural and Natural Resources $3,470,000 05-3350 Food and Nutrition Services $1,242,877,000 06-3360 Marketing and Development Services $7,483,000 08-3380 Farmland Preservation $35,000 99-3370 Administration and Support Services $2,000,000 Total Appropriation, Agricultural Resources, Planning, and Regulation $1,262,081,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($8,126,000) Employee Benefits ($5,802,000) Materials and Supplies ($2,958,000) Services Other Than Personal ($8,548,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($4,014,000) Special Purpose: Child Nutrition Administration ($10,543,000) Country of Origin Labeling (COOL) ($113,000) NJ Animal Food Contract ($39,000) State Aid and Grants ($1,219,700,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($2,238,000) Total Appropriation, Department of Agriculture $1,262,081,000 16  DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND FAMILIES 50  Economic Planning, Development, and Security 55 Social Services Programs 01-1610 Child Protection and Permanency $382,826,000 02-1620 Children's System of Care $339,326,000 03-1630 Family and Community Partnerships $38,784,000 04-1600 Education Services $1,200,000 05-1600 Office of Training and Professional Development $2,186,000 06-1600 Safety and Security Services $3,680,000 99-1600 Administration and Support Services $1,796,000 99-1610 Administration and Support Services $16,129,000 99-1620 Administration and Support Services $1,299,000 Total Appropriation, Social Services Programs $787,226,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($294,340,000) Materials and Supplies ($7,595,000) Services Other Than Personal ($21,129,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($19,077,000) Special Purpose: Supportive Visitation Services -Title XIX ($4,425,000) Supportive Visitation Services -Title XXI ($1,000) Safety and Security Services-Title IV-E ($3,680,000) Safety and Permanency in the Courts ($500,000) State Aid and Grants ($427,343,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($9,136,000) Total Appropriation, Department of Children and Families $787,226,000 22  DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS 40 Community Development and Environmental Management 41 Community Development Management 02-8020 Housing Services $428,632,000 Total Appropriation, Community Development Management $428,632,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($31,769,000) Materials and Supplies ($200,000) Services Other than Personal ($5,093,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($1,750,000) Special Purpose: Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) - Recovery Housing Program ($5,000) Family Self Sufficiency Program Coordinator ($19,000) National Housing Trust Fund ($23,112,000) Mainstream 5 ($10,000) Continuum of Care Program ($20,000) Moderate Rehabilitation Housing Assistance ($76,000) Section 8 Housing Voucher Program ($1,200,000) Small Cities Block Grant Program ($25,000) Emergency Solutions Grants Programs ($14,000) National Affordable Housing - HOME Investment Partnerships ($65,000) State Aid and Grants ($365,274,000) 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 55 Social Services Programs 05-8050 Community Resources $234,887,000 Total Appropriation, Social Services Programs $234,887,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($1,198,000) Employee Benefits ($925,000) Special Purpose: Weatherization Assistance Program ($268,000) Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program ($1,420,000) Community Services Block Grant ($226,000) State Aid and Grants ($230,850,000) Total Appropriation, Department of Community Affairs $663,519,000 26  DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS 10 Public Safety and Criminal Justice 16 Detention and Rehabilitation 13-7025 Institutional Program Support $18,800,000 Total Appropriation, Detention and Rehabilitation $18,800,000 Special Purpose: Prison Rape Elimination Grant ($500,000) SSA Incentive Payments ($50,000) National Institute of Justice Operations Research ($450,000) State Criminal Alien Assistance Program ($6,500,000) Special Investigations Division - Intelligence Technology ($450,000) Father/Child Visitation Program ($750,000) Promising Reentry ($500,000) Health, Safety and Wellness ($2,500,000) Defense Tactical Training ($750,000) Anti-Heroin Task Force ($3,000,000) Innovative Reentry Initiatives ($500,000) Incarcerated Person Vocational Certifications ($300,000) Technology Enhancements ($500,000) Special Operations Tactical Equipment ($200,000) Diversity Training ($250,000) Offender Reentry ($600,000) Body Worn Cameras ($1,000,000) 19 Central Planning, Direction and Management 99-7000 Administration and Support Services $1,274,000 Total Appropriation, Central Planning, Direction and Management $1,274,000 Special Purpose: Adult Basic Skills Program ($1,274,000) Total Appropriation, Department of Corrections $20,074,000 34  DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 31 Direct Educational Services and Assistance 07-5065 Special Education $505,034,000 Total Appropriation, Direct Educational Services and Assistance $505,034,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($11,471,000) Employee Benefits ($8,850,000) Services Other Than Personal ($10,915,000) Special Purpose: State Personnel Development Grant ($1,447,000) Individuals with Disabilities Education Act Basic State Grant ($750,000) Individuals with Disabilities Education Act Preschool Grants ($275,000) IDEA Part B - Discretionary Administration ($1,500,000) State Aid and Grants ($469,826,000) 32 Operation and Support of Educational Institutions 12-5011 Marie H. Katzenbach School for the Deaf $500,000 Total Appropriation, Operation and Support of Educational Institutions $500,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($154,000) Employee Benefits ($119,000) Services Other Than Personal ($212,000) Special Purpose: Vocational Education Program ($15,000) 33 Supplemental Education and Training Programs 20-5062 Career Readiness and Technical Education $29,826,000 Total Appropriation, Supplemental Education and Training Programs $29,826,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($1,584,000) Employee Benefits ($1,222,000) Materials and Supplies ($25,000) Services Other Than Personal ($150,000) Special Purpose: Vocational Education - Basic Grants - Administration ($100,000) Vocational Education - Title II B Leadership Activities ($235,000) State Aid and Grants ($26,510,000) 34 Educational Support Services 05-5064 Bilingual Education $34,808,000 06-5064 Programs for Disadvantaged Youth $516,618,000 30-5063 Standards, Assessments, and Curriculum $105,137,000 32-5061 Recruitment, Preparation, Certification and Educator Evaluation $200,000 35-5069 Early Childhood Education $275,000 40-5064 Student Services $36,128,000 Total Appropriation, Educational Support Services $693,166,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($4,892,000) Employee Benefits ($3,774,000) Materials and Supplies ($45,000) Services Other Than Personal ($6,235,000) Special Purpose: Language Acquisition Discretionary Administration ($50,000) Migrant Education - Administration/Discretionary ($90,000) Migrant Coordination Program ($77,000) MSix State Data Quality Grants ($100,000) Bilingual and Compensatory Education - Homeless Children and Youth ($10,000) Title I School Improvement Accountability Set Aside Administration ($600,000) Student Support & Academic Enrichment State Grants ($1,050,000) State Assessments ($80,000) Supporting Effective Instruction State Grants ($860,000) National Assessment of Educational Progress State Coordinator ($3,000) Troops-to-Teachers Program ($100,000) Head Start Collaboration ($59,000) 21st Century Schools ($515,000) AIDS Prevention Education ($120,000) Comprehensive Literacy State Development Grant ($750,000) State Aid and Grants ($673,756,000) 35 Education Administration and Management 41-5092 Performance Management $1,744,000 99-5095 Administration and Support Services $7,548,000 Total Appropriation, Education Administration and Management $9,292,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($2,042,000) Employee Benefits ($1,575,000) Services Other Than Personal ($1,744,000) Special Purpose: Every Student Succeeds Act - Consolidated Administration ($3,931,000) Total Appropriation, Department of Education $1,237,818,000 42  DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION 40 Community Development and Environmental Management 42 Natural Resource Management 11-4870 Forest Resource Management $21,938,000 12-4875 Parks Management $45,575,000 13-4880 Hunters and Anglers License Fund $72,805,000 14-4885 Shellfish and Marine Fisheries Management $12,026,000 20-4880 Wildlife Management $1,070,000 21-4895 Natural Resources Engineering $4,250,000 Total Appropriation, Natural Resource Management $157,664,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($4,312,000) Employee Benefits ($3,250,000) Special Purpose: Expansion of Beech Leaf Disease ($10,000) Rural Community Fire Protection Program ($362,000) Forest Resource Management - Cooperative Forest Fire Control ($1,147,000) Asian Longhorned Beetle Project ($40,000) Gypsy Moth Suppression ($85,000) Wildlife Risk Reduction ($390,000) Emerald Ash Borer ($40,000) UCF Emerald Ash Borer ($40,000) Oak Wilt Survey ($40,000) Landscape Restoration ($320,000) Consolidated Forest Management ($921,000) Thousand Cankers Disease Survey ($20,000) Forest Action Plan - Forest Health ($373,000) Community Wildfire Defense Grant (CWDG) ($458,000) Bipartisan Infrastructure Law New Jersey Volunteer Fire Assistance ($60,000) Urban and Community ($17,000,000) Bipartisan Infrastructure Law New Jersey State Fire Assistance ($260,000) Bipartisan Infrastructure Law Invasive Species ($60,000) Land and Water Conservation Fund ($8,000,000) Historic Preservation Survey and Planning ($2,289,000) Endangered Plant Species Supplemental Funding ($14,000) Forest Legacy ($4,185,000) Forest Legacy Administration ($60,000) National Recreational Trails ($2,228,000) LWCF - City of Trenton Soccer and Fitness Development ($1,000,000) Land and Water Conservation Fund - Camden Whitman Park Improvements ($1,000,000) National Coastal Wetlands Conservation ($3,500,000) Land and Water Conservation Fund - Outdoor Recreation Legacy Partnership ($2,000,000) Land and Water Conservation Fund - Outdoor Recreation Legacy Partnership 2 ($5,000,000) LWCF - Parks Playground Improvement - Northern Region ($2,000,000) Land and Water Conservation Fund Project 2 ($3,500,000) Land and Water Conservation Fund Project 3 ($2,500,000) Land and Water Conservation Fund - Outdoor Recreation Legacy Partnership 3 ($4,000,000) Wallace House & Old Dutch Parsonage ($1,000,000) Recovery Land Acquisition ($2,500,000) Hunters' and Anglers' License Fund ($2,000,000) Hunter Safety Training ($3,384,000) NJ Outdoor Heritage Program ($5,770,000) NJ - GIS Conservation Tools and Technical Guidance ($3,087,000) Endangered Species ($327,000) Species of Greater Conservation Need (SGCN) Research ($1,680,000) White Nose Syndrome Grants to States ($120,000) Hunters' & Anglers' License Fund/N.J. Statewide Fisheries Development Project ($28,969,000) Northeast Wildlife Teamwork Strategy ($180,000) Boat Access (Fish and Wildlife) ($1,000,000) Connecting Habitat Across New Jersey (CHANJ) Assessments ($260,000) Wildlife Management Area Conservation Program ($2,000,000) Bog Turtle Project ($150,000) Atlantic Brant Migration Ecology Study ($480,000) Wildlife and Sport Fish Restoration Outreach ($1,428,000) Fish & Wildlife Input to Activities - Projects of Others ($767,000) Fish & Wildlife Action Plan ($102,000) New Jersey's Landscape Project ($537,000) Habitat Restoration Monitoring and Evaluation ($340,000) Wildlife and Sport Fish Restoration Partnership Exhibit Development ($600,000) Bat Habitat Conservation Plan ($1,000,000) Bobcat Hair Snare Study ($480,000) NJ Fish, Wildlife and Anadromous Fishery Coordination ($276,000) Research in Freshwater Fisheries Management ($564,000) Fish Culture and Stocking Project ($1,350,000) Aquatic Recreational Resource Awareness & Education Project ($1,437,000) Wildlife Research and Management ($9,042,000) WMA Planning Tool Development ($300,000) Fish and Wildlife Health ($531,000) Marine Fisheries Investigation and Management ($4,458,000) National Estuary Program - Coastal Watershed Grant Program ($220,000) National Fish and Wildlife Foundation Delaware River Program ($200,000) Atlantic Coastal Fisheries Cooperative Management Act ($32,000) Atlantic Coastal Fisheries ($1,874,000) Inventory of New Jersey Surf Clam Resources ($1,149,000) Clean Vessels ($947,000) Marine Fisheries Law Enforcement ($936,000) New Jersey Atlantic and Shortnose Sturgeon ($326,000) SGCN Marine Mammal Research & Management ($500,000) Endangered and Nongame Species Program State Wildlife Grants ($1,070,000) Community Assistance Program ($340,000) National Dam Safety Program IIJA ($1,500,000) Cooperative Technical Partnership ($475,000) National Dam Safety Program (FEMA) ($512,000) High Hazard Dams Grants/Loans ($1,000,000) 43 Science and Technical Programs 05-4840 Water Supply $243,200,000 07-4850 Water Monitoring and Resource Management $4,699,000 15-4801 Land Use Regulation and Management $105,433,000 15-4890 Land Use Regulation and Management $1,000,000 18-4810 Science and Research $1,354,000 22-4861 New Jersey Geological Survey $906,000 90-4801 Environmental Policy and Planning $8,224,000 Total Appropriation, Science and Technical Programs $364,816,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($3,892,000) Employee Benefits ($3,890,000) Services Other Than Personal ($50,000) Special Purpose: Drinking Water State Revolving Fund ($945,000) Drinking Water State Revolving Fund ($24,380,000) Water Infrastructure Improvements for the Nation ($1,000,000) Drinking Water State Revolving Fund (BIL) ($45,000,000) Drinking Water State Revolving Fund - Lead Service Line Replacement (BIL) ($83,000,000) Drinking Water State Revolving Fund - Emerging Contaminants (BIL) ($20,000,000) Emerging Contaminants ($67,000,000) Water Pollution Control Program ($473,000) Water Pollution S106 Enhancements ($400,000) Development Compensatory Mitigation Technical Manual and NJ Floristic Quality ($187,000) National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (IIJA) ($16,057,000) Coastal Zone Management Implementation ($2,658,000) Readiness & Environmental Protection Integration Infrastructure Resilience & Natural Resource ($10,000,000) Coastal Zone Management - Inflation Reduction Act (Non-Competitive) ($854,000) Coastal Zone Management - Bipartisan Infrastructure Law (Non-Competitive) ($900,000) Department of Energy (Energy Futures Grant) - Just Resilience ($758,000) National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (IRA) ($72,500,000) Coastal Zone Management Grant - Section 309 ($583,000) Coastal Zone Management - Special Merit ($500,000) Coastal Zone Management Grant - Section 310 ($450,000) Multimedia ($394,000) Wetland Development Grant ($700,000) New Jersey Statewide Water Use Data ($163,000) National Geologic Mapping Program ($182,000) Geological and Geophysical Data Preservation USGS ($90,000) Geophysical Data Preservation - BIL ($18,000) BOEM - Marine Minerals ($191,000) Water Pollution Control ($48,000) Environmental & Health Effects Tracking ($452,000) Water Monitoring and Planning ($1,159,000) Nonpoint Source Implementation (319H) ($3,864,000) AmeriCorps ($385,000) Beach Monitoring and Notification ($693,000) NJ Environmental Justice and Overburdened Communities ($1,000,000) 44 Site Remediation and Waste Management 19-4815 Publicly-Funded Site Remediation and Response $5,030,000 23-4815 Solid and Hazardous Waste Management $315,000 23-4910 Solid and Hazardous Waste Management $833,000 27-4815 Remediation Management $26,300,000 Total Appropriation, Site Remediation and Waste Management $32,478,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($2,046,000) Employee Benefits ($1,576,000) Special Purpose: Superfund Core Grant - CPCA ($30,000) Superfund Grants ($5,000,000) Hazardous Waste - Resource Conservation Recovery Act ($1,148,000) Preliminary Assessments/Site Inspections ($697,000) Brownfields ($1,777,000) Brownfield - Infrastructure ($803,000) Remedial Planning Support Agency Assistance ($665,000) Underground Storage Tanks ($18,736,000) 45 Environmental Regulation 01-4820 Radiation Protection and Quality Assurance $500,000 02-4892 Air Pollution Control $338,504,000 09-4860 Public Wastewater Facilities $174,000,000 16-4891 Water Monitoring and Planning $98,000 Total Appropriation, Environmental Regulation $513,102,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($4,050,000) Employee Benefits ($1,591,000) Special Purpose: Radon Program ($325,000) Air Pollution Maintenance Program ($4,430,000) BioWatch Monitoring ($765,000) Particulate Monitoring Grant ($679,000) Clean Diesel Retrofit ($6,000,000) Diesel Emissions Reduction Act - Marine Vessel Emission Reduction ($1,400,000) Climate Pollution Reduction Planning ($3,000,000) P2 Pollution Prevention ($160,000) Air Sensors Grants (IRA) ($37,000) Geospatial Monitoring (IRA) ($907,000) Climate Pollution Reduction Grants - Clean Corridor Coalition (IRA) ($249,000,000) Climate Pollution Reduction Grants - Electric School Bus Program (IRA) ($28,000,000) Clean Ports Program (IRA) ($20,000,000) Clean Heavy-Duty Vehicles Program (IRA) ($5,000,000) Federal Highway Administration - Charging and Fueling Infrastructure (IIJA) ($15,000,000) Clean Water State Revolving Fund ($51,735,000) Clean Water State Revolving Fund (BIL) ($105,000,000) Clean Water State Revolving Fund - Emerging Contaminants (BIL) ($10,000,000) Clean Water State Revolving Fund - Sewer Overflow and Stormwater Reuse Grants Program ($5,945,000) Underground Injection Control ($78,000) 47 Compliance and Enforcement 02-4855 Air Pollution Control $2,460,000 04-4835 Pesticide Control $500,000 08-4855 Water Pollution Control $8,000,000 15-4855 Land Use Regulation and Management $700,000 23-4855 Solid and Hazardous Waste Management $3,732,000 Total Appropriation, Compliance and Enforcement $15,392,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($2,522,000) Employee Benefits ($1,948,000) Special Purpose: Air Pollution Maintenance Program ($1,158,000) Pesticide Control Consolidated ($209,000) Underground Storage Tank Program Standard Compliance Inspections ($7,564,000) Coastal Zone Management Implementation ($256,000) Hazardous Waste - Resource Conservation Recovery Act ($1,735,000) Total Appropriation, Department of Environmental Protection $1,083,452,000 46  DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 20 Physical and Mental Health 21 Health Services 01-4215 Vital Statistics $1,498,000 02-4220 Family Health Services $491,005,000 03-4230 Public Health Protection Services $181,812,000 05-4285 Community Health Services $29,873,000 08-4280 Laboratory Services $16,506,000 12-4245 HIV, STD, and TB Services $93,332,000 Total Appropriation, Health Services $814,026,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($55,274,000) Employee Benefits ($33,335,000) Materials and Supplies ($13,309,000) Services Other Than Personal ($53,091,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($1,134,000) Special Purpose: Preventative Health and Health Services Block Grant ($1,000,000) Maternal and Child Health Block Grant ($2,460,000) Maternal, Infant and Early Childhood Home Visiting Program ($100,000) Supplemental Food Program - Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) ($3,000,000) Supplemental Food Program - WIC ($25,000,000) New Jersey State Maternal Health Innovation Program ($109,000) Pediatric AIDS Health Care Demonstration Project ($120,000) Early Intervention for Infants and Toddlers with Disabilities (Part C) ($359,000) N.J. Project: Providing a MED Home in a Neighborhood of Services ($4,000) Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) Farmers' Market Nutrition Program ($5,000,000) WIC Farmer's Market Food Program ($2,000,000) New Jersey Personal Responsibility Education Program ($8,000) Abstinence Education - Family Health Services (FHS) ($21,000) Senior Farmers' Market Nutrition Program ($1,000,000) Universal Newborn Hearing Screening ($15,000) USDA Incentive Program ($1,500,000) Rape Prevention and Education Program ($1,800,000) Public Health Crisis Response to COVID-19 ($250,000) Preventative Health & Health Services Block Grant ($2,650,000) Venereal Disease Project ($438,000) COVID-19 Strengthening STD Prevention ($456,000) Child Nutrition Program - Inspection Services ($350,000) Tuberculosis Control Program ($120,000) Epidemiology and Laboratory Capacity - Affordable Care Act ($142,000) Toxic Substances Control Act ($168,000) Environmental Health Education ($565,000) Federal Lead Abatement Program ($26,000) Demonstration Program to Conduct Health Assessments ($246,000) Conformance with the Manufactured Food Regulatory Program Standard ($251,000) Immunization Project ($3,000,000) New Jersey Plan for Private Well Programs ($200,000) National Program of Cancer Registries ($39,000) Public Employees Occupational Safety and Health -  State Plan ($66,000) Bioterrorism Hospital Emergency Preparedness ($139,000) Emergency Preparedness for Bioterrorism ($1,425,000) National Violent Death Reporting  System ($16,000) Fundamental & Expanded Occupational Health ($356,000) Prevention & Public Health Fund - Immunization and Vaccines for Children ($150,000) COVID-19 Immunization & Vaccines ($404,000) Oral Health Grant ($425,000) Preventative Health & Health Services Block Grant ($500,000) Ensuring Quitline Capacity ($17,000) National Cancer Prevention and Control ($1,775,000) Breast and Cervical Cancer Early Detection Program ($57,000) Wisewoman Breast and Cervical Cancer Early Detection ($30,000) Chronic Disease Prevention and Health Promotion ($16,000) Prevention and Management of Diabetes, Heart Disease and Stroke ($1,738,000) Tobacco Age of Sale Enforcement (TASE) ($90,000) Tuberculosis Control Program ($50,000) Epidemiology and Laboratory Capacity - Affordable Care Act ($1,000,000) Lab Biomonitoring Program - Impact of Biohazards on New  Jersey Citizens ($480,000) Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments Program ($45,000) Emergency Preparedness for Bioterrorism - Laboratories ($6,000) HIV/AIDS Surveillance Grant ($3,218,000) HIV/AIDS Prevention and Education Grant ($717,000) Housing Opportunities for Persons with AIDS ($500,000) Comprehensive AIDS Resources Grant ($295,000) Partnership Ending HIV in Essex & Hudson ($126,000) Morbidity and Risk Behavior Surveillance ($190,000) State Aid and Grants ($589,451,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($2,204,000) 22 Health Planning and Evaluation 06-4260 Health Care Facility Regulation and Oversight $22,783,000 07-4270 Health Care Systems Analysis $132,400,000 Total Appropriation, Health Planning and Evaluation $155,183,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($10,731,000) Employee Benefits ($7,596,000) Materials and Supplies ($550,000) Services Other Than Personal ($65,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($950,000) Special Purpose: Long Term Care - Medicaid ($367,000) Implement Patient Safety Act ($200,000) Medicare/Medicaid Inspections of Nursing Facilities ($580,000) HCSA - Medicaid ($1,000,000) State Aid and Grants ($132,119,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($1,025,000) 23 Behavioral Health Services 15-4291 Patient Care and Health Services $15,660,000 15-4292 Patient Care and Health Services $6,799,000 15-4294 Patient Care and Health Services $13,938,000 99-4291 Administration and Support Services $5,517,000 99-4292 Administration and Support Services $3,819,000 99-4294 Administration and Support Services $7,267,000 Total Appropriation, Behavioral Health Services $53,000,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($23,510,000) Materials and Supplies ($4,832,000) Services Other Than Personal ($16,592,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($4,626,000) Special Purpose: Federal DSH Revenues ($519,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($2,921,000) 25 Health Administration 11-4297 Office of the Chief State Medical Examiner $600,000 99-4210 Administration and Support Services $30,020,000 Total Appropriation, Health Administration $30,620,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($2,746,000) Employee Benefits ($518,000) Materials and Supplies ($40,000) Services Other Than Personal ($280,000) Special Purpose: Immunization Program ($3,050,000) Emergency Preparedness for Bioterrorism ($26,000) State Aids and Grants ($23,960,000) Total Appropriation, Department of Health $1,052,829,000 54 DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES 20 Physical and Mental Health 23 Behavioral Health Services 08-7700 Community Services $86,870,000 09-7700 Addiction Services $132,878,000 Total Appropriation, Behavioral Health Services $219,748,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($4,647,000) Employee Benefits ($47,000) Materials and Supplies ($55,000) Services Other Than Personal ($23,736,000) Special Purpose: Mental Health Preparedness Activities Bioterrorism ($10,000) Projects for Assistance in Transition From Homelessness (PATH) ($3,000) State Aid and Grants ($191,250,000) 24 Special Health Services 21-7540 Health Services Administration and Management $245,820,000 22-7540 General Medical Services $12,828,518,000 Total Appropriation, Special Health Services $13,074,338,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($29,372,000) Materials and Supplies ($199,000) Services Other Than Personal ($40,614,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($1,931,000) Special Purpose: Payment to Fiscal Agents ($140,684,000) Professional Standards Review Organization - Utilization Review ($3,000,000) Drug Utilization Review Board - Administrative Costs ($23,000) NJ KidCare - Administration ($11,715,000) NJ KidCare B-C-D - Administration ($16,507,000) State Aid and Grants ($12,829,518,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($775,000) 26 Division of Aging Services 20-7530 Medical Services for the Aged $36,606,000 55-7530 Programs for the Aged $58,429,000 57-7530 Office of the Public Guardian $5,210,000 Total Appropriation, Division of Aging Services $100,245,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($9,844,000) Employee Benefits ($5,069,000) Materials and Supplies ($1,110,000) Services Other Than Personal ($3,871,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($4,200,000) Special Purpose: Administration of US Department of Health and Human Services ($5,988,000) ADM DHS Federal Program - SBUM ($2,469,000) Managed Long Term Services and Supports ($289,000) Preventative Health and Health Services Grant ($100,000) Counseling on Health Insurance for Medicare Enrollees ($38,000) Older Americans Act - Title III C1 ($101,000) Elder Abuse - Older Americans Act Title III ($163,000) Ombudsman - Older Americans Act Title III ($50,000) National Family Caregiver Program ($190,000) State Aid and Grants ($66,404,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($359,000) 27 Disability Services 27-7545 Disability Services $1,544,000 Total Appropriation, Disability Services $1,544,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($946,000) Materials and Supplies ($99,000) Services Other Than Personal ($162,000) State Aid and Grants ($337,000) 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 32 Operation and Support of Educational Institutions 01-7601 Purchased Residential Care $1,143,386,000 02-7601 Social Supervision and Consultation $264,074,000 03-7601 Adult Activities $190,984,000 05-7610 Residential Care and Habilitation Services $15,688,000 05-7620 Residential Care and Habilitation Services $33,374,000 05-7640 Residential Care and Habilitation Services $44,705,000 05-7650 Residential Care and Habilitation Services $49,858,000 05-7670 Residential Care and Habilitation Services $55,876,000 08-7601 Community Services $56,990,000 99-7601 Administration and Support Services $29,459,000 99-7610 Administration and Support Services $3,614,000 99-7620 Administration and Support Services $6,938,000 99-7640 Administration and Support Services $10,161,000 99-7650 Administration and Support Services $10,622,000 99-7670 Administration and Support Services $12,240,000 Total Appropriation, Operation and Support of Educational Institutions $1,927,969,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($296,299,000) Materials and Supplies ($13,338,000) Services Other Than Personal ($19,486,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($2,000) State Aid and Grants ($1,561,904,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($400,000) 33 Supplemental Education and Training Programs 11-7560 Services for the Blind and Visually Impaired $13,489,000 99-7560 Administration and Support Services $2,061,000 Total Appropriation, Supplemental Education and Training Programs $15,550,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($9,249,000) Materials and Supplies ($111,000) Services Other Than Personal ($312,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($170,000) State Aid and Grants ($5,654,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($54,000) 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 53 Economic Assistance and Security 15-7550 Income Maintenance Management $1,377,651,000 Total Appropriation, Economic Assistance and Security $1,377,651,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($16,339,000) Services Other Than Personal ($24,971,000) Special Purpose: Work First New Jersey Technology Investment - Food Stamps ($18,000,000) EBT - Operational Food Stamp Match for CWA's ($4,200,000) Work First New Jersey - Benefits Transfer -  Operational ($210,000) Work First New Jersey - Technology Investments ($7,000,000) Work First New Jersey - Technology Investment - TANF/CCDF ($4,000,000) EBT Operational - Child Care Discretionary ($200,000) EBT Operational - Child Care M&M ($600,000) EBT Operational - Child Care TANF ($350,000) Work First New Jersey - Technology Investments - Title XIX ($14,000,000) Work First New Jersey - Technology Investment - Title IV-D ($27,500,000) State Aid and Grants ($1,260,281,000) 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 76 Management and Administration 99-7500 Administration and Support Services $38,378,000 Total Appropriation, Management and Administration $38,378,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($10,213,000) Services Other Than Personal ($719,000) Special Purpose: Human Services Administration ($3,034,000) Child Support Enforcement Program ($3,000,000) Title XIX Medical Assistance ($11,100,000) Vocational Rehabilitation Act - Section 120 ($581,000) Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program ($3,500,000) Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block Grant ($1,731,000) State Aid and Grants ($4,500,000) Total Appropriation, Department of Human Services $16,755,423,000 62 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 51 Economic Planning and Development 18-4570 Research and Information $8,612,000 Total Appropriation, Economic Planning and Development $8,612,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($5,652,000) Employee Benefits ($1,872,000) Materials and Supplies ($90,000) Services Other Than Personal ($343,000) Special Purpose: Reports and Analysis - Unemployment Insurance ($250,000) ES 202 Covered Employment & Wages ($50,000) Current Employment Statistics ($32,000) Local Area Unemployment Statistics ($12,000) Occupational Employment Statistics ($40,000) ES - Labor Market Information ($91,000) Redesigned Occupational Safety and Health ($8,000) One Stop Labor Market Information ($130,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($42,000) 53 Economic Assistance and Security 01-4510 Unemployment Insurance $226,336,000 02-4515 Disability Determination $77,106,000 Total Appropriation, Economic Assistance and Security $303,442,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($121,287,000) Employee Benefits ($62,190,000) Materials and Supplies ($3,700,000) Services Other Than Personal ($46,930,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($10,300,000) Special Purpose: Unemployment Insurance ($15,000,000) Reed Act Improvements ($2,000,000) Reemployment Eligibility Assessments - State Administration ($20,635,000) Employment Security Revenue ($1,700,000) Disability Determination Services ($2,000,000) Old Age and Survivor Insurance Disability Determination Services ($1,000,000) State Aid and Grants ($14,800,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($1,900,000) 54 Workforce and Employment Services 07-4535 Vocational Rehabilitation Services $82,550,000 09-4545 Employment Services $41,873,000 10-4545 Employment and Training Services $160,821,000 12-4550 Workplace Standards $5,863,000 Total Appropriation, Workforce and Employment Services $291,107,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($58,665,000) Employee Benefits ($29,570,000) Materials and Supplies ($900,000) Services Other Than Personal ($17,072,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($7,937,000) Special Purpose: Vocational Rehabilitation Act of 1973 ($600,000) Employment Services ($250,000) Disabled Veterans' Outreach Program ($596,000) Local Veterans' Employment Representatives ($33,000) Trade Adjustment Assistance Project ($25,000) Employment Services Grants - Alien Labor Certification ($62,000) Work Opportunity Tax Credit ($100,000) Employment Services Cost Reimbursable Grants - Migrant Housing ($5,000) Agricultural Wage Surveys ($23,000) Workforce Investment Act ($146,000) Employment Services Rapid Response Team ($75,000) Project Reemployment Opportunity System (PROS) ($50,000) National Council on Aging - Senior Community Services Employment Project ($10,000) Workforce Investment Act - Adult and Continuing Education ($82,000) Adult Basic Ed Leadership ($1,179,000) Adult Basic Ed Civics Administration ($150,000) Preschool Development ($200,000) Occupational Safety Health Act - On-Site Consultation ($461,000) Mine Safety Educational Program ($62,000) Public Employees Occupational Safety and Health Act ($100,000) State Aid and Grants ($172,420,000) Additions, Improvements and Equipment ($334,000) Total Appropriation, Department of Labor and Workforce Development $603,161,000 66  DEPARTMENT OF LAW AND PUBLIC SAFETY 10 Public Safety and Criminal Justice 12 Law Enforcement 06-1200 State Police Operations $128,497,000 09-1020 Criminal Justice $84,897,000 Total Appropriation, Law Enforcement $213,394,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($4,000,000) Employee Benefits ($4,000,000) Special Purpose: NJSP Training - OHTS Grant ($100,000) Paul Coverdell National Forensic Science Improvement (Formula) ($650,000) Domestic Marijuana Eradication Suppression Program ($200,000) Traffic Officer Field Training Officer ($700,000) Flood Mitigation Assistance ($18,000,000) Fatal Accident Investigation Equipment ($100,000) Recreational Boating Safety ($4,800,000) Internet Crimes Against Children ($1,850,000) Hazardous Materials Transportation ($1,500,000) Pre-Disaster Mitigation - Competitive ($10,000,000) NIEHS Worker Health Safety Training ($225,000) Incident Command ($3,500,000) Emergency Management Performance Grant - Non Terrorism ($10,500,000) Teen Driver Education Program ($150,000) Port Security - New York/New Jersey (North) ($1,500,000) Port Security - Delaware Bay (South) ($1,500,000) Bicycle Safety Education Grant ($150,000) Alcotest 7110 - MAP 21 ($600,000) Drive Sober or Get Pulled Over - MAP 21 ($600,000) STOP School Violence Prevention Program ($650,000) DWI Training Program - Toxicology ($1,500,000) First Responder Comprehensive Addiction and Recovery Act (FR-CARA) ($1,500,000) Missing and Unidentified Human Remains ($1,000,000) D.W.I. Training MAP 21 ($1,500,000) Purchase Evidential Breath Test Project - MAP 21 ($100,000) Child Safety Seat Education Program - MAP 21 ($500,000) Click it or Ticket - MAP 21 ($150,000) Underage Drinking Training & Enforcement Initiative - MAP 21 ($250,000) Victim Centered Law Enforcement Training ($750,000) Troop D Occupant Restraint Grant ($150,000) Seatbelt Enforcement Initiative - MAP 21 ($150,000) High Priority Commercial Motor Vehicles Grant ($2,500,000) National Incident Based Reporting System ($77,000) Connect & Protect ($1,000,000) Forensic Casework DNA Backlog Reduction ($1,800,000) Community Policing Development Micro Grants ($100,000) Intellectual Property ($450,000) Presidential Residence Protection Assistance ($300,000) Community Oriented Policing (COPS) School Violence Prevention ($500,000) Community Oriented Policing (COPS)  Anti-Heroin Task Force Program ($4,500,000) Community Oriented Policing (COPS) Anti-Gang Initiative ($500,000) RADAR Enforcement Program ($500,000) Urban Search and Rescue ($7,500,000) USAR/FEMA Administration ($6,000,000) Body Cameras ($2,500,000) Anti-Methamphetamine ($2,500,000) Internet Crimes Against Children - Wounded Vet Hire ($150,000) Distracted Driving Campaign ($250,000) Community Oriented Policing (COPS) Officer Safety & Wellness ($35,000) Community Oriented Policing (COPS) Law Enforcement Mental Health and Wellness ($360,000) Paul Coverdell National Forensic Science Improvement (Competitive) ($650,000) Targeted Violence and Terrorism Prevention ($750,000) Sexual Assault Kit Initiative ($2,000,000) Crime Gun Intelligence Center ($500,000) Connect and Protect: Law Enforcement Behavioral Health Response ($1,000,000) Flood Mitigation Assistance Swift Current ($10,000,000) National Crime Statistics Exchange ($2,000,000) Kevin & Avonte Program ($1,000,000) Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act (SORNA) ($750,000) Community Oriented Policing (COPS) Hiring Program ($3,000,000) MCSAP & New Entrant (Combined) ($10,000,000) Forensic DNA Laboratory Efficiency Improvement and Capacity Enhancement ($500,000) Medicaid Fraud Unit ($1,750,000) Victim Assistance Grants ($50,000,000) Enhancement of Data Analysis Center ($225,000) Justice Assistance Grant (JAG) ($5,000,000) Sex Offender Registration & Notification Act (SORNA) Reallocation ($225,000) Victims of Crime Act - Training Discretionary ($1,000,000) Training for Juvenile Prosecution ($225,000) Prosecuting Cold Cases Using DNA ($500,000) Matthew Shepard and James Byrd Jr. Hate Crimes Program ($347,000) Preventing & Addressing Hate ($750,000) Residential Treatment for Substance Abuse ($500,000) Byrne Criminal Justice Innovation Program ($1,000,000) Smart Prosecution - Innovative Prosecution Solutions ($200,000) Improving Outcomes for Victims of Human Trafficking ($2,000,000) Sexual Assault Kit Initiative - Criminal Justice ($2,500,000) State Crisis Intervention Program ($5,400,000) Prison Rape Elimination Act Reallocation Funds Program ($125,000) Coverdell Competitive ($250,000) Justice Info Sharing Solution Implementation Project ($500,000) State Aid and Grants ($4,400,000) 13 Special Law Enforcement Activities 03-1160 Division of Highway Traffic Safety $63,450,000 Total Appropriation, Special Law Enforcement Activities $63,450,000 Special Purpose: Federal Highway Safety ($1,300,000) Highway Safety - Traffic Records ($450,000) Non-Motorized Safety ($2,200,000) Federal Highway Traffic Safety Administration ($700,000) FHWA Program Management ($200,000) TRAINING GRANT - SECTION 402 ($100,000) Pedestrian Safety Grant ($1,500,000) Preventing Roadside Deaths ($300,000) Selective Enforcement Management ($6,000,000) Highway Safety Programs ($9,000,000) National Priority Safety Program ($10,000,000) Community Traffic Safety ($4,000,000) Occupant Protection ($4,000,000) State Traffic Safety Information System Improvement ($4,600,000) Impaired Driving Countermeasure ($9,000,000) Distracted Driving Incentive ($5,000,000) Motorcycle Safety Grant ($600,000) Highway Safety - Alcohol Education and Public Awareness Coordinator ($1,250,000) Highway Safety - Safety Restraints Program Management ($1,750,000) Paid Advertising ($1,500,000) 18 Juvenile Services 99-1500 Administration and Support Services $1,300,000 Total Appropriation, Juvenile Services $1,300,000 Special Purpose: Juvenile Justice Delinquency Prevention ($1,300,000) 19 Central Planning, Direction and Management 13-1005 Homeland Security Preparedness $58,438,000 99-1000 Administration and Support Services $12,596,000 Total Appropriation, Central Planning, Direction and Management $71,034,000 Special Purpose: Homeland Security Grant Program ($6,367,000) Urban Area Security Initiative (UASI) ($16,723,000) UASI Nonprofit Security Grant Program (NSGP) ($27,521,000) Federal Nonprofit Security Grant Program - State ($2,725,000) State and Local Cybersecurity Grant Program ($5,102,000) Community Policing Development ($500,000) Opioids ($2,500,000) Preventing Wrongful Convictions ($250,000) National Criminal History Program - Office of the Attorney General ($1,000,000) Comprehensive Opioid, Stimulant, and Substance Use Program ($6,000,000) Postconviction Testing of DNA Evidence ($500,000) Opioid State Plan and Opioid Response Team (ORT) ($850,000) Opioid Interagency Drug Awareness Dashboard (IDAD) ($996,000) 80   Special Government Services 82 Protection of Citizens Rights 14-1310 Consumer Affairs $2,000,000 16-1350 Protection of Civil Rights $800,000 19-1440 Services to Victims of Crime $13,050,000 Total Appropriation, Protection of Citizens Rights $15,850,000 Special Purpose: Prescription Drug Monitoring Program ($2,000,000) Equal Employment Opportunity Commission ($400,000) Housing and Urban Development ($400,000) Victims of Crime Act - Building State Technology ($300,000) Advancing the Use of Technology to Assist Victims of Crime ($750,000) State Aid and Grants ($12,000,000) Total Appropriation, Department of Law and Public Safety $365,028,000 67  DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS' AFFAIRS 10 Public Safety and Criminal Justice 14 Military Services 40-3620 New Jersey National Guard Support Services $126,106,000 Total Appropriation, Military Services $126,106,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($17,050,000) Employee Benefits ($9,784,000) Materials and Supplies ($32,171,000) Services Other Than Personal ($4,898,000) Maintenance and Fixed Charges ($110,000) Special Purpose: Dining Facility Operations ($600,000) Atlantic City SRM 100% ($1,000,000) Natural and Cultural Resources Management ($20,000) Mental Health Training ($250,000) National Guard Maintenance Shop ($35,000,000) McGuire SRM (Sustainment, Restoration and Modernization) ($1,000,000) Newark Armory Design ($4,000,000) Logistical and Administrative Building ($12,000,000) Federal Distance Learning Program ($243,000) National Guard Yellow Ribbon ($120,000) Army Facilities Service Contracts ($434,000) McGuire Air Force Base - Service Contract ($81,000) Army National Guard Electronic Security System ($350,000) Training Site Facilities Maintenance Agreements ($22,000) McGuire Air Force Base Environmental ($39,000) Atlantic City Air Base Operations and Maintenance ($19,000) Atlantic City Air Base Environmental ($9,000) Warren Grove Sustainment Restoration & Modernization ($5,000) Atlantic City Air Base Sustainment, Restoration and  Modernization ($250,000) Armory Renovations and Improvements ($5,726,000) New Jersey National Guard ChalleNGe Youth Program ($925,000) 80 Special Government Services 83 Services to Veterans 20-3630 Domiciliary and Treatment Services $4,000,000 20-3640 Domiciliary and Treatment Services $4,000,000 20-3650 Domiciliary and Treatment Services $4,000,000 50-3610 Veterans' Outreach and Assistance $923,000 70-3610 Burial Services $14,960,000 99-3630 Administration and Support Services $26,647,000 99-3640 Administration and Support Services $19,905,000 99-3650 Administration and Support Services $430,000 Total Appropriation, Services to Veterans $74,865,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($478,000) Employee Benefits ($320,000) Materials and Supplies ($375,000) Special Purpose: Medicare Part A Receipts for Resident Care and Operational Costs ($12,000,000) Veterans Education Monitoring ($125,000) Fairmount and Arlington Cemetery Upkeep ($460,000) Section Z Crypt ($14,500,000) Menlo Park HVAC Renovation ($1,897,000) Vineland Grounds Beautification ($305,000) Paramus Rooftop AC Units ($930,000) Menlo Elevator ($1,200,000) Paramus Elevator ($1,200,000) Paramus Room Conversion ($17,650,000) Menlo Park Room Conversion ($23,425,000) Total Appropriation, Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs $200,971,000 74  DEPARTMENT OF STATE 30  Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 36 Higher Educational Services 45-2405 Student Assistance Programs $805,000 80-2400 Statewide Planning and Coordination for Higher Education $5,000,000 Total Appropriation, Higher Educational Services $5,805,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($295,000) Special Purpose: National Health Service Corp - Student Loans Repayment Program ($630,000) John R. Justice Grant Program ($175,000) State Aid and Grants ($4,705,000) 37 Cultural and Intellectual Development Services 05-2530 Support of the Arts $1,195,000 Total Appropriation, Cultural and Intellectual Development Services $1,195,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($426,000) Employee Benefits ($329,000) State Aid and Grants ($440,000) 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 74 General Government Services 01-2505 Office of the Secretary of State $11,655,000 02-2510 Business Action Center $1,350,000 25-2525 Election Management and Coordination $1,168,000 Total Appropriation, General Government Services $14,173,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($354,000) Employee Benefits ($274,000) Special Purpose: AMERICOR Competitive Grants ($450,000) Foster Grandparent Program ($573,000) Public Health Americorps ($1,485,000) AmeriCorps Grants ($7,200,000) State Commission ($144,000) Professional Development ($475,000) Volunteer Generation Fund ($700,000) State Trade and Export Promotion Program ($1,350,000) HAVA Election Security Federal Grant ($1,000,000) Electronic Ballot Delivery Modifications ($168,000) Total Appropriation, Department of State $21,173,000 78 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 10 Public Safety and Criminal Justice 11 Vehicular Safety 01-6400 Motor Vehicle Services $5,600,000 Total Appropriation, Vehicular Safety $5,600,000 Special Purpose: Commercial Bus Inspection Unit ($1,100,000) Commercial Drivers' License Program ($4,500,000) 60 Transportation Programs 61 State and Local Highway Facilities 00-6300 Federal Highway Administration $1,940,392,250 Total Appropriation, State and Local Highway Facilities $1,940,392,250 Federal Highway Administration Description County Amount ADA Curb Ramp Implementation Various 1,000,000 Baltic Avenue, Maine Avenue to Missouri Avenue Atlantic 800,000 Bicycle & Pedestrian Facilities/Accommodations Various 4,250,000 Bordentown Avenue (CR 615), Burlew Place/Kenneth Avenue and Eugene Boulevard Intersections Middlesex 3,900,000 Boylan Terrace Neighborhood Pedestrian Connection Somerset 1,221,000 Bridge Deck/Superstructure Replacement Program Various 49,000,000 Bridge Inspection Various 33,580,000 Bridge Maintenance Fender Replacement Various 20,000,000 Bridge Maintenance Scour Countermeasures Various 9,000,000 Bridge Management System Various 1,500,000 Bridge Preventive Maintenance Various 35,000,000 Bridge Replacement, Future Projects Various 145,933,586 Camden County LINK Trail Camden 6,840,000 Camden County Roadway Safety Improvements Camden 300,000 Camden White Horse Bridge/PATCO Camden 600,000 Camp Meeting Avenue Bridge over Trenton Line (CR 602) Somerset 3,000,000 Carbon Reduction Program Various 2,754,405 Chadwick Beach Island Bridge (No. 1507-007) over Barnegat Bay Ocean 400,000 Chestnut Avenue Safety Improvements and Rehabilitation Cumberland 24,221,000 Clay Street Bridge over the Passaic River Hudson, Essex 7,000,000 CMAQ Initiatives, Statewide Various 4,000,000 Commissioners Pike (CR 581) Salem 50,000 CR 508 (Central Avenue), Bridge over City Subway Essex 1,000,000 CR 510 (Columbia Turnpike), Bridge over Black Brook Morris 100,000 CR 531 (Park Avenue), Bridge over Lehigh Valley Main Line Middlesex 2,030,000 CR 551 (Broadway) Elevation, Little Timber Creek to Route 130 Camden 350,000 CR 616 (Mill Street) Bridge over South Branch Rancocas Creek Rehabilitation/Replacement Burlington 750,000 CR 670 (Burnt Mill Road) and CR 673 (White Horse Road) Intersection Improvements Camden 2,158,000 CR 706 (Cooper Street) Bridge over Almonesson Creek (Bridge 3-K-3) Gloucester 500,000 Culvert Replacement Program Various 2,000,000 Cumberland County Federal Road Program Cumberland 2,300,000 Delaware & Raritan Canal Bridges Mercer, Hunterdon, Middlesex, Somerset 21,000,000 Design, Emerging Projects Various 250,000 Disadvantaged Business Enterprise Various 250,000 Disadvantaged Business Enterprise Supportive Services Program Various 500,000 Drainage Rehabilitation & Improvements Various 23,000,000 DVRPC Carbon Reduction Program Various 3,371,341 DVRPC Future Projects Various 647,000 East Anderson Street Bridge (02C0023A) over the Hackensack River Bergen 180,000 East Mill Creek Road (CR 670/US 347), Phase II Cape May 1,500,000 Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Program Various 22,231,156 Erial Road and College Drive Intersection Camden 400,000 Ferry Program Various 4,000,000 Garden State Parkway Interchange 83 Improvements Ocean 3,200,000 Gloucester County Roadway Safety Improvements Gloucester 1,000,000 Grove Avenue, Bridge over Port Reading RR Middlesex 7,600,000 Guiderail Upgrade Various 24,000,000 Hamilton Road, Bridge over Conrail RR Somerset 3,000,000 High-Mast Light Poles Various 2,000,000 Highway Safety Improvement Program Planning Various 10,000,000 Intelligent Traffic Signal Systems Various 23,630,975 Intelligent Transportation System Resource Center Various 3,500,000 Intelligent Transportation Systems (ITS) Safety Program Various 3,000,000 Job Order Contracting Infrastructure Repairs, Statewide Various 8,250,000 Kaighn Avenue (CR 607), Bridge over Cooper River (Roadway and Bridge Improvements) Camden 2,008,000 Kapkowski Road - North Avenue East Improvement Project Union 2,000,000 Kingsland Avenue, Bridge over Passaic River Bergen, Essex 200,000 Lincoln Avenue/Chambers Street (CR 626), Bridge over Amtrak & Assunpink Creek Mercer 16,400,000 Local Aid Consultant Services Various 400,000 Local CMAQ Initiatives Various 10,608,100 Local Concept Development Support Various 3,625,000 Local Safety/High Risk Rural Roads Program Various 31,000,000 Martin Luther King Avenue Bridge (No. 1400-118) over the Whippany River Morris 1,100,000 Mercer County Roadway Safety Improvements Mercer 600,000 Metropolitan Planning Various 34,878,870 Mill Road, Garden Road (CR 674) to Forest Grove Road Cumberland 75,000 Mobility and Systems Engineering Program Various 6,000,000 Monmouth County Bridges W7, W8, W9 over Glimmer Glass and Debbies Creek Monmouth 4,000,000 Motor Vehicle Crash Record Processing Various 6,400,000 Mount Ephraim Avenue Safety Improvements, Ferry Avenue (CR 603) to Haddon Avenue (CR 561) Camden 760,000 New Jersey Regional Signal Retiming Initiative Burlington, Camden, Gloucester, Mercer 380,000 New Jersey Scenic Byways Program Various 500,000 New or Upgraded Traffic Signal Systems at Intersections, Phase 1 Camden 2,476,000 New or Upgraded Traffic Signal Systems at Intersections, Phase 3 Camden 250,000 New Traffic Light System at Broad Street and East Grand Street/West Grand Street Union 532,000 NJTPA Carbon Reduction Program Various 14,447,257 NJTPA Future Projects Various 38,460,202 NJTPA Pavement Preservation Various 16,000,000 Ozone Action Program in New Jersey Various 40,000 Park Avenue, NW Boulevard to West Avenue Cumberland 1,150,000 Parkway Avenue (CR 634), Scotch Road (CR 611) to Route 31 (Pennington Road) Mercer 3,000,000 Paterson Plank Road (CR 681), Bridge over Route 3 at MP 10.04 Hudson 1,000,000 Pavement Preservation Various 8,000,000 Piaget Avenue, Bridge over Passaic-NY Branch Passaic 2,500,000 Planning and Research, Federal-Aid Various 38,511,096 Pre-Apprenticeship Training Program for Minorities and Women Various 500,000 Promoting Resilient Operations for Transformative, Efficient, and Cost-saving Transportation (PROTECT) Various 35,820,446 Quaker Neck Road (CR 657) Phase II Salem 150,000 Rail-Highway Grade Crossing Program, Federal Various 3,924,188 Rancocas Creek Greenway, State Route 130 Pedestrian Bridge and Trail Linkages Burlington 300,000 Reconstruction of South East Avenue Cumberland 75,000 Recreational Trails Program Various 1,226,757 Regional Transportation Demand Management (TDM) Program Various 50,000 Restriping Program & Line Reflectivity Management System Various 16,000,000 Resurfacing and Safety Improvements to Kings Highway/Salem Avenue (CR 551) Between Broad Street (SR 45) and Berkeley Road (CR 678) Gloucester 2,793,000 Resurfacing, Federal Various 35,000,000 Right of Way Full-Service Consultant Term Agreements Various 300,000 Route 1 NB, Bridge over Raritan River Middlesex 82,500,000 Route 1, over Forrestal Road Middlesex 2,000,000 Route 4, Bridge over Palisade Avenue, Windsor Road and CSX Railroad Bergen 74,100,000 Route 4, Grand Avenue Bridge Bergen 32,400,000 Route 4, Hackensack River Bridge Bergen 180,500,000 Route 4, Teaneck Road Bridge Bergen 1,100,000 Route 9 North, Ramp to Garden State Parkway North Middlesex 1,200,000 Route 9, Garden State Parkway to CR 559 (Mays Landing Road) Atlantic 500,000 Route 9/35, Main Street Interchange Middlesex 4,000,000 Route 15 NB, Bridge over Abandoned Mount Hope Mineral Railroad Morris 25,000,000 Route 18 NB, Bridge over Conrail Middlesex 21,600,000 Route 22, Bridge over NJT Raritan Valley Line Hunterdon 300,000 Route 23 and Route 94 Rockfall Mitigation, Hardyston Township Sussex 13,500,000 Route 23, High Crest Drive to Macopin River Passaic 19,700,000 Route 24, EB Ramp to CR 510 (Columbia Turnpike) Morris 1,500,000 Route 27 NB (Cherry Street), Bridge over Conrail Union 2,300,000 Route 29, Alexauken Creek Road to Washington Street Hunterdon 1,975,000 Route 30, Bridge over Newfound Thorofare Atlantic 375,000 Route 30, Cooper Street to Grove Street Camden 46,500,000 Route 30, Gibbsboro Road (CR 686) Camden 2,300,000 Route 30, Somerdale Road (CR 678) Camden 2,000,000 Route 31, Church Street (CR 650) to East Main Street/Flemington Junction Road Hunterdon 1,600,000 Route 33 Business, Bridge over Conrail Freehold Secondary Branch Monmouth 16,000,000 Route 34, Bridge over Big Brook Monmouth 2,000,000 Route 34, CR 537 to Washington Avenue, Pavement Monmouth, Middlesex 2,970,000 Route 35 NB, Bridge over Route 36 NB & GSP Ramp G Monmouth 1,000,000 Route 35, Bridge over North Branch of Wreck Pond Monmouth 10,000,000 Route 35, Osborne Avenue to Manasquan River & Old Bridge Road to Route 34 & Route 70 Ocean 1,900,000 Route 35, Route 66 to White Street/Obre Place Monmouth 1,100,000 Route 36, Bridge over Troutmans Creek Monmouth 7,900,000 Route 38, Nixon Drive to Route 295 Bridge Burlington 8,130,000 Route 41 and Deptford Center Road Gloucester 1,400,000 Route 45, Bridge over Woodbury Creek Gloucester 520,000 Route 46, Bridge over Paulins Kill Warren 33,505,000 Route 46, Route 80 Exit Ramp to Route 53 Morris 2,100,000 Route 47, Bridge over Menantico Creek Cumberland 16,400,000 Route 47, Henderson Avenue to High Street Cumberland 1,100,000 Route 47, Nummytown Mill Pond Dam Cape May 2,600,000 Route 50, Upper Bridge Road to Carl Road Cape May, Atlantic 9,800,000 Route 57, Bridge over Branch Lopatcong Creek Warren 2,500,000 Route 57, Bridge over Mill Brook Warren 2,500,000 Route 66, Jumping Brook Road to Bowne Road/Wayside Road Monmouth 10,150,000 Route 71, Bridge over NJ Transit (NJCL) Monmouth 2,000,000 Route 73 and Ramp G, Bridge over Route 130 Camden 2,000,000 Route 73, Church Road (CR 616) and Fellowship Road (CR 673) Intersections Burlington 20,000,000 Route 78, Bridge over Beaver Brook Hunterdon 1,050,000 Route 79, Route 9 to Route 34 (Middlesex Street) Monmouth 21,825,000 Route 80 EB, Retaining Wall Replacement, Hardwick and Knowlton Townships Warren 96,200,000 Route 80/15 Interchange Morris 4,000,000 Route 82, Rahway River Bridge Union 9,610,000 Route 94, Bridge over Jacksonburg Creek Warren 4,000,000 Route 94, Pleasant Valley Drive to Maple Grange Road Sussex 12,400,000 Route 130, Bridge over Main Branch of Newton Creek Camden 2,000,000 Route 130, Bridge over Millstone River Mercer, Middlesex 250,000 Route 130, CR 545 (Farnsworth Avenue) Burlington 11,100,000 Route 130/206, CR 528 (Crosswicks Road) to Route 206 at Amboy Road Burlington 500,000 Route 138, Garden State Parkway to Route 35 Monmouth 2,000,000 Route 173, CR 513 (Pittstown Road) to Beaver Avenue (CR 626) Hunterdon 1,100,000 Route 179, Bridge over Back Brook (Ringoes Creek) Hunterdon 2,400,000 Route 202, Bridge over North Branch of Raritan River Somerset 21,400,000 Route 202, First Avenue Intersection Improvements Somerset 8,100,000 Route 202, Old York Road (CR 637) Intersection Improvements Somerset 2,550,000 Route 202/206, over Branch of Peters Brook, Culvert Replacement at MP 27.96 Somerset 8,000,000 Route 206, Bridge over Dry Brook Sussex 2,150,000 Route 206, Bridge over Springers Brook Burlington 2,050,000 Route 206, South Broad Street Bridge over Assunpink Creek Mercer 4,006,000 Route 287, River Road & Easton Avenue Interchange Improvements Middlesex, Somerset 5,900,000 Route 295 SB Ramp K to CR 551, Bridge over Route 295 SB Salem 2,600,000 Route 295, Sloan Avenue (CR 649) to CR 583 (Princeton Pike) Mercer 7,000,000 Route 322, Bridge over Great Egg Harbor River Atlantic 360,000 Safe Routes to School Program Various 7,587,000 Safety Programs Various 16,458,490 Schalks Crossing Road Bridge (CR 683) Middlesex 43,000,000 School House Road, Bridge over Route 35 Monmouth 2,000,000 Seashore Road Phase 2 Resurfacing (CR 626) from Breakwater Road (CR 613) to Tabernacle Road (CR 647) Cape May 1,600,000 Sign Structure Rehabilitation/Replacement Program Various 1,000,000 Sign Structure Replacement Contract 2021-2 Various 4,600,000 SJTPO Carbon Reduction Program Various 903,534 SJTPO Future Projects Various 53,000 Somers Point - Mays Landing (CR 559); Pitney Road (CR 634) Atlantic 2,650,000 Specified Safety Program Various 2,000,000 State Police Enforcement and Safety Services Various 250,000 Statewide Traffic Operations and Support Program Various 17,000,000 Storm Water Asset Management Various 3,857,900 Telegraph Road (CR 540), Phase 2 Salem 1,500,000 Tennessee Avenue, Atlantic Avenue to Pacific Avenue Atlantic 650,000 Traffic Monitoring Systems Various 12,000,000 Training and Employee Development Various 2,500,000 Transportation Alternatives Program Various 23,515,947 Transportation and Community Development Initiative (TCDI) DVRPC Various 755,000 Transportation Management Associations Various 7,500,000 Transportation Operations Various 130,000 Transportation Systems Management and Operations (TSMO) Various 166,000 Tunnel Inspection, NTIS Various 300,000 Union Hill Road, Bridge over Route 9 Monmouth 2,500,000 Vegetation Safety Management Program Various 3,000,000 Youth Employment and TRAC Programs Various 350,000 62 Public Transportation Federal Highway Administration $75,000,000 Federal Transit Administration $766,746,594 Total Appropriation, Public Transportation $841,746,594 Federal Highway Administration Description County Amount Rail Rolling Stock Procurement Various $75,000,000 Federal Transit Administration Description County Amount Bus Acquisition Program Various 47,198,000 Bus Support Facilities and Equipment Various 33,596,196 Bus Vehicle and Facility Maintenance/Capital Maintenance Various 1,000,000 Cumberland County Bus Program Cumberland 1,020,000 Hudson-Bergen and Newark Light Rail Transit System Hudson 30,000,000 Light Rail Infrastructure Systems and Maintenance Various 10,000,000 Locomotive Overhaul Various 30,248,000 NEC Improvements Various 39,517,000 Other Rail Station/Terminal Improvements Various 44,028,000 Preventive Maintenance-Bus Various 105,314,804 Preventive Maintenance-Rail Various 228,685,195 Rail Fleet Overhaul Various 1,900,000 Rail Rolling Stock Procurement Various 107,215,372 Rail Support Facilities and Equipment Various 30,000,000 Section 5310 Program Various 11,915,000 Section 5311 Program Various 6,036,000 Technology Improvements Various 14,000,000 Transit Enhancements/Transportation Alternative Program (TAP)/Alternative Transit Improvements (ATI) Various 25,073,027 60 Transportation Programs 64 Regulation and General Management 05-6070 Multimodal Services $11,875,000 Total Appropriation, Regulation and General Management $11,875,000 Special Purpose: Motor Carrier Safety Assistance Program ($1,700,000) Development and Implementation Grant - Federal Transit Administration ($1,900,000) Airport Fund ($4,625,000) Boating Infrastructure Program (New Jersey Maritime Program) ($3,000,000) High Priority Innovative Technology Deployment (ITD) Grant ($650,000) Total Appropriation, Department of Transportation $2,799,613,844 82  DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 52 Economic Regulation 54-2008 Utility Regulation $12,828,000 54-2019 Utility Regulation $1,350,000 55-2004 Regulation of Cable Television $282,100,000 56-2014 Energy Resource Management $213,142,000 Total Appropriation, Economic Regulation $509,420,000 Services Other Than Personal ($309,570,000) Special Purpose: Pipeline Safety ($1,200,000) Damage Prevention Grant Program ($100,000) One Call Grant Program ($50,000) Climate Pollution Reduction Grant (CPRG) ($33,400,000) Solar for All Grant ($157,000,000) Energy Efficiency Conservation Block Grants ($2,500,000) Contractor Training (Formula - Training for Residential Energy Contractors) ($3,600,000) Energy Auditor Training (EAT) Grant Program ($2,000,000) 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 72 Governmental Review and Oversight 08-2066 Office of the State Comptroller $8,676,000 Total Appropriation, Governmental Review and Oversight $8,676,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($5,385,000) Employee Benefits ($3,066,000) Special Purpose: Medicaid ($225,000) 80 Special Government Services 82 Protection of Citizens Rights 58-2022 Mental Health Advocacy $223,000 81-2097 State Long-Term Care Ombudsman $2,290,000 Total Appropriation, Protection of Citizens Rights $2,513,000 Personal Services: Salaries and Wages ($1,053,000) Employee Benefits ($550,000) Special Purpose: Medicaid Reimbursement ($223,000) Ombudsman - Older Americans Act Title III ($347,000) Money Follows the Person Program - Elder Advocacy ($340,000) Total Appropriation, Department of the Treasury $520,609,000 98 THE JUDICIARY 10 Public Safety and Criminal Justice 15 Judicial Services 05-9730 Family Courts $44,484,000 07-9740 Probation Services $79,293,000 11-9760 Trial Court Services $5,239,000 Total Appropriation, Judicial Services $129,016,000 Special Purpose: Child Support and Paternity Program Title IV-D (Family Court) ($43,159,000) NJ State Court Improvement Grant ($1,000,000) State Access and Visitation Program ($325,000) Child Support and Paternity Program Title IV-D (Probation) ($79,293,000) Child Support and Paternity Program Title IV-D (Trial) ($5,239,000) Total Appropriation, The Judiciary $129,016,000 Total Appropriation, Federal Funds $27,501,993,844 Notwithstanding the provisions of any State law or regulation to the contrary, no State agency shall accept or expend federal funds except as appropriated by the Legislature or otherwise provided in this act. In addition to the federal funds appropriated in this act, there are appropriated the following federal funds, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting: emergency disaster aid funds including grants for preventive measures; pass-through grants to political subdivisions of the State over which the State is not permitted to exercise discretion in the use or distribution of the funds and for which no State matching funds are required; the first $500,000 of unanticipated grant awards plus an additional 25 percent of any remaining award amount that is greater than $500,000, and up to 25 percent of increases in previously anticipated grant awards for which no State matching funds are required except, for the purpose of this section, federal funds received by one executive agency that are ultimately expended by another executive agency shall not be considered pass-through grants; federal financial aid funds for students attending post-secondary educational institutions in excess of the amount specifically appropriated; and any such grants intended to prevent threats to homeland security up to 100 percent of previously anticipated or unanticipated grant award amounts for which no State matching funds are required, provided, however, that the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall notify the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer of such grants. For the purposes of federal funds appropriations, "political subdivisions of the State" means counties, municipalities, school districts, or agencies thereof, regional, county or municipal authorities, or districts other than interstate authorities or districts; "discretion" refers to any action in which an agency may determine either the amount of funds to be allocated or the recipient of the allocation; and "grants" refers to one-time, or time limited awards, which are received pursuant to submission of a grant application in competition with other grant applications. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year of federal funds are appropriated for the same purposes.  The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall inform the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer by November 1 of the current fiscal year of any unexpended balances which are continued. Officials from the appropriate executive agencies are hereby authorized to take such steps, if any, as may be necessary to qualify for, apply for, receive and expend such federal funds and to make such commitments, representations and other agreements as may be required by the federal government to receive federal funds under federal law authorizing the federal economic stimulus program or any other similar federal law. Furthermore, and notwithstanding the provisions of any other law or regulation to the contrary, officials from the appropriate executive agencies may encumber any of these federal funds appropriated pursuant to this provision prior to entering into any contract, grant or other agreement obligating the federal funds, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. In order to permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations and ensure the timely payment of claims to providers of medical services, amounts may be transferred to and from the various items of appropriation within the General Medical Services program classification, and within the federal matching funding, in the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services and Division of Disability Services in the Department of Human Services, and within the Medical Services for the Aged program classification, and within the federal matching funding, in the Division of Aging Services in the Department of Human Services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  Notice thereof shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, federal funds provided under the State Energy Program (SEP) and the Energy Efficiency and Conservation Block Grant Program (Block Grant Program), pursuant to the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Pub.L. 111-5, and any other similar type of federal stimulus law which may be hereinafter enacted (collectively referred to as ARRA), are appropriated. Subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting as set forth below, such appropriations are to include the administrative costs of the respective agencies in administering the specified programs provided such use is consistent with ARRA and federal approvals.  In the event that the administrative costs are not permitted to be paid from the ARRA monies received by the State, there is hereby appropriated from the Clean Energy Fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting such amounts as shall be necessary to pay for the administrative costs of the agencies administering the specified programs listed below.  Notwithstanding the specific appropriations made below, in the event that the federal funds received under ARRA are not in their entirety or in part allocated to the specific purposes listed below, to permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations, amounts may be transferred to and from the various items of the  appropriations listed below or may be used for such other purposes permitted under ARRA subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting and upon the recommendation of the State Treasurer.  The federal funds provided pursuant to ARRA with respect to the SEP shall be used only for purposes allowed under part D of Title III of the Energy Policy and Conservation Act (42 U.S.C. s.6321 et seq.), and the federal funds provided pursuant to ARRA with respect to the Block Grant Program shall be used only for implementation of programs authorized under subtitle E of Title V of the Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007 (42 U.S.C. s.17151 et seq.).  With respect to all federal funds which are appropriated pursuant to this provision, New Jersey Economic Development Authority (NJEDA), New Jersey Housing Mortgage Finance Agency (HMFA), the Office of Energy Savings, and the Board of Public Utilities (BPU) shall prepare and timely submit to the United States Department of Energy (USDOE) the reports required under subsection (c) of section 1512 of Pub.L. 111-5, including without limitation the detailed information required with respect to all projects or activities for which such federal funds were expended or obligated. a.  SEP. SEP monies received by the State under ARRA are hereby appropriated to the Clean Energy Fund and shall be allocated by the BPU as follows.  The BPU shall enter into memoranda of understanding with the applicable agencies listed below which memoranda of understanding shall provide for the transfer of such monies to the applicable agencies for the purposes listed below: (1) $14,216,606 to the NJEDA for a grant and loan program to be developed and administered by the NJEDA to fund public and private renewable energy, energy efficiency and alternative energy projects, with applications prioritized based on the ability to create jobs, reduce greenhouse gas emissions, save or create energy, and provide for innovative technology; (2) $20,187,801 for a program to be developed and administered by the BPU for grants to State departments, agencies, authorities and public colleges and universities for renewable and energy efficiency projects at such entities, including but not limited to, wind, solar, or hydro energy, biofuels, geothermal, and energy storage applications, with applications prioritized by an interagency evaluation team consisting of one representative each from each of the following, BPU, NJEDA, Office of Economic Growth, New Jersey Commission on Science and Technology, and the Office of Energy Savings, based on the ability to create jobs, reduce greenhouse gas emissions, save or create energy, and provide for innovative technology; (3) $9,110,306.50 to the HMFA for a program to be developed and administered by the HMFA to provide financing for the construction of solar energy projects on qualified multi-family housing financed through the HMFA, such funds to be leveraged with existing State energy rebate programs and the federal investment tax credit, with grants prioritized based on the ability to create jobs, generate energy, provide benefits to property residents and to meet HMFA timeframes, and with HMFA retaining ownership of all related solar renewable energy certificates for the purpose of establishing a revolving fund to support additional solar energy projects at HMFA-supported residential properties; (4) $1,331,402 to the HMFA for a low-interest loan program to be developed and administered by the HMFA for energy efficiency upgrades at single-family and multi-family facilities that are at or below 250 percent of the area median income (the higher of statewide or county median income) based on a family of four, and affordable multi-family housing owners which meet HMFA's affordability requirements, and which are not eligible for equivalent financing programs offered by the utilities or the Clean Energy Program; (5) $15,500,870.50 to the Clean Energy Program for energy efficiency programs administered by the BPU, to be issued to public and private entities on a first-come, first-served basis and specifically targeting customers who are either not currently eligible for Clean Energy Fund incentives or whose energy consumption patterns do not make them likely applicants; (6) $6,328,000 to the Office of Energy Savings in the Department of the Treasury for the purposes of energy efficiency and renewable energy programs and projects in State facilities, including State offices, State health facilities and State prisons; (7) $4,871,651 to the State Energy Office for implementing energy conservation measures in State-owned and operated facilities; and (8) $2,093,363 for grants administered by the BPU to State departments, agencies, authorities and public colleges and universities for energy efficient equipment purposes which will reduce energy demand and greenhouse gas emissions by replacing aging, energy intense equipment with new, more efficient models. In the event that any of the SEP monies appropriated pursuant to the preceding paragraph are not expended by the date required by the USDOE, the appropriations of such funds pursuant to the preceding paragraph are hereby cancelled, and such unexpended funds are hereby appropriated, subject to the approval of the USDOE and the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting to the New Jersey Department of the Treasury to establish a revolving energy efficiency project fund (Energy Efficiency Project Fund) for the purposes of funding energy efficiency and renewable energy programs and projects in State facilities, including but not limited to State offices, State health facilities and State prisons.  The monies appropriated from the Energy Efficiency Project Fund shall be repaid to the Energy Efficiency Project Fund by the department receiving such monies as follows: of the amounts hereinabove appropriated in this Act to each department receiving monies from the Energy Efficiency Project Fund, there is hereby appropriated for deposit in the Energy Efficiency Project Fund an amount equivalent to the annual repayment due to the Energy Efficiency Project Fund or the actual savings achieved, whichever is greater. b.  Block Grant Program.  Block Grant monies received by the State under ARRA are hereby appropriated as follows: (1) $4,160,700 to the Office of Energy Savings in the Department of the Treasury for the purposes of energy efficiency and renewable energy programs and projects in State facilities, including State offices, State health facilities and State prisons; and (2) $10,240,000 to the BPU for grants to cities, counties and other local units of government which are not eligible to receive directly from the federal government funds under the Block Grant Program. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall consider consistent with applicable federal law a formal association of community based organizations to be a "local consortium" for the purposes of receiving funding for the delivery of English as a Second Language or Civics education/training. In order to permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations and ensure the timely payment of claims to providers of medical services, amounts may be transferred among accounts in the Children's System of Care program classification.  Amounts may also be transferred to and from various items of appropriation within the General Medical Services program classification of the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services in the Department of Human Services and the Children's System of Care Services program classification in the Department of Children and Families. All such transfers are subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notice thereof shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. Out of the appropriations herein, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is empowered to approve payments to liquidate any unrecorded liabilities for materials delivered or services rendered in prior fiscal years, upon the written recommendations of any department head or the department head's designated representative.  The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall reject any recommendations for payment which the director deems improper. The federal grant funds hereinabove appropriated are subject to the following conditions: (1) in the event that an agency receiving the funds from the federal government requires a subgrantee account or accounts within the same agency or organization, the funds may be transferred to such subgrantee account, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting; and (2) in the event that the agency receiving the funds from the federal government enters into an agreement with another agency as the subgrantee of such federal funds, the funds may be transferred to such subgrantee agency, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notice thereof shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in order to permit flexibility in the management of federal grant funds, amounts appropriated or transferred from such federal funds to State departments as subgrantees of other State departments may be transferred back to an item of appropriation in the original grant recipient department upon completion of the funded activity, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  Notice thereof shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, regulation or Executive Order to the contrary, any purchase by the State or by a State agency or local government unit of equipment, goods or services related to homeland security and domestic preparedness, that is paid for or reimbursed by federal funds awarded by the U.S. Department of Homeland Security or other federal agency, appropriated in the current fiscal year, may be made through the receipt of public bids or as an alternative to public bidding and subject to the provisions of this paragraph, through direct purchase without advertising for bids or rejecting bids already received but not awarded. The equipment, goods or services purchased by a local government unit shall be referred to in the grant agreement issued by the State administrative agency administering such funds and shall be authorized by resolution of the governing body of the local government unit entering into the grant agreement.  Such resolution may, without subsequent action of the local governing body, simultaneously accept the grant from the State administrative agency, authorize the insertion of the revenue and offsetting appropriation in the budget of the local government unit, and authorize the contracting agent of the local government unit to procure the equipment, goods or services.  A copy of such resolution shall be filed with the chief financial officer of the local government unit, the State administrative agency and the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs.  Purchases made without public bidding shall be from vendors that shall either (1) be holders of a current State contract for the equipment, goods or services sought, or (2) be participating in a federal procurement program established by a federal department or agency, or (3) have been approved by the State Treasurer in consultation with the New Jersey Domestic Security Preparedness Task Force.  All homeland security purchases herein shall continue to be subject to all grant requirements and conditions approved by the State administrative agency.  The Director of the Division of Purchase and Property may enter into or participate in purchasing agreements with one or more other states, or political subdivisions or compact agencies thereof, for the purchase of such equipment, goods or services, using monies appropriated under this act, to meet the domestic preparedness and homeland security needs of this State.  Such purchasing agreement may provide for the sharing of costs and the methods of payments relating to such purchases.  Furthermore, a county government awarding a contract for Homeland Security equipment, goods or services, may, with the approval of the vendor, extend the terms and conditions of the contract to any other county government that wants to purchase under that contract, subject to notice and documentation requirements issued by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services. Of the amounts appropriated for Income Maintenance Management, amounts may be transferred to the various departments in accordance with the Division of Family Development's agreements, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  Any unobligated balances remaining from funds transferred to the departments shall be transferred back to the Division of Family Development subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the federal funds hereinabove appropriated to the Department of Transportation are subject to the following condition: in order to ensure the continued flow of necessary federal funds for important State and local transportation projects, in the event the Federal Highway Administration (FHWA) objects to the form of the departments request for submission of competitive bids or to the form or contents of related grant agreements funded with federal funds, the department shall make any changes to such requests or contracts as may be determined by the FHWA to be necessary to comply with federal law; and any other department, agency or authority affected by such action is required to take any further actions required in order for it to be in accordance with the changes required by FHWA. In order to permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations and ensure the timely payment of claims to providers of mental health and substance use disorder services, amounts may be transferred to and from the various items of appropriation and within the federal matching funding, within the General Medical Services program classification in the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services and the Community Services and Addiction Services program classifications in the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection d. of section 21 of P.L.1984, c.73 (C.27:1B-21), or any other law or regulation to the contrary, transfers among the Federal Highway Administration and the Federal Transit Administration federal appropriations by project, under the category of Public Transportation, shall not require approval by the Joint Budget Oversight Committee.  Notice of a transfer approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting pursuant to that section shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the federal funds hereinabove appropriated, there are appropriated to the appropriate executive agencies, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, such additional federal funds received during this fiscal year pursuant to any federal law authorizing a federal economic stimulus program or any other similar federal program for the purposes, projects, and programs set forth in such law; provided, however, that if the federal law does not delineate the specific purposes, projects, and programs to be funded by the federal funds, the purposes, projects, and programs to be funded by the federal funds shall be subject to the approval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee, and further provided, however, that the State Treasurer shall report to the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the General Assembly, the Chair of the Senate Budget and Appropriations Committee, and the Chair of the Assembly Budget Committee at least quarterly on the receipt and utilization of all additional federal funds received during this fiscal year pursuant to any federal law authorizing a federal economic stimulus program. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 2 of P.L.2021, c.200 (C.48:3-106.2) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the School and Small Business Energy Efficiency Stimulus Program Fund may be reallocated for any of the purposes set forth in P.L.2021, c.200 as determined by the President of the Board of Public Utilities, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Officials from the appropriate executive agencies are hereby authorized to take such steps, as may be necessary to qualify, apply, and file with the Internal Revenue Service for elective payment of applicable tax credits available to applicable entities under section 13801 of the federal Inflation Reduction Act of 2022, Public Law 117-169, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Any funds received by such executive agencies shall be deposited in the General Fund as State revenues. GENERAL PROVISIONS 2. All dedicated funds are hereby appropriated for their dedicated purposes. There are appropriated, subject to allotment by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting and with the approval of the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer, private contributions, revolving funds and dedicated funds received, receivable or estimated to be received for the use of the State or its agencies in excess of those anticipated, unless otherwise provided herein.  The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year of such funds, or any portion thereof, are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  In the event a person or entity wishes to make a monetary donation to the State for a particular purpose, the head of the State agency or department to which such monetary donation is made is hereby authorized to accept such monetary donation. 3. There are appropriated, subject to allotment by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, the following:  amounts required to refund amounts credited to the State Treasury which do not represent State revenue; amounts received representing insurance to cover losses by fire and other casualties and the unexpended balance at the end of the preceding fiscal year of such amounts; amounts received by any State department or agency from the sale of equipment, when such amounts are received in lieu of trade-in value in the replacement of such equipment; and amounts received in the State Treasury representing refunds of payments made from appropriations provided in this act. 4. There are appropriated, subject to allotment by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, amounts required to satisfy receivables previously established from which non-reimbursable costs and ineligible expenditures have been incurred. 5. There are appropriated, subject to allotment by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, from federal or other non-State sources amounts not to exceed the cost of services necessary to document and support retroactive claims. 6. There are appropriated such amounts as may be required to pay interest liabilities to the federal government as required by the Treasury/State agreement pursuant to the provisions of the "Cash Management Improvement Act of 1990," Pub. L. 101-453 (31 U.S.C. s.6501 et seq.), subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 7. There are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, from interest earnings of the various bond funds such amounts as may be necessary for the State to comply with the federal "Tax Reform Act of 1986," Pub. L. 99-514 (26 U.S.C. s.1 et seq. as amended), which requires issuers of tax-exempt debt obligations to rebate any arbitrage earnings to the federal government. 8. There are appropriated from the General Fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, such amounts as are necessary to pay interest, at the average rate of earnings during the fiscal year from the State's general investments, to those bond funds that have borrowed money from the General Fund or other bond funds and that have insufficient resources to accrue and pay the interest expense on such borrowing. 9. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated, such additional amounts as may be necessary are appropriated to fund the costs of the collection of debts, taxes and other fees and charges owed to the State, including but not limited to the services of auditors and attorneys and enhanced compliance programs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 10. There are appropriated from the Legal Services Fund established pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1996, c.52 (C.22A:2-51), for transfer to the General Fund as State revenue such amounts as are necessary to support the appropriations for the following programs contained in this act:  Legal Services of New Jersey grant, ten judgeships in the Judiciary, and for Clinical Legal Programs for the Poor at Rutgers Law School and Seton Hall University. 11. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the accounts of the several departments and agencies heretofore appropriated or established in the category of Additions, Improvements and Equipment are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 12. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Capital Construction accounts for all departments and agencies are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 13. Unless otherwise provided, unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in accounts of appropriations enacted subsequent to April 1 of the preceding fiscal year, are appropriated. 14. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in accounts that are funded by Interfund Transfers are appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 15. Notwithstanding any provisions in this act or the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year are appropriated without the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, except that the Legislative Branch of State government shall be exempt from this provision.  The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall notify the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer of those instances in which unexpended balances are not appropriated pursuant to this section. 16. The administrative costs of the Special Education Medicaid Initiative (SEMI) and the Medicaid Administrative Claiming (MAC) program, including the participation of a consultant, are appropriated and shall be paid from the revenue received, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 17. The following transfer of appropriations rules are in effect for the current fiscal year: a. To permit flexibility in the handling of appropriations, any department or agency that receives an appropriation by law, may, subject to the provisions of this section, or unless otherwise provided in this act, apply to the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting for permission to transfer funds from one item of appropriation to a different item of appropriation. For the purposes of this section, "item of appropriation" means the spending authority identified by an organization code, appropriation source, and program code, unique to the item. If the Director consents to the transfer, the amount transferred shall be credited by the Director to the designated item of appropriation and notice thereof shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. However, the Director, after consenting thereto, shall submit the following transfer requests to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer for legislative approval or disapproval unless otherwise provided in this act: (1) Requests for the transfer of State and other nonfederal funds, in amounts greater than $300,000, to or from any item of appropriation; (2) Requests for the transfer of State and other nonfederal funds, in amounts greater than $50,000, to or from any Special Purpose account, as defined by major object 5, or Grant account, as defined by major object 6, within an item of appropriation, from or to a different item of appropriation; (3) Requests for the transfer of State and other nonfederal funds, in amounts greater than $50,000, to or from any Special Purpose or Grant account in which the identifying organization code, appropriation source, and program code, remain the same, provided that the transfer would effect a change in the legislative intent of the appropriations; (4) Requests for the transfer of State funds, in amounts greater than $50,000, between items of appropriation in different departments or between items of appropriation in different appropriation classifications herein entitled as Direct State Services, Grants-In-Aid, State Aid, Capital Construction and Debt Service; (5) Requests for the transfer of federal funds, in amounts greater than $300,000, from one item of appropriation to another item of appropriation, if the amount of the transfer to an item in combination with the amount of the appropriation to that item would result in an amount in excess of the appropriation authority for that item, as defined by the program class; (6) Requests for such other transfers as are appropriate in order to ensure compliance with the legislative intent of this act. b. The Joint Budget Oversight Committee or its successor may review all transfer requests submitted for legislative approval and may direct the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer to approve or disapprove any such transfer request.  Transfers submitted for legislative approval pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection a. of this section shall be made only if approved by the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer at the direction of the committee. c. The Legislative Budget and Finance Officer shall approve or disapprove requests for the transfer of funds submitted for legislative approval within 10 working days of the physical receipt thereof and shall return them to the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  If any provision of this act or any supplement thereto requires the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer to approve or disapprove requests for the transfer of funds, the request shall be deemed to be approved by the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer if, within 20 working days of the physical receipt of the request, the officer has not disapproved the request and so notified the requesting officer.  However, this time period shall not pertain to any transfer request under review by the Joint Budget Oversight Committee or its successor, provided notice of such review has been given to the Director. d. No amount appropriated for any capital improvement shall be used for any temporary purpose except extraordinary snow removal or extraordinary transportation maintenance, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  However, an amount from any appropriation for an item of capital improvement may be transferred to any other item of capital improvement subject to the approval of the Director, and, if in an amount greater than $300,000, subject to the approval of the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer. e. The provisions of subsections a. through d. of this section shall not apply to appropriations made to the Legislative or Judicial branches of State government.  To permit flexibility in the handling of these appropriations, amounts may be transferred to and from the various items of appropriation by the appropriate officer or designee with notification given to the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting on the effective date thereof. f. Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, transfers to and from the Special Purpose appropriation to the Governor for emergency or necessity under the Other Interdepartmental Accounts program classification and transfers from the appropriations to the various accounts in the category of Salary Increases and Other Benefits, both in the Interdepartmental Accounts, shall not be subject to legislative approval or disapproval. 18. The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall make such correction of the title, text or account number of an appropriation necessary to make such appropriation available in accordance with legislative intent.  Such correction shall be by written ruling, reciting in appropriate detail the facts thereof, and reasons therefore, attested by the signature of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting and filed in the Division of Budget and Accounting of the Department of the Treasury as an official record thereof, and any action thereunder, including disbursement and the audit thereof, shall be legally binding and of full force and virtue. An official copy of each such written ruling shall be transmitted to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer, upon the effective date of the ruling. 19. The Legislative Budget and Finance Officer with the cooperation and assistance of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is authorized to adjust this appropriations bill to reflect any reorganizations which have been implemented since the presentation of the Governor's Budget Message and Recommendations that were proposed for this fiscal year. 20. None of the funds appropriated to the executive branch of State government for Information Processing, Development, Telecommunications, and Related Services and Equipment shall be available to pay for any of these services or equipment without the review of the Office of Information Technology, and compliance with Statewide policies and standards and an approved department Information Technology Strategic Plan. 21. If the amount provided in this act for a State Aid payment pursuant to formula is insufficient to meet the full requirements of the formula, all recipients of State Aid shall have their allocation proportionately reduced, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 22. When the duties or responsibilities of any department or branch, except for the Legislature and any of its agencies, are transferred to any other department or branch, it shall be the duty of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting and the Director is hereby empowered to transfer funds appropriated for the maintenance and operation of any such department or branch to such department or branch as shall be charged with the responsibility of administering the functions so transferred.  The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall have the authority to create such new accounts as may be necessary to carry out the intent of the transfer.  Information copies of such transfers shall be transmitted to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer upon the effective date thereof.  If such transfers may be required among appropriations made to the Legislature and its agencies, the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer, subject to the approval of the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the General Assembly, is hereby empowered and it shall be that officer's duty to effect such transactions hereinabove described and to notify the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting upon the effective date thereof. 23. The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is empowered and it shall be the Directors duty in the disbursement of funds for payment of expenses classified as salary increases and other benefits, employee benefits, debt service, rent, telephone, data processing, motor pool, insurance, travel, postage, lease payments on equipment purchases, additions, improvements and equipment, and compensation awards, to credit or transfer to the Department of the Treasury, to an Interdepartmental account, or to the General Fund, as applicable, from any other department, branch or non-State fund source out of funds appropriated or credited thereto, such amounts as may be required to cover the costs of such payment attributable to such other department, branch or non-State fund source, or to reimburse the Department of the Treasury, an Interdepartmental account, or the General Fund for reductions made representing Statewide savings in the above expense classifications, as the Director shall determine. With respect to payment of expenses classified as utilities and maintenance contracts, the Director is empowered and it shall be the Director's duty in the disbursement of funds to credit or transfer to the Department of the Treasury, to an Interdepartmental account, or to the General Fund, as applicable, from any other department or non-State fund source, but not from the Legislature or the Judiciary, out of funds appropriated or credited thereto, such amounts as may be required to cover the costs of such payment attributable to such other department or non-State fund source, or to reimburse the Department of the Treasury, an Interdepartmental account, or the General Fund for reductions made representing Statewide savings in these expense classifications, as the Director shall determine. Receipts in any non-State funds are appropriated for the purpose of such transfer. 24. The Governor is empowered to direct the State Treasurer to transfer from any State department to any other State department such amounts as may be necessary for the cost of any emergency occasioned by aggression, civil disturbance, sabotage, or disaster.  In addition, there are appropriated such additional amounts as may be necessary for emergency repairs and reconstruction of State facilities or property, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting and the Joint Budget Oversight Committee (JBOC).  Appropriations referred to JBOC shall be deemed approved, unless a resolution of disapproval is adopted within 10 working days of receipt of notification of the proposed appropriation. 25. Upon request of any department receiving non-State funds, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is empowered to transfer such funds from that department to other departments as may be charged with the responsibility for the expenditure thereof. 26. The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is empowered to transfer or credit appropriations to any State agency for services provided, or to be provided, by that agency to any other agency or department; provided further, however, that funds have been appropriated or allocated to such agency or department for the purpose of purchasing these services. 27. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, should appropriations in the Property Tax Relief Fund exceed available revenues, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is authorized to transfer General Fund unreserved, undesignated fund balances into the Property Tax Relief Fund, providing unreserved, undesignated fund balances are available from the General Fund, as determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 28. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, should appropriations in the Casino Revenue Fund exceed available revenues, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is authorized to transfer General Fund unreserved, undesignated fund balances into the Casino Revenue Fund, providing unreserved, undesignated fund balances are available from the General Fund, as determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 29. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1954, c.48 (C.52:34-6 et seq.), amounts appropriated for services for the various State departments and agencies may be expended for the purchase of contract services from the New Jersey Sea Grant Consortium or the New Jersey Community College Consortium for Workforce and Economic Development as if each were a State government agency pursuant to subsection (a) of section 5 of P.L.1954, c.48 (C.52:34-10). 30. Out of the amounts hereinabove appropriated, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is empowered to approve payment of obligations applicable to prior fiscal years, upon the written recommendation of any department head, or the department head's designated representative.  The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall reject any recommendations for payment which the Director deems improper. 31. Whenever any county, municipality, school district, college, university, or a political subdivision thereof withholds funds from a State agency, or causes a State agency to make payment on behalf of a county, municipality, school district, college, university or a political subdivision thereof, then the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting may withhold State aid or grant payments and transfer the same as payment for such funds, as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. 32. The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is empowered to establish revolving and dedicated funds as required.  Notice of the establishment of such funds shall be transmitted to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer upon the effective date thereof. 33. The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting may, upon application therefore, allot from appropriations made to any official, department, commission or board, an amount to establish a petty cash fund for the payment of expenses under rules and regulations established by the Director. Allotments thus made by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall be paid to such person as shall be designated as the custodian thereof by the official, department, commission or board making a request therefore, and the money thus allotted shall be disbursed by such custodian who shall require a receipt therefore from all persons obtaining money from the fund.  The Director shall make regulations governing disbursement from petty cash funds. 34. From appropriations to the various departments of State government, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is empowered to transfer amounts sufficient to pay any obligation due and owing in any other department or agency. 35. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the State Treasurer may transfer from any fund in the State Treasurer's custody, deposited with the State Treasurer pursuant to law, sufficient amounts to enable payments from any appropriation made herein for any obligations due and owing. Any such transfer shall be restored out of the taxes or other revenue received in the Treasury in support of this act.  Except for transfers from the several funds established pursuant to statutes that provide for interest earnings to accrue to those funds, all such transfers shall be without interest.  If the statute provides for interest earnings, it shall be calculated at the average rate of earnings during the fiscal year from the State's general investments and such amounts as are necessary shall be appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 36. Any qualifying State Aid appropriation, or part thereof, made from the General Fund may be transferred and recorded as an appropriation from the Property Tax Relief Fund, as deemed necessary by the State Treasurer, in order that the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting may warrant the necessary payments; provided, however, that the available unreserved, undesignated fund balance in the Property Tax Relief Fund, as determined by the State Treasurer, is sufficient to support the expenditure. 37. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this act, the State Treasurer, upon warrant of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, shall pay any claim not exceeding $4,000 out of any appropriations made to the several departments, provided such claim is recommended for payment by the head of such department.  The Legislative Budget and Finance Officer shall be notified of the amount and description of any such claim at the time such payment is made.  Any claimant who has presented a claim not exceeding $4,000, which has been denied or not recommended by the head of such department, shall be precluded from presenting said claim to the Legislature for consideration. 38. Unless otherwise provided, federal grant and project receipts representing reimbursement for agency and central support services, indirect and administrative costs, as determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, shall be transmitted to the Department of the Treasury for credit to the General Fund; provided, however, that a portion of the indirect and administrative cost recoveries received which are in excess of the amount anticipated may be reclassified into a dedicated account and returned to State departments and agencies, as determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, who shall notify the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer of the amount of such funds returned, the departments or agencies receiving such funds and the purpose for which such funds will be used, within 10 working days of any such transaction.  Such receipts shall be forwarded to the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting upon completion of the project or at the end of the fiscal year, whichever occurs earlier. 39. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, each local school district that participates in the Special Education Medicaid Initiative (SEMI) shall receive a percentage of the federal revenue realized for current year claims.  The percentage share shall be 17.5 percent of claims approved by the State by June 30. The impact of federal claim adjustments may be charged against current year revenue disbursements, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 40. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, each local school district that participates in the Medicaid Administrative Claiming (MAC) initiative shall receive a percentage of the federal revenue realized for current year claims.  The percentage share shall be 17.5 percent of claims approved by the State by June 30. 41. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1943, c.188 (C.52:14-17.1 et seq.), the rate of reimbursement for mileage allowed for employees traveling by personal automobile on official business shall be $0.47 per mile. 42. State agencies shall prepare and submit a copy of their agency or departmental budget requests for the next ensuing fiscal year to the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting by the deadline and in the manner required by the Director.  In addition, State agencies shall prepare and submit a copy of their spending plans involving all State, federal and other non-State funds to the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting and the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer by November 1, and updated spending plans on February 1 and May 1 of this fiscal year.  The spending plans shall account for any changes in departmental spending which differ from this appropriations act and all supplements to this act.  The spending plans shall be submitted on forms specified by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 43. The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall provide the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer with copies of all BB-4s, Application for non-State Funds, and accompanying project proposals or grant applications, which require a State match and that may commit or require State support after the grant's expiration. 44. In order to provide effective cash flow management for revenues and expenditures of the General Fund and the Property Tax Relief Fund in the implementation of this annual appropriations act, there are appropriated from the General Fund such amounts as may be required to pay the principal of and interest on tax and revenue anticipation notes including notes in the form of commercial paper (hereinafter collectively referred to as short-term notes), together with any costs or obligations relating to the issuance thereof or contracts related thereto, according to the terms set forth hereinabove.  Provided further that, to the extent that short-term notes are issued for cash flow management purposes in connection with the Property Tax Relief Fund, there are appropriated from the Property Tax Relief Fund such amounts as may be required to pay the principal of those short-term notes. 45. The State Treasurer is authorized to issue short-term notes, which notes shall not constitute a general obligation of the State or a debt or a liability within the meaning of the State Constitution, and the State Treasurer is authorized to pay any costs or obligations relating to the issuance of such short-term notes or contracts relating thereto.  Such short-term notes shall be issued in such amounts and at such times as the State Treasurer shall deem necessary for the above stated purposes and for the payment of related costs, and on such terms and conditions, sold in such manner and at such prices, bearing interest at such fixed or variable rate or rates, renewable at such time or times, and entitled to such security, and using such paying agents as shall be determined by the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer is authorized to enter into such contracts and to take such other actions, all as determined by the State Treasurer to be appropriate to carry out the above cash flow management purposes.  The State Treasurer shall give consideration to New Jersey-based vendors in entering into such contracts.  Whenever the State Treasurer issues such short-term notes, the State Treasurer shall report on each such issuance to the Chair of the Senate Budget and Appropriations Committee and the Chair of the Assembly Appropriations Committee. 46. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 29 of P.L.1983, c.303 (C.52:27H-88), or any law or regulation to the contrary, interest earned in the current fiscal year on balances in the Enterprise Zone Assistance Fund, shall be credited to the General Fund. 47. There is appropriated $140,000 from the Casino Simulcasting Fund for transfer to the Casino Revenue Fund. 48. In all cases in which language authorizes the appropriation of additional receipts not to exceed a specific amount, and the specific amount is insufficient to cover the amount due for fringe benefits and indirect costs, there are appropriated from receipts such additional amounts as are required to fully cover the amount due for fringe benefits and indirect costs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 49. There are appropriated, from receipts from any structured financing transaction, such amounts as may be necessary to satisfy any obligation incurred in connection with any structured financing agreement, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  In addition, there are appropriated such amounts as may be necessary to pay costs incurred in connection with any proposed structured financing transaction, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 50. Notwithstanding the provisions of any departmental language or statute, receipts in excess of those anticipated or appropriated as provided in the Departmental Revenue Statements (BB-103s) in the budget submission for this fiscal year are not available for expenditure until a comprehensive expenditure plan is submitted to and approved by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 51. There are appropriated such additional amounts as may be required to pay the amount of any civil penalty imposed on a State officer, employee or custodian pursuant to section 12 of P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-11), as recommended by the Attorney General and as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. 52. Receipts from the provision of copies and other materials related to compliance with section 12 of P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-11), are appropriated for the purpose of offsetting agency and departmental expenses of complying with the public access law, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 53. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there is appropriated from the Universal Service Fund $67,650,000 for transfer to the General Fund as State revenue. 54. Any qualifying State Aid or Grants-In-Aid appropriation, or part thereof, made from the General Fund may be transferred and recorded as an appropriation from the Casino Revenue Fund, as deemed necessary by the State Treasurer, in order that the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting may warrant the necessary payments; provided, however, that the available unreserved, undesignated fund balance in the Casino Revenue Fund, as determined by the State Treasurer, is sufficient to support the expenditure. 55. In addition to the amounts herein appropriated for University Hospital, there are appropriated such additional amounts as are necessary to maintain the core operating functions of the hospital, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 56. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for the University Behavioral Healthcare Centers (UBHC) - Rutgers, the State University - Newark and Piscataway are first charged to the federal disproportionate share hospital reimbursements anticipated as Medicaid uncompensated care, and, as a condition for such appropriation, Rutgers, the State University - New Brunswick shall be required to provide fiscal reports to the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services and the Office of the State Comptroller, including all applicable expenses incurred for programs supported in whole or in part with the above appropriations, as well as all applicable revenues generated from the provision of such program services, as well as any other revenues used to support such services, in such a format and frequency as required by the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services. In addition, the annual audit report and Consolidated Financial Statements for Rutgers, the State University - New Brunswick must include supplemental schedules of Statements of Net Assets and Statements of Revenue, Expenses and Changes in Net Assets for the two UBHC Centers separately and UBHC as a whole. 57. With the exception of disproportionate share hospital revenues that may be received, federal and other funds received for the operation of the University Behavioral Healthcare Centers at Newark and Piscataway are appropriated to Rutgers, the State University - New Brunswick for the operation of the centers. 58. Provided that each of the contributions made during the current fiscal year by University Hospital, Rutgers, the State University and Rowan University and each of their affiliates to the University Hospital Self-Insurance Reserve Fund, the Rutgers University Self-Insurance Reserve Fund or the Rowan University Self-Insurance Reserve Fund, respectively, are equal to the respective amounts established in memoranda of agreements between the Department of the Treasury and each of University Hospital, Rutgers, the State University, and Rowan University and, if after such amounts having been contributed, the receipts deposited within the applicable University Hospital Self-Insurance Reserve Fund, the Rutgers University Self-Insurance Reserve Fund, and the Rowan University Self-Insurance Reserve Fund, respectively, are insufficient to pay claims expenditures, there are appropriated from the General Fund to the applicable University Hospital Self-Insurance Reserve Fund, the Rutgers University Self-Insurance Reserve Fund or the Rowan University Self-Insurance Reserve Fund such amounts as may be necessary to pay the remaining claims for the respective institutions, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 59. In addition to any amounts hereinabove appropriated to pay debt service on bonds, notes and other obligations by the various independent authorities, payment of which is to be made by the State subject to appropriation pursuant to a contract with the State Treasurer or pursuant to a lease with a State department, there are hereby appropriated such additional amounts as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine are required to pay all amounts due from the State pursuant to such contracts or leases, as applicable. 60. Such amounts as may be required to initiate the implementation of information systems development or modification during the current fiscal year to support fees, fines or other revenue enhancements, or to initiate cost savings or budget efficiencies that are to be implemented during the subsequent fiscal year, and that are proposed in the Governor's Budget Message and Recommendations for the subsequent fiscal year, shall be transferred between appropriate accounts, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 61. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, no funding shall be provided by any program supported in part or in whole by State funding for erectile dysfunction medications for individuals who are registered on New Jersey's Sex Offender Registry. 62. For the purposes of the "State Appropriations Limitation Act," P.L.1990, c.94 (C.52:9H-24 et seq.), the amounts appropriated to the developmental centers in the Department of Human Services due to opportunities for increased recoveries, amounts carried forward in the State Employees' Health Benefits accounts, and amounts representing balances deemed available in the State Health Benefits Fund shall be deemed a "Base Year Appropriation" and, notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1990, c.94 (C.52:9H-24 et seq.) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, in recognition of the historically unprecedented pension payments being made and required to be made by the State, and consistent with the budget cap methodology applicable to New Jersey municipalities, for purposes of calculating the maximum annual appropriation for direct state services, the term appropriations shall not include amounts appropriated for State contributions to the pension systems.  If funding included in this act for Salary Increases and Other Benefits - Executive Branch is less than $155,500,000, there is appropriated sufficient funding to total $155,500,000.  For the purposes of the "State Appropriations Limitation Act," P.L.1990, c.94 (C.52:9H-24 et seq.), any funding provided less than $155,500,000 shall be deemed a "Base Year Appropriation." 63. The amounts hereinabove appropriated for employee fringe benefits in Interdepartmental Direct State Services and Grants-In-Aid, Department of Education State Aid, and Department of the Treasury State Aid may be transferred between accounts for the same purposes, as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine. 64. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.2004, c.68 (C.34:1B-21.16 et seq.) or any law or regulation to the contrary, funds remaining in the Dedicated Cigarette Tax Revenue Fund at the end of the current fiscal year are appropriated from such fund for transfer to the General Fund as State revenue. 65. Unless otherwise provided in this act, all unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year that are appropriated by this act are appropriated for the same purpose. 66. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 14 of Article 3 of P.L.1944, c.112 (C.52:27B-23) or any law or regulation to the contrary, copies of the budget message shall be made available to the State Library, public libraries, newspapers and citizens of the State only through the State of New Jersey website. 67. There are appropriated such amounts as are necessary, not to exceed $750,000, to fund costs incurred by the State, including attorneys' costs, in connection with arbitration/litigation relating to claims by participating tobacco manufacturers that they are entitled to reductions in payments they make under the Tobacco Master Settlement Agreement, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 68. The Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting is empowered and it shall be the Director's duty in the disbursement of funds for payment of expenses classified as debt service, to credit or transfer among the various departments, as applicable, out of funds appropriated or credited thereto for debt service payments, such amounts as may be required to cover the costs of such payment attributable to debt service or to reimburse the various departments for reductions made representing Statewide savings resulting from bond retirements or defeasances in debt service accounts, as the Director shall determine. If the Director consents to the transfer, the amount transferred shall be credited by the Director to the designated item of appropriation and notice thereof shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. 69. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in accounts that provide matching State funds in the various departments and agencies are appropriated in order to provide State authority to match federal grants that have project periods extending beyond the current State fiscal year. 70. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, it is not possible in the current fiscal year to appropriate monies to fund all programs authorized or required by statute.  As a result, the Governor's Budget Message and Recommendations for the current fiscal year recommended, and the Legislature agrees, that either no State funding or less than the statutorily required amount be appropriated for certain of these statutory programs.  To the extent that these or other statutory programs have not received all or some appropriations for the current fiscal year in this act which would be required to carry out these statutory programs, such lack of appropriations represents the intent of the Legislature to suspend in full or in part the operation of the statutory programs, including any statutorily imposed restrictions or limitations on the collection of State revenue that is related to the funding of those programs. 71. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 21 of P.L.1983, c.303 (C.52:27H-80), or any other law or regulation to the contrary, crediting of revenues to each account for each enterprise zone in the Enterprise Zone Assistance Fund shall be reduced by the amount of revenues credited from the General Fund into a special account in the Property Tax Relief Fund pursuant to subparagraph b. of paragraph 7 of Section I of Article VIII of the New Jersey Constitution derived from sales tax collected in such enterprise zone. 72. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, there is appropriated as revenue to the General Fund the revenue credited to the Enterprise Zone Assistance Fund by section 29 of P.L.1983, c.303 (C.52:27H-88) in excess of the amounts appropriated to each account for each enterprise zone attributable to local projects and the local costs for administering the Urban Enterprise Zone program, as defined by section 29 of P.L.1983, c.303 (C.52:27H-88). 73. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 16 of Article 3 of P.L.1944, c.112 (C.52:27B-25), or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall not be required to allot appropriations on a quarterly basis. 74. The funding by a State department in the Executive Branch for a contract for drug screening tests or other laboratory screening tests shall be conditioned upon the following provision: the State department as part of the contract procurement and award process shall notify the Department of Health (DOH) of the proposed contract and provide an opportunity for DOH to submit a proposal, provided, however, the State department shall not be required to make the award to DOH if DOH is the lowest bidder as factors other than cost may be considered in the evaluation of the proposals, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 75. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated to the New Jersey Real Estate Commission, Civil Service Commission, State Athletic Control Board, Public Employment Relations Commission and Appeal Board, New Jersey State Board of Mediation, New Jersey Racing Commission, Council on Local Mandates, Garden State Preservation Trust, the various State professional boards, the Certified Psychoanalysts Advisory Committee and the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Advisory Committee in the Department of Law and Public Safety, shall be subject to the following conditions:  1) the base salary, per diem salary, or any other form of compensation, including that for expenses, for the board members or commissioners paid for out of State funds shall not exceed $100 per month; and 2) no State funds shall be used to pay for participation in the State Health Benefits Program by board members or commissioners.  No other compensation shall be paid; provided, however, that this paragraph shall not apply to the Commissioner/Chief Executive Officer of the State Athletic Control Board, the Chairperson/Chief Executive Officer of the Civil Service Commission, the Chairperson of the Public Employment Relations Commission, and any commissioner or board member of any other State board, commission or independent authority who, in addition to being a member of the board or commission also hold a full time staff position for such entity. 76. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, of the amounts hereinabove appropriated no grant funds shall be paid to a grantee for the costs of any efforts by the grantee or on behalf of the grantee for lobbying activities. 77. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection c. of section 145 of P.L.1977, c.110 (C.5:12-145) and section 22 of P.L.1970, c.13 (C.5:9-22) or any law or regulation to the contrary, such amounts as are required are appropriated to the State Treasurer to publish via the internet reports accounting for the total revenues received in the Casino Revenue Fund and the State Lottery Fund and the specific amounts of money appropriated therefrom for specific expenditures during the preceding fiscal year ending June 30. 78. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, and in furtherance of the purposes of P.L.2010, c.104 (C.48:23-18 et al.), there are hereby appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, such amounts as are necessary for the operation of the New Jersey Public Broadcasting Authority (NJPBA) as required by the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) to maintain the FCC licenses owned by the NJPBA, to oversee any agreements with private operators, and to carry out any other duties and responsibilities that the NJPBA has under P.L.2010, c.104 (C.48:23-18 et al.) and as the FCC licensee of broadcast stations, including the costs of employees, office space, equipment, consultants, professional advisors including lawyers, and any other costs determined to be necessary to carry out the NJPBA mission under P.L.2010, c.104 (C.48:23-18 et al.) consistent with FCC requirements. 79. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 5 and 6 of P.L.1990, c.44 (C.52:9H-18 and C.52:9H-19) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the balance in the Surplus Revenue Fund may be transferred to the General Fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 80. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in order to implement the provisions of the Comprehensive Medicaid Waiver as approved on October 2, 2012 by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services' Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS), as well as any amendments, extensions, renewals, or supplements to the Comprehensive Medicaid Waiver (collectively referred to as Waiver): The Commissioner of Human Services shall implement immediately those provisions contained in the Comprehensive Medicaid Waiver approved by the United States Department of Health and Human Services for the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) and any amendments to such waiver as CMS requires to be implemented pursuant to such waiver and amounts may be transferred to and from various items of appropriation within the General Medical Services and the Health Services Administration and Management program classification of the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services in the Department of Human Services; the Community Services and Addiction Services program classifications in the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services in the Department of Human Services; the Disability Services program classification in the Division of Disability Services in the Department of Human Services; the Purchased Residential Care, Social Supervision and Consultation, and Adult Activities program classifications in the Division of Developmental Disabilities in the Department of Human Services; the Medical Services for the Aged program classification in the Division of Aging Services in the Department of Human Services; and the Children's System of Care program classification in the Division of Children's System of Care in the Department of Children and Families, and any other program classifications associated with any other department, division, authority, or public college or university necessary to support implementation of the Waiver. A portion of receipts generated or savings realized in Medical Assistance Grants-In-Aid accounts from Waiver initiatives may be transferred to the Health Services Administration and Management accounts in the Department of Human Services, as determined by the Commissioner of Human Services to be required to fund costs incurred in realizing these additional receipts or savings. All such transfers are subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. Notice of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting's approval shall be provided to the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer on the effective date of the approved transfer. 81. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated to the Department of Human Services, the Department of Children and Families, and the Department of Health are conditioned upon the following provision: In order to ensure federal participation, the States NJ FamilyCare program shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of the State plan(s) or the Comprehensive Medicaid Waiver, as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, that are or were inserted by the Department into the State plan(s) or the Comprehensive Medicaid Waiver in order to comply with Pub.L. 111-148, Pub.L. 111-152, or with any federal regulations adopted pursuant thereto. 82. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the amounts hereinabove appropriated, to the extent not inconsistent with federal law or regulation, are subject to the following conditions: (1) in recognition of the limited continuing availability of federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act (ARRA), Pub.L. 111-5, funding and the pending federal deadlines for spending such funds or else forfeiting them back to the federal government, to the maximum extent possible, all available federal ARRA dollars uncommitted as of the effective date of this act shall be spent first, wherever available, in support of qualifying activities before any appropriated State dollars are expended for the same purpose or purposes; and (2) in the event that ARRA dollars are available for use, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting may reserve an amount of excess appropriated State funds. 83. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 8 of P.L.1992, c.160 (C.26:2H-18.58) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, an amount not to exceed $1,193,135,000 as determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, is appropriated from the Health Care Subsidy Fund to the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services to fund Medical Coverage - Title XIX Parents and Children in the General Medical Services program classification. 84. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, proceeds received from the sale of surplus State-owned real property deposited into the State-owned Real Property Fund pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2007, c.108 (C.52:31-1.3b) are appropriated for deposit into the General Fund as State revenue, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting; proceeds received in connection with asset value optimization initiatives other than the sale of surplus State-owned real property are appropriated to support State obligations to the retirement systems, consistent with federal law and regulation, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Department of the Treasury, there are appropriated such additional amounts as are necessary to pay for costs associated with implementing asset value optimization initiatives. 85. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for environmental protection, there are appropriated such additional amounts as the Commissioner of Environmental Protection and the President of the Board of Public Utilities may determine to be necessary to ensure that the State of New Jersey rejoins the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative in an expeditious manner, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 86. Payments to the various State defined pension systems from amounts appropriated herein shall be made on a quarterly basis on the following schedule: at least 25 percent by September 30, at least 50 percent by December 31, at least 75 percent by March 31, and at least 100 percent by June 30, and shall be reduced by any increase in the interest on tax and revenue anticipation notes attributable to the need to borrow more for the purpose of making such quarterly installments for transfer to the Interest on Short Term Notes account in the Interdepartmental Accounts. 87. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 17 of this act to the contrary, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting may establish accounts and transfer amounts appropriated to the Preserve New Jersey Green Acres Fund, Preserve New Jersey Blue Acres Fund, Preserve New Jersey Farmland Preservation Fund, and the Preserve New Jersey Historic Preservation Fund pursuant to the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.), as amended by P.L.2019, c.136, in a manner that is consistent with the provisions of the act and acts appropriating monies to these funds. The transfer of amounts shall be subject to the approval or disapproval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee (JBOC).  If JBOC does not disapprove a transfer within ten days of notification, the transfer shall be deemed approved.  The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in these accounts are appropriated for the same purpose. 88. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, in order to achieve cost savings, improve timeliness, and minimize fraud, State agencies may obtain employment and income information from a third-party commercial consumer reporting agency, in accordance with the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. s.1681 et seq., for the purpose of obtaining real-time employment and income information to help determine program eligibility. 89. Notwithstanding the provisions of any State bidding or procurement laws to the contrary, except for the provisions of P.L.2005, c.51 (C.19:44A-20.13 et seq.) and P.L.1975, c.127 (C.10:5-31 et seq.), and to take advantage of cost-savings and efficiencies, any funds appropriated to any State department that may otherwise be expended on advertising shall be available for the purchase of public education programming, public service announcements, public awareness and education messaging, and advertising from the providers to the same or their non-profit trade associations. 90. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, such amounts as may be necessary for costs required to implement the State Lottery Law, P.L.1970, c.13 (C.5:9-1 et seq.) and for payment of commissions, prizes, and expenses of developing and implementing games pursuant to section 7 of P.L.1970, c.13 (C.5:9-7) shall be charged to the operations account as established pursuant to subsection c. of section 6 of P.L.2017, c.98 (C.5:9-22.10) within Common Pension Fund L as established pursuant to subsection a. of section 6 of P.L.2017, c.98 (C.5:9-22.10) for the term of the lottery contribution authorized pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2017, c.98 (C.5:9-22.8). 91. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, and in furtherance of the purposes of the Lottery Enterprise Contribution Act, P.L.2017, c.98 (C.5:9-22.5 et al.), there are hereby appropriated, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, such amounts as are necessary to implement the Lottery Enterprise Contribution Act, including the costs of consultants, professional advisors including lawyers, and any other costs determined to be necessary to implement the Lottery Enterprise Contribution Act, P.L.2017, c.98 (C.5:9-22.5 et al.). 92. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, with the approval of the State Treasurer, shall provide that appropriations from the State General Fund be transferred and recorded as appropriations from the Property Tax Relief Fund to reflect the amounts as deemed necessary by the State Treasurer to offset the loss of the proceeds derived from the lottery contribution reallocated pursuant to P.L.2017, c.98 (C.5:9-22.5 et al.) from the State General Fund to Common Pension Fund L. Provided however, that any transfer shall take effect 20 days after written notice thereof is provided to the Joint Budget Oversight Committee, if the committee takes no action disapproving a transfer.  Any appropriation shifted from the State General Fund to the Property Tax Relief Fund pursuant to this provision shall be appropriated in a manner consistent with the provisions of Article VIII, Section I, paragraph 7 of the New Jersey Constitution and the Director may warrant the necessary payments from the Property Tax Relief Fund, provided further, however, that all available unreserved, undesignated fund balance in the Property Tax Relief Fund as determined by the State Treasurer shall be used to support the appropriations. 93. Any funds that may be received by the State of New Jersey from the Environmental Mitigation Trust established in partial settlement of In re: Volkswagen Clean Diesel Marketing, Sales Practices and Products Liability Litigation, Case No: MDL No. 2672 CRB (JSC) (N.D. Cal.) are appropriated solely for projects which are eligible mitigation actions consistent with the terms of the trust agreement.  Such projects shall be selected by the Department of Environmental Protection, as the lead agency previously designated by the Governor and shall be selected from among the categories of eligible mitigation actions described in the Environmental Mitigation Trust Agreement.  Any funds received from the Trustee for projects to be administered by State departments shall be deposited in a separate non-lapsing fund to be known as the Volkswagen Environmental Mitigation Fund, and are appropriated solely for projects which are eligible mitigation actions consistent with the terms of the trust agreement and may include administrative costs in such amounts that are consistent with the terms of the trust agreement, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  Any projects administered by State departments which will award grants through new or existing grant programs will award such grants on a competitive basis, using criteria determined by the Department of Environmental Protection. 94. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, amounts deposited into the Energy Tax Receipts Property Tax Relief Fund pursuant to P.L.1997, c.167 (C.52:27D-438 et al.) are appropriated to the General Fund as State revenue. 95. The unexpended balances at the end of the preceding fiscal year in the Expanded Addiction Initiatives line item in the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services in the Department of Human Services and the various accounts in the Departments of Children and Families, Corrections, Community Affairs, Education, Health, Human Services, Labor and Workforce Development, and Law and Public Safety reallocated from the Expanded Addiction Initiatives line item in the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services in the Department of Human Services for anti-opioid initiatives, including, but not limited to, Integrated Population Health Data Project, Health Information Technology, Alternatives to Opioid Program, Syringe Access Programs, Single License for Primary Care, and other similar accounts, are appropriated for the same purpose and may be transferred among the same accounts, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 96. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.2006, c.43, or any other law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Health Care Subsidy Fund is subject to the following condition: the assessment on net written premiums received from each health maintenance organization shall be made available to fund any qualified expenditure that can be paid from the Health Care Subsidy Fund. 97. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, and in addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Department of Banking and Insurance and the Department of the Treasury, the amount necessary to pay for the operational costs incurred by various departments to meet the statutory requirements of P.L.2019, c.141 (C.17B:27A-57 et seq.) is appropriated from the Health Insurance Exchange Trust Fund, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 98. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 8 of P.L.1992, c.160 (C.26:2H-18.58) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, $20,655,000 is appropriated from the Health Care Subsidy Fund to the Department of Health to fund the Quality Improvement Program  New Jersey. 99. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for programs and services to address the COVID-19 pandemic and any other federally declared emergency, there are appropriated to the various departments and agencies, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in consultation with the State Treasurer, such amounts as are determined to be necessary to support costs that are not eligible for federal reimbursement or costs that require a State cost share pending the federal cost share reimbursement. 100. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, the costs of State department purchases of products in compliance with P.L.2020, c.117 (C.13:1E-99.126 et seq.), which prohibited the provision or sale of certain single-use carryout bags, plastic straws, and polystyrene foam food service products, are appropriated from the Clean Energy Fund. 101. In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for the Cannabis Regulatory Commission, there are appropriated such additional amounts to pay for costs associated with implementing the New Jersey Cannabis Regulatory, Enforcement Assistance, and Marketplace Modernization Act, P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.), and the legalization of medical and personal use cannabis as determined by the Cannabis Regulatory Commission, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 102. Notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary, the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services (DMAHS) in the Department of Human Services shall require all Medicaid Managed Care Organizations (MCOs) to annually report the percentage of total medical expenditures paid for primary care services, beginning with 2020.  DMAHS shall require the MCOs to use and report on the two uniform definitions of primary care services which are delineated as broad and narrow as established by the Patient Centered Primary Care Collaborative and Milbank Memorial Fund.  The data on these two measures shall be published annually, by MCO, on the NJ FamilyCare website. In addition, the New Jersey Division of Pensions and Benefits (DPB) shall annually report the data on the same two measures of primary care spending for each of the state funded plans that it administers and publish the information on its website annually.  Nothing herein shall require DMAHS, DPB, or MCOs to report and publicly disclose any specific rates of reimbursement for any specific primary care services.  In collaboration with DMAHS and the Department of Banking and Insurance, the Office of the Treasurer, the DPB shall conduct a market scan of State-funded team-based primary care models (including but not limited to the Comprehensive Primary Care initiatives and Patient Centered Medical Home models) currently in use in markets in the State that are funded in any part with State revenue.  The market scan shall include a detailed description of all the quality, efficiency, and performance measures used in the models and shall be made publicly available on the DPB website.  The market scan shall be used by the State to develop an aligned high-quality team-based primary care model or models (that emphasize capitation and performance payments over a fee for service reimbursement model) that shall be included in all State-funded health benefits and health insurance programs. 103. Any funds that may be received by the State of New Jersey deposited in the Opioid Recovery and Remediation Fund established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2023, c.25 (C.26:2G-39), are appropriated and may be transferred to other State departments as directed by the Commissioner of Human Services in support of the purposes provided for in P.L.2023, c.25, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 104. There are appropriated such additional amounts as may be required to pay claims not payable from the Tort Claims Liability Fund or payable under the "New Jersey Contractual Liability Act", N.J.S.59:13-1 et seq., as recommended by the Attorney General and as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine.  The amounts appropriated are available for the payment of direct costs of legal, administrative, and medical services related to the investigation, mitigation, and litigation of claims not payable from the Tort Claims Liability Fund or payable under the "New Jersey Contractual Liability Act," as recommended by the Attorney General and as the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting shall determine.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, claims or costs paid from the monies appropriated under this paragraph on behalf of entities funded, in whole or in part from non-State funds, may be reimbursed from such non-State funds sources as determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  Appropriations under this paragraph shall not be available to pay punitive damages and shall not be deemed a waiver of any immunity by the State. 105. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.), including paragraph (1) of subsection b. of section 41 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-50), or any other law or regulation to the contrary, revenues deposited into the Cannabis Regulatory, Enforcement Assistance, and Marketplace Modernization Fund are appropriated for the following purposes: $25,500,000 for Violence Intervention programs including Hospital-Based Violence Intervention and Community-Based Violence Intervention programs; $5,000,000 for New Jersey Economic Development Authority cannabis equity grant programs; $2,000,000 for New Jersey-Based Childrens Defense Fund Freedom Schools; $8,000,000 for Anti-Violence Out-of-School Youth Summer programs; and $7,000,000 for Release Support Partnership programs, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  Such additional amounts may be transferred to the Departments of Community Affairs, Corrections, Law and Public Safety, or State, or to the New Jersey Economic Development Authority for such purposes, as determined by the State Treasurer and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 106. Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, revenues deposited into the Underage Deterrence and Prevention Account pursuant to subsection e. of section 41 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-50), are appropriated for underage deterrence programs developed by the Cannabis Regulatory Commission, the Governors Council on Substance Use Disorder, the Department of Children and Families, and the Department of Law and Public Safety.  Amounts may be transferred to these entities, as determined by the State Treasurer and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 107. Notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Direct Support Professionals Wage Increase shall be used to provide payments, based upon the wage increase established in fiscal year 2024 for each direct support professional, or professional with an equivalent title and job function, who provides childrens behavioral health services or assists children or adults with intellectual or developmental disabilities under a provider contract or fee-for-service agreement with the Department of Children and Families, the Division of Developmental Disabilities in the Department of Human Services, or the Division of Vocational Rehabilitation Services in the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. 108. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, $585,000,000 is appropriated from the New Jersey Debt Defeasance and Prevention Fund for transfer to the General Fund as State revenue, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 109.This act shall take effect July 1, 2024.